<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89131-0054 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-31-89.f2.A1053</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 19 / Tuesday, January 31, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF LABOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Occupational Safety and Health Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">29 CFR Part 1910</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. S-015]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Electric Power Generation, Transmission, and Distribution; ElectricalProtective Equipment</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Agency:</T2> Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA),Department of Labor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Action:</T2> Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Summary:</T2> OSHA is proposing in this document a new standard addressingthe work practices to be used during the operation and maintenance of electricpower generation, transmission, and distribution facilities. The proposalincludes requirements relating to confined spaces, hazardous energy control,working near energized parts, grounding for employee protection, work onunderground and overhead installations, work in substations and generatingplants, and other special conditions and equipment unique to the generation,transmission, and distribution of electric energy. OSHA is proposing toapply these new requirements only to electric utilities; however, the Agencyis considering extending the scope of the standard to all electric powergeneration, transmission, and distribution installations. Compliance withthese requirements will prevent injuries to employees working on electricpower systems.OSHA is also proposing to revise the electrical protective equipment requirementscontained in the General Industry Standards. The current standards forthe design of electrical protective equipment adopt several national consensusstandards by reference. The proposed revision would replace the incorporationof these out-of-date consensus standards with a set of performance-orientedrequirements, which are consistent with the latest revisions of these consensusstandards. Additionally, OSHA is proposing new requirements for the safeuse and care of electrical protective equipment to complement the equipmentdesign provisions. These revisions will update the existing OSHA standardsand will prevent accidents caused by inadequate electrical protective equipment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Date:</T2> Written comments and requests for a hearing on these proposedrules must be postmarked by May 1, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>Address:</T2> All comments, objections, and hearing requests must besent in quadruplicate to the Docket Officer; Docket No. S015, Rm. N3670;U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration;200 Constitution Ave., NW.; Washington, DC 20210.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Mr. James F. Foster; U.S. Departmentof Labor; Occupational Safety and Health Administration; Rm. N3637; 200Constitution Ave. NW., Washington, DC 20210 (202-523-8151).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>A. Need for Proposed RegulationEmployees performing operation or maintenance work on electric power generation,transmission, or distribution installations are not adequately protectedby current OSHA standards, though these employees face far greater electricalhazards than those faced by other workers. The voltages involved are generallymuch higher, and a large part of their work involves exposure to energizedparts of the power system.The existing electrical regulations contained in Subpart S of the GeneralIndustry Standards address electric utilization systems_installations ofelectric conductors and equipment which use electric energy for mechanical,chemical, heating, lighting, or similar purposes. Subpart S protects mostemployees from the hazards associated with electric utilization equipmentand with the premises wiring that supplies this equipment. However, SubpartS does not contain requirements protecting employees from the hazards arisingout of the operation or maintenance of electric power generation, transmission,or distribution installations.In contrast, telecommunications workers, who face similar hazards, arecovered under a specific telecommunications standard in andSection; 1910.268.This regulation protects employees performing communications work (no matterwhat industry is involved) from the two major hazards of falling and electricshock. These are the same two hazards accounting for most of the accidentaldeaths in electric power transmission and distribution work.Employees engaged in the construction of electric power transmission ordistribution systems are protected by the provisions of Subpart V of theConstruction Standards (Part 1926). However, this standard does not addressoperation or maintenance work, nor does it cover work in electric powergenerating plants.The electric utility industry has requested several times in recent yearsthat OSHA adopt a set of rules on the operation and maintenance of powergeneration, transmission, and distribution systems. Toward this end, representativesof Edison Electric Institute (EEI) and of the International Brotherhoodof Electrical Workers (IBEW) developed a draft standard, submitted it toOSHA, and suggested that it be used as a proposed rule. The Agency acceptedthe draft standard and used it to begin the development of this proposal.B. Accident PatternsRelated accident data must be collected and analyzed to establish a basisfor the development of safety standards. OSHA can look to several sourcesfor information on accidents in the electrical utility industry. BesidesOSHA's own accident investigation files, statistics on injuries are compiledby the Edison Electric Institute and by the International Brotherhood ofElectrical Workers (an association of investor-owned electric utilitiesand a union representing electric utility workers, respectively). Additionally,the Bureau of Labor Statistics (BLS) publishes such accident data as incidencerates for total cases, and lost workday cases, and lost workdays. (An analysisof accident data for electric utility workers can be found in section 4of Eastern Research Group's (ERG) ``Preparation of an Economic Impact Studyfor the Proposed OSHA Regulation Covering Electric Power Generation, Transmission,and Distribution,'' June 1986, which is available for inspection and copyingin the Docket Office.)Accident incidence rates for the electric services industry (SIC 491) areslightly lower than corresponding rates for the private sector as a whole.Furthermore, these rates are much lower than the traditionally more hazardousmanufacturing, construction, and mining industries. However, although accidentincidence rates can be used to compare relative risk between industries,they are not specific enough to be used to determine the types of hazardsthat need to be addressed by an occupational safety standard.OSHA realized during the development of this proposal that, except forelectrical hazards, the electric utility industry is no more hazardousthan most other industries. At the same time, OSHA recognized that therisk faced by some employees during certain electric-utility-type operationsis greater than the risk faced by other general industry employees. Forexample, the risk of electric shock to an electric power line worker orcable repairer performing his or her routine duties is far greater thanthat faced by any other occupational group.\1\<NOTE/> It is the particularly hazardous operations that are beingaddressed by OSHA's standard.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ JACA Corp., ``Regulatory Assessment of the Impact of theProposed Electrical Safety-Related Work Practices Standard, Final Report,''October 1983, pp. 4-8 to 4-10. (This report did not distinguish betweenelectric power line workers and cable repairers employed by electric utilitiesand these types of workers employed by other industries.) This documentis available for inspection and copying in Docket S-015 in the Docket Office.BLS's Supplementary Data System (SDS) provides some detail on the characteristicsof accidents in the electric service (i.e., electric utility) industry.SDS files indicate that the three major sources of injury within SIC 491are falls, overexertion, and being struck by or against an object. Informationon the nature of injuries also can be obtained from SDS. For example, fromthese data, sprains/strains, cuts/lacerations, and contusions/bruises arethe most frequent injuries encountered in the electric services industry.It is noteworthy that electric shock cases do not constitute a major injurycategory and are grouped under ``all other classifiable.'' Although thesedata do indicate hazards that must be addressed by a standard, they donot provide enough information to provide specific guidance for writingthe standard's requirements.More specific information on fatal and other serious accidents was gatheredfrom IBEW, EEI, and OSHA files. Contrasting with the SDS data, these filesindicate that electrical accidents are the most frequent type of fataland other serious injuries, accounting for approximately one half of these.According to EEI and IBEW data, other accident types that occur frequentlyinclude motor vehicle accidents, falls, and ``struck by/crushed.'' Of theaccident information in the OSHA, IBEW, and EEI files used during the developmentof the proposal, only EEI and IBEW accident descriptions were used to judgethe adequacy of the standard's provisions. The OSHA records were not usedin the development of the proposal because they were being compiled andanalyzed during the development process. However, these records will besubmitted into the record of this rulemaking and will be considered inthe formulation of the final rule.C. Significant RiskOSHA must show that the hazards the Agency proposes to address in a safetyregulation present significant risks to employees. As part of the regulatoryanalyses for this proposal, OSHA has determined the population at risk,the occupations presenting major risks, and the incidence and severityof injuries attributable to the failure to follow established standards.In keeping with the purpose of safety standards to prevent accidental injuryand death, OSHA has estimated the number of accidents that would be preventedby the proposed regulation. Although nearly all workers in the electric utility industry are exposedto various hazards common to the industry, some are at much greater riskthan others. Eastern Research Group, Inc. (ERG), in their ``Preparationof an Economic Impact Study for the Proposed OSHA Regulation Covering ElectricPower Generation, Transmission, and Distribution,'' June 1986, characterizedthe frequency with which accidents occur in the industry and tabulatedthe relative risk among electric utility occupations. According to theERG report, ``there were more accidents associated with transmission anddistribution [lines] than with substations or power generation [installations].''Within the first category, more fatal and serious lost-time accidents occurredamong line workers, apprentice line workers, and working line foremen.Within the latter two categories, substation electricians and general utilitymechanics experienced the most accidents. (See p. 4-23 of the ERG report.)The hazards that are directly covered by the proposed standard are thoseof an electrical nature, causing electrocution and injuries due to electricshock. In addition, the proposed standard would directly affect fatalitiesand injuries associated with four other types of accidents: (1) Struckby or struck against; (2) fall; (3) caught in or between; and (4) contactwith temperature extremes. The proposal addresses the wide range of injuriescommon to general industry work.OSHA has estimated that an average of 21,175 lost-workday injuries to andbetween 68 and 75 fatalities of electric utility and utility contractoroperation and maintenance employees occur annually. (See Section IV ofthis preamble.) OSHA has also estimated the number of injuries which couldbe prevented by the proposed regulations. Taking into account such factorsas existing regulation and the differences in training levels among utilities,OSHA estimated that 860 lost-workday injuries and between 24 and 28 deathscould be prevented each year through compliance with the provisions containedin the proposal. (A detailed analysis of the benefits of the proposed standardand a description of the methodology used can be found in the PreliminaryRegulatory Analysis (PRIA) for the proposal, which is available for inspectionand copying in the Docket Office.) Based on this analysis, OSHA has madea preliminary determination that hazards in the electric utility workplacepose a significant risk to employees covered by the proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Development of Proposed Standard</ITAG>A. Present StandardsOSHA adopted regulations applying to the construction of power transmissionand distribution lines and equipment in 1972 (Subpart V of Part 1926).The term ``construction'' is broadly defined in andSection;1926.950(a)(1)to include alteration, conversion, and improvement, as well as the originalinstallation of the lines and equipment. However, Subpart V does not applyto the operation or maintenance of transmission or distribution installations.OSHA has found, in reviewing the construction regulations, that the provisionsof Subpart V of Part 1926 are suitable for use as a base in the developmentof rules for operation and maintenance work. Important safety considerationsfor electric utility employees have been addressed in Subpart V includingtools and protective equipment, mechanical equipment, grounding for employeeprotection, and overhead and underground installations. These are topicsthat would have to be addressed in a comprehensive standard for the operationand maintenance of electric utility facilities. However, the constructionrules do have some disadvantages. During the 15 years Subpart V has beenin effect, areas of ambiguity have developed, making parts of the standarddifficult for employees and employers to understand and for OSHA complianceofficers to enforce. Additionally, some of the requirements are specificallyrelated to the initial construction of lines and equipment and are notreadily adaptable to maintenance operations.The National Electrical Safety Code (American National Standards InstituteStandard ANSI C2; also known as the NESC) must also be taken into considerationin the development of rules for the operation and maintenance of electricpower generation, transmission, and distribution systems. This nationalconsensus standard contains requirements specifically addressing this typeof work. The 1987 version of ANSI C2 is much more up-to-date than SubpartV of the Construction Standards. However, ANSI C2 is primarily directedto prevention of electric shock, although it does contain a few requirementsfor the prevention of falls. Other hazards common to the electric utilityindustry are not discussed.Another related OSHA standard is andSection;1910.268, pertaining to telecommunicationswork. Much of the field work covered in this regulation is similar in natureto the type of field work performed by electric utility employees, andthe hazards faced in the performance of this type of work are frequentlythe same in both industries. In any situation in which the hazards arethe same and in which there is no clear coverage in the other existingstandards, the provisions in the telecommunications standard have beenused as a basis for developing requirements to protect employees performingelectric-utility-type work.B. Industry-Union Draft StandardAs previously noted, representatives of EEI and IBEW developed a draftstandard, submitted it to OSHA, and represented it as being a negotiatedstandard that could be used in a rulemaking activity. This draft standardwas essentially a continuation of the existing requirements of SubpartV of Part 1926 in which the hazards addressed are those found in transmissionand distribution installations after the construction phase is completedand the electrical system becomes operational. Additionally, based on existingindustry practice, EEI and IBEW added provisions addressing generatingplants, substations, confined spaces, and hazardous energy control to supplementthe rules on transmission and distribution work.In the development of this proposal, OSHA evaluated the draft submittedby EEI and IBEW to determine its suitability as a base document. In areaswhich overlapped existing OSHA standards, the draft was reviewed to seeif equivalent safety was provided. For example, provisions in the draftstandard dealing with ladders were compared to the regulations in SubpartD of Part 1910. OSHA also reviewed the draft to determine if its requirementswere as effective as the requirements of national consensus standards addressingthe same hazards and to determine if definitions of terms common to severalother OSHA standards were identical. For example, the draft provisionson hazardous energy control were checked against the equivalent ANSI standard,ANSI Z244.1-1982, to be sure that OSHA's proposal would better effectuatesafety.After thoroughly analyzing the EEI-IBEW draft, OSHA determined that, togetherwith ANSI C2 and Subpart V of Part 1926, it could provide a basis fromwhich a proposal could be developed. OSHA met with representatives of EEIand IBEW several times to obtain their advice. OSHA then clarified someof the language involved, revised unenforceable wording, and resolved mostof the conflicts with other OSHA regulations and with national consensusstandards. The remaining conflicts are discussed in detail, and OSHA'spreliminary position is justified in the Summary and Explanation of theProposed Standard section of this preamble (Section III).<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Summary and Explanation of Proposed Standard </ITAG>This section discusses the important elements of the proposal, explainsthe purpose of the individual requirements, and explains any differencesbetween the proposal and existing standards. Section 1910.137 Electrical protective equipment is in constant use during electric utilitywork; and, appropriately, the EEI/IBEW draft standard contained provisionsrelated to this equipment. Because the existing OSHA standards for electricalprotective equipment are contained in andSection; 1910.137, the Agency hasdetermined that relevant requirements in the EEI/IBEW draft relating tosuch equipment should be addressed within the format of the current standardsrather than in the newly proposed andSection; 1910.269. Further, OSHA believesthat these updated provisions should apply throughout industry, whereversuch equipment is necessary for employee safety, and that these provisionsshould not be limited to electric utility work. Therefore, OSHA is proposingthe revision of andSection;1910.137, which currently incorporates by referencethe following six American National Standards Institute (ANSI) standards:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s10,xs40</C> <H1>Item </H1><H1>Standard</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating gloves <D>J6.6-1967</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber matting for use around electric apparatus <D>J6.7-1935 (R1962)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating blankets <D>J6.4-1970</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating hoods <D>J6.2-1950 (R1962)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating line hose <D>J6.1-1950 (R1962)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating sleeves <D>J6.5-1962</D></ITAG></ITAG>These ANSI standards were originally developed and adopted as AmericanSociety for Testing and Materials (ASTM) standards. (In fact, the latestrevisions of these standards use the ASTM designations, rather than usingseparate designations for both standards-writing organizations.) As istypical of national consensus standards, the ASTM standards are filledwith detailed specifications for the manufacture, testing, and design ofelectrical protective equipment. Additionally, these standards are revisedfrequently, making existing andSection; 1910.137 up to a quarter centuryout of date. For example, the most recent ANSI standard listed in the existingOSHA requirement is dated 1970. The most recent ASTM version availableis a 1984 edition of specifications on rubber insulating gloves. The completelist of current ASTM standards corresponding to the ANSI standards is asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 120-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Gloves. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 178-81, Specification for Rubber Insulating Matting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 1048-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Blankets. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 1049-83, Specification for Rubber Insulating Covers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 1050-85, Specification for Rubber Insulating Line Hose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM D 1051-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Sleeves.</ITAG>Additionally, ASTM has adopted standards on the in-service care of insulatingline hose and covers (ASTM F 478-87), insulating blankets (ASTM F 479-83),and insulating gloves and sleeves (ASTM F 496-85). In an attempt to retain the quality of protection afforded by the ASTMstandards, OSHA has developed a proposed revision of andSection; 1910.137which has been derived from the ASTM documents but which has been writtenin performance terms. OSHA recognizes the importance of the ASTM standardsin defining basic requirements for the safe design and manufacture of electricalprotective equipment for employees. The proposed revision of andSection;1910.137would maintain the protection presently afforded to employees by the referencedASTM standards. While carrying forward ASTM provisions which are considerednecessary for employee safety, OSHA is providing greater flexibility forcompliance with these provisions to the extent that worker safety warrants.OSHA has determined, therefore, that the requirements contained in thisproposed revision of andSection;1910.137 are reasonably necessary to protectemployees from electrical hazards posing significant risks in the workplace.There are several reasons why adopting the ASTM standards in toto wouldbe inappropriate. First, it should be noted that ASTM has revised eachof the currently referenced standards several times since they were adoptedin the existing OSHA regulation. Because of the continual process by whichASTM periodically revises its standards, any specific editions that OSHAmight adopt would likely be outdated within a few years. Additionally,since the rulemaking process is lengthy, a complete revision of OSHA'selectrical protective equipment requirements every three years or so tokeep pace with the changes in the consensus standards is not practical.To remedy this problem, OSHA has proposed a revision of andSection;1910.137to make the standards flexible enough to accommodate changes in technology,obviating the need for constant revision. Additionally, where possible,the proposal is written in performance terms in order to allow alternativemethods of compliance if they provide comparable safety to the employee.Another difficulty with incorporation of the ASTM standards by referenceis that they contain many details which are not directly related to employeesafety. In this proposed revision of andSection; 1910.137, OSHA has triedto carry forward only provisions which are relevant to employee safetyin the workplace. Futhermore, OSHA has attempted to simplify those provisionsto make the standards easier for employers and employees to use and understand.Because the proposed revision places all relevant requirements in the textof the regulations, employers would no longer have to refer to the ASTMdocuments to determine their obligations under OSHA.In striving for this degree of simplification, the Agency has tried touse an approach which will accept new methods of protection which may appearin future editions of the ASTM standards. OSHA recognizes that such futureeditions of these standards might contain technological advances providingsignificant improvement in employee safety which might not be permittedunder the revised andSection; 1910.137. However, due to the performance-orientednature of the OSHA standard as compared to the ASTM standards, conflictsbetween the two standards in areas affecting employee safety are expectedto be infrequent.An employer who followed the updated ASTM standards would be covered byOSHA's <T3>de minimis </T3>policy as set forth in OSHA Instruction CPL 2.45A (FieldOperations Manual). Under that policy, a <T3>de minimis </T3>condition exists where an employer's workplace hasbeen updated in accordance with new technology or equipment as a resultof revisions to the latest consensus publications from which OSHA standardswere derived, where the updated versions result in a ``state of the art''workplace, technically advanced beyond the requirements of the applicableOSHA standard, and where equal or greater safety and health protectionis provided.In view of the limitations imposed by the continued incorporation by referenceof the outdated ASTM standards, OSHA has determined that relevant requirementsfor electrical protective equipment for workers should be placed withinthe body of andSection; 1910.137 and that these provisions should be updatedand clarified to facilitate their application to workplaces.There currently exists several relatively new ASTM standards on other typesof electrical protective equipment. For example, ASTM has adopted specificationsfor fiberglass-reinforced plastic rod and tube used in live-line tools.However, the standards writing organization has not developed correspondingrequirements on the use and care of this equipment. Similarly, ASTM StandardF712 sets forth test methods for electrically insulating plastic guardequipment for the protection of workers, but this standard does not containprovisions on the design, use, or care of the guards. ASTM is currentlyworking on standards for the use and care of some of this equipment andon additional specifications for still other types of equipment.Most electrical protective equipment presently being manufactured meetsexisting ASTM standards. Because of this, OSHA's adoption of these newerASTM design and test specifications would have little impact on employeesafety without the adoption of corresponding requirements on the use andcare of the equipment. Therefore, to maximize efficient use of the Agency'savailable resources, this proposed revision does not include provisionscovering these other types of electrical protective equipment, but suchprovisions are being considered for future rulemaking. In this way, allof the newer types of equipment can be dealt with at one time, and provisionson care and use can be included.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a)</ITAG>Paragraph (a) of the proposed revision to andSection; 1910.137 addressesthe design and manufacture of insulating blankets, matting, covers, linehose, gloves, and sleeves made of rubber (either natural or synthetic).For the reasons noted earlier, other types of equipment are not covered.However, the proposal does not preclude their use.Under paragraph (a)(1)(i), blankets, gloves, and sleeves would have tobe made without seams. This method of making the protective equipment minimizesthe chances of separation of the material. Because they are used to permitworkers to handle energized lines, blankets, gloves, and sleeves are theonly defense an employee has against electric shock. The other three typesof electrical protective equipment (covers, line hose, and matting) generallyprovide a more indirect form of protection_they protect against accidentalcontact.Paragraph (a)(1)(ii) would require electrical protective equipment to bemarked to indicate its class and type. The class marking gives an indicationof the voltage with which the equipment can be used; the type marking indicateswhether or not the equipment is ozone resistant. This will enable employeesto know the uses and voltages for which the equipment is suited.Paragraph (a)(1)(iii) proposes that the marking be nonconductive and beapplied so that the properties of the equipment are not impaired. Thiswill ensure that the required markings do not interfere with the protectionto be provided by the equipment.Paragraph (a)(l)(iv) proposes that the marking on gloves be provided onlyin the cuff area. Markings in other areas could possibly be worn off. Moreover,having the markings in one place will allow the employee to determine theclass and type of glove quickly.Under the national consensus standards (both the currently referenced andthe newer versions), electrical protective equipment must be capable ofpassing certain electrical tests. In andSection; 1910.137(a)(2), OSHA isproposing to continue these requirements. The tests specified in the ASTMstandards are very detailed. Through the use of performance language, theproposal establishes the same level of protection without a lengthy discussionof test procedures. In the development of this performance language, OSHAhas attempted to avoid conflicts between the proposal and the ASTM standards.Comments are requested on whether the OSHA proposal has accomplished thegoal of protecting workers with test criteria that eliminate unnecessarydetail and that are written in performance-oriented language.Paragraph (a)(2)(i) proposes that electrical protective equipment be capableof withstanding the a-c proof-test voltages in Table I-2 or the d-c proof-testvoltages in Table I-3 (depending, of course, on whether an a-c proof testor an equivalent d-c proof test is performed). The proof-test voltageslisted in these tables have been taken from the current ASTM standards,which also contain details of the test procedures used to determine whetherelectrical protective equipment is capable of withstanding these voltages.These details have not been included in the proposal. Paragraph (a)(2)(i)replaces them with a performance-oriented requirement that whatever testis used must reliably indicate that the equipment can withstand the proof-testvoltage involved. To meet the requirements of the OSHA performance standard,employers would have to get the assurance of the manufacturer that theequipment is capable of withstanding the appropriate proof-test voltage.The manufacturer, in turn, would likely look to the ASTM standards forguidance in determining the testing procedure.Paragraph (a)(2)(i) also would require that the proof-test voltage be appliedfor 1 minute for insulating matting and for 3 minutes for other insulatingequipment. Tests using shorter times would not give a reliable indicationof the voltage-withstanding capabilities of the protective equipment.When an a-c proof test is used on gloves, the current through the glovesgives an indication of the insulating value of the material used. Paragraph(a)(2)(ii) would require that gloves subjected to an a-c proof-test notpass current greater than allowed in Table I-2. Again, the currents listedin the table have been taken from the current ASTM standard (namely, ASTMD 120-87). For a-c voltages at frequencies other than 60 hertz, the currentwould be computed from the direct ratio of the frequencies.Since the relatively high voltages used in testing electrical protectiveequipment for minimum breakdown voltage can actually damage the insulatingmaterial under test (even if it passes), paragraph (a)(2)(iii) would prohibitprotective equipment that has been subjected to such a test from beingused to protect employees from electrical hazards.Around high voltage lines and equipment, a luminous discharge, called electriccorona, can occur due to ionization of the surrounding air caused by avoltage gradient which exceeds a certain critical value. The blue coronadischarge is accompanied by a hissing noise and by ozone, which can causedamage to certain types of rubber insulating materials. Therefore, whenthere is a chance that ozone may be produced at a work location, electricalprotective equipment made of ozone-resistant material is frequently used.To ensure that ozone-resistant material will, in fact, be resistant tothe damaging effects of the gas, paragraph (a)(2)(iv) would require thistype of material to be capable of withstanding an ozone test. Standardizedozone tests are given in the ASTM specifications. The proposal also listssigns of failure of the test, such as checking, cracking, breaks, and pitting.Paragraph (a)(3) applies to the workmanship and finish of electrical protectiveequipment. Because physical irregularities can interfere with the insulatingproperties of the equipment, paragraph (a)(3)(i) would prohibit the presenceof harmful defects which can be detected by test or inspection. However,some minor irregularities are nearly unavoidable in the manufacture ofrubber goods, and these imperfections may be present in the insulatingmaterials without significantly affecting the insulation. Proposed paragraph(a)(3)(ii) lists the types of imperfections that would be permitted. Evenwith these imperfections, electrical protective equipment would still berequired to be capable of passing the electrical tests specified in paragraph(a)(2).Since paragraph (a) of proposed andSection; 1910.137 is written in performance-orientedlanguage, OSHA believes that it is important for employers and manufacturersto have some guidance in terms of what is acceptable under the proposedstandard. OSHA also realizes that the current ASTM specifications on electricalprotective equipment are currently accepted by industry as providing safetyto employees and that existing electrical protective equipment is normallymade to these specifications. Furthermore, the proposal is based on theprovisions of the national consensus standards, although the requirementsare stated in performance terms. OSHA has therefore proposed a footnoteat the end of paragraph (a) which states that rubber insulating equipmentmeeting the requirements of the present ASTM standards for this equipmentwould be considered as conforming to the requirements contained in proposedandSection; 1910.137.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (b) </ITAG>Although the existing andSection; 1910.137 does not contain provisions forthe care and use of insulating equipment, OSHA believes provisions of thistype can contribute greatly to employee safety. Electrical protective equipmentis, in large part, manufactured in accordance with the latest ASTM standards.This would probably be the case even in the absence of OSHA regulations.However, improper use and care of this equipment can easily reduce, oreven eliminate, the protection afforded by this equipment. Therefore, OSHAis proposing to add to andSection; 1910.137 requirements on the in-servicecare and use of electrical protective equipment. These new provisions willhelp ensure that these safety products retain their insulating properties.Paragraph (b)(1) proposes that electrical protective equipment be maintainedin a safe and reliable condition. This general, performance-oriented requirement,which applies to all equipment addressed by proposed andSection; 1910.137,would help ensure that employees are fully protected from electric shock.Detailed criteria for the use and care of specific types of electricalprotective equipment are contained in the following ASTM standards:<ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM F 478-87, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating LineHose and Covers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM F 479-83, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating Blankets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">ASTM F 496-85, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating Glovesand Sleeves.</ITAG>Paragraph (b)(2), which has been derived from the ASTM standards, wouldapply only to rubber insulating blankets, covers, line hose, gloves, andsleeves. These are the only types of electrical protective equipment addressedby consensus standards on the care and use of the equipment. Although the rubber insulating equipment addressed in proposed andSection;1910.137(a) is currently designed to be capable of withstanding voltagesof up to 40 kilovolts, such equipment is actually intended to be used atlower voltages. The use of insulating equipment at voltages less than itsactual breakdown voltage provides a margin of safety for the employee toprotect against voltage surges and against gradual deterioration of theequipment between tests. In paragraph (b)(2)(i) and Table I-4, the OSHAproposal has adopted the margins of safety recognized in the ASTM standards,restricting the use of insulating equipment to voltages lower than theproof-test voltages given in Table I-2 and I-3.Paragraph (b)(2)(ii) would require insulating equipment to be visuallyinspected before use each day and immediately after any incident whichmight be suspected of causing damage. In this way, obvious defects canbe detected before an accident occurs. Possible damage-causing incidentswould include exposure to corona and exposure to possible direct physicaldamage. Additionally, rubber gloves would be required to be subjected toan air test. In the field, this test usually consists of rolling the cufftoward the palm so that air is entrapped within the glove. In a testingfacility, a mechanical inflater may be used. In either case, puncturesand cuts can easily be detected.During use, electrical protective equipment may become damaged and losesome of its insulating value. Proposed paragraph (b)(2)(iii) lists typesof damage which would cause the insulating value to drop. The equipmentwould not be permitted to be used if any of these defects are present.Defects other than those listed in paragraph (b)(2)(iii) may develop duringuse of the equipment and could also affect the insulating and mechanicalproperties of the equipment. If such defects are found, the equipment wouldbe required to be removed from service and tested in accordance with otherrequirements in paragraph (b)(2). The results of the tests would determineif it is safe to return the items to service.Foreign substances on the surface of rubber insulating equipment can degradethe material and lead to damage to the insulation. Paragraph (b)(2)(v)would require the equipment to be cleaned as needed to remove any foreignsubstances.Over time, certain environmental conditions can also cause deteriorationof rubber insulating equipment. Paragraph (b)(2)(vi) proposes that insulatingequipment be stored so that it is protected from injurious conditions andsubstances, such as light, temperature extremes, excessive humidity, andozone. This requirement would help the equipment retain its insulatingproperties as it ages.Rubber insulating gloves are particularly sensitive to physical damageduring use. Through handling conductors and other electrical equipment,an employee can damage the gloves and lose the protection they provide.For example, a sharp point on the end of a conductor could puncture therubber. To protect against damage, protector gloves (usually made of leather)are worn over the rubber gloves. Paragraph (b)(2)(vii) recognizes the extraprotection afforded by leather gloves and would require their use overrubber gloves, except under limited conditions. Protector gloves wouldnot be required with Class 0 gloves if high finger dexterity is neededfor small parts manipulation. The maximum voltage on which Class 0 glovescan be used is 1000 volts. An employee is protected against electric shockat this voltage as long as a live part does not puncture the rubber andcontact the employee's hand. Small parts are not likely to do this. Evenif there is a tiny crack or puncture in the glove, current will not arcthrough the glove at 1000 volts or less.The other exception to the requirement for protector gloves is grantedif the possibility for damage is low and if gloves at least one class higherthan required for the voltage are used. For example, if a Class 2 gloveis used at 7500 volts or less (the maximum use voltage for Class 1 equipment),if high dexterity is needed, and if the possibility of damage is low, thenprotector gloves need not be used. In this case, the additional thicknessof insulation provides a measure of additional physical protection. However,to ensure that no loss of insulation occurred, the proposal would requireany gloves used under this exception to be tested before being used ata voltage higher than that permitted for the lower class of insulatingequipment.To ensure that electrical protective equipment retains its insulating propertiesover time, paragraph (b)(2)(viii) and Tables I-4 and I-5 would requireinsulating equipment to be tested periodically. Table I-4 lists the retestvoltages that would be required for the various classes of protective equipment,and Table I-5 presents the testing intervals for the different types ofequipment. These test voltages and intervals were taken from the relevantASTM standards. OSHA requests comments on whether the proposed tables arereasonable and whether they would adequately protect workers.Paragraph (b)(2)(ix) proposes the performance-oriented requirement thatthe method used for the periodic tests give a reliable indication of whetheror not the electrical protective equipment can withstand the voltages involved.In a performance-oriented standard, it would not be appropriate to spellout detailed procedures for the required tests, which vary depending onthe type of equipment being tested. On the other hand, OSHA believes thatit is important for employers to have some guidance in terms of what isacceptable under the proposed standard. Therefore, under proposed paragraph(b)(2)(ix), OSHA has included a note stating that electrical test methodsgiven in the various ASTM standards on rubber insulating equipment meetthe performance requirement. OSHA requests comments on whether the listedASTM standards are appropriate and on whether there are other acceptabletest methods that should also be listed.Once the equipment has been tested, it is important to ensure that anyfailed equipment is not returned to service. Paragraph (b)(2)(x) wouldprohibit electrical protective equipment that failed the required testsfrom being used by employees, unless the defects can be safely eliminated.For electrical protective equipment that failed the test, proposed paragraph(b)(2)(x) also lists acceptable means of rendering the equipment fit foruse. Sometimes defective portions of rubber line hose and blankets canbe removed. The result would be a smaller blanket or a shorter length ofline hose. Obviously, gloves and sleeves cannot be repaired in this manner;however, there are methods of patching them if the defects are minor. Rubberblankets can also be patched. The patched area must have electrical andphysical properties equal to those of the material being repaired. To minimizethe possibility that a patch will loosen or fail, the proposal would notpermit repairs to gloves outside the gauntlet area.Once the insulating equipment has been repaired, it must be retested toensure that any patches are effective and that there are no other defectspresent. Such retests would be required under proposed paragraph (b)(2)(xi).Employers, employees, and OSHA compliance staff must have a method of determiningwhether or not the tests required under paragraphs (b)(2)(viii) and (b)(2)(xi)have been performed. Paragraph (b)(2)(xii) proposes that this be accomplishedby means of certification by the employer that equipment has been testedin accordance with the standard. The certification would be required toidentify the equipment that passed the test and the date it was tested.Typical means of meeting this requirement include logs and stamping testdates on the equipment.Section 1910.269OSHA is proposing a new section to be added to the General Industry Standards.This new section would be added to Subpart R, Special Industries, and wouldbe designated andSection; 1910.269. Proposed andSection; 1910.269 containsrequirements for the prevention of injuries to employees performing operationor maintenance work on electric power generation, transmission, or distributioninstallations. Individual provisions contained in the proposed sectionare discussed below.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (a)</ITAG>Paragraph (a)(1) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 sets forth the scope ofthe proposal. Under the terms of proposed paragraph (a)(1)(i), the provisionsof andSection; 1910.269 would apply to the operation and maintenance of electricpower generation, transmission, and distribution systems and to electricaltesting of such systems. Although the proposal does not define ``operation''or ``maintenance,'' OSHA intends that the standard cover all activity,other than construction work covered by Part 1926, associated with electricpower generation, transmission, and distribution installations owned byelectric utilities. The proposal would primarily cover the following typesof work operations:(1) Inspection,(2) Switching (connection and disconnection of facilities),(3) Routine maintenance of lines and equipment,(4) Line-clearance tree trimming,(5) Testing and fault locating,(6) Streetlight relamping,(7) Chemical cleaning of boilers, and(8) Other routine operation and maintenance activities.Proposed andSection; 1910.269 would apply to the parts of an electric utilityoperation that are directly involved with the generation, transmission,or distribution of electric power. Installations in buildings not usedfor one of these purposes would not be covered by the standard. For example,office buildings, warehouses, machine shops, and other installations whichare not an integral part of generating plant, substation, or control centerwould not be covered by proposed andSection; 1910.269. Work performed inthese installations would not be of a type addressed by the proposal. However,paragraph (a)(1)(i)(B) lists installations that are not integral to thegeneration of electric power, but that would be covered nonetheless. Suchinstallations include the fuel handling operations, water and steam spaces,and walking and working sufaces within the generating station.Paragraph (a)(1)(i)(D) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 explains the applicationof the standard to tree-trimming operations. The entire section, exceptparagraph (r)(1), would apply to tree-trimming operations performed byqualified employees, i.e., employees who are knowledgeable in the operationof electric power generation, transmission, or distribution equipment andthe hazards involved. These employees typically perform tree-trimming dutiesas an incidental part of their normal work activities. However, only paragraphs(a), (b), (c), (g), (k), (p), and (r) would apply to line-clearance tree-trimmingwork performed by other employees (line-clearance tree trimmers).Most tree-trimming operations, which are often performed by employees ofoutside contractors, do not involve routine line-maintenance activities.Although these employees work near the power lines, they do not work directlyon them. For activities other than the actual tree-trimming work, theseemployees would not be qualified employees for the purposes of this standard.Therefore, many of the requirements proposed in andSection; 1910.269 arenot relevant to their work. Since these employees would not be trainedas qualified linemen, OSHA feels that the application of rules writtenexpressly for electric utility-type work could expose these other typesof workers to hazards which they are not adequately trained to face. Forexample, proposed paragraph (1) would allow qualified employees to comecloser than 2 feet to a 7600-volt overhead distribution line if the employeeis wearing rubber insulating gloves. Because line-clearance tree trimmersare not usually trained in the proper use of this equipment, it would notbe appropriate to allow them to wear rubber gloves in order to get closerthan 2 feet to the same line.On the other hand, if employees performing line-clearance tree-trimmingwork are also ``qualified employees,'' with the necessary training andexperience in dealing with power lines, all of proposed andSection; 1910.269could be applied to their work.Paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (k), and (p) are general requirements addressingtraining, medical services and first aid, job briefing, material handling,and mechanical equipment. OSHA has determined that the requirements inthese areas are necessary and appropriate for line-clearance tree-trimmingwork performed by other than qualified employees. The remaining provisionsof proposed andSection; 1910.269 are not necessary for the safety of theseemployees and are not related to the type of work they would be performing.If information is submitted demonstrating that some of the listed provisionsare inappropriate or that additional rules are necessary, OSHA will considerpossible revisions to the final standard.So as not to overlap the regulations in the Construction Standards, theproposal would not apply to operations involving construction work. This``exemption'' is set forth in proposed andSection; 1910.269(a)(1)(ii)(A).``Construction work'' is defined in andSection; 1910.12(b) as ``work forconstruction, alteration, and/or repair, including painting and decorating.''In andSection; 1910.12(d), the term is further defined as including ``theerection of new electric transmission and distribution lines and equipment,and the alteration, conversion, and improvement of existing transmissionand distribution lines and equipment.'' None of the types of work coveredby these two definitions is covered by proposed andSection; 1910.269.In andSection; 1910.269(a)(1)(ii)(B), OSHA is proposing not to apply theregulation to installations for the generation, transmission, or distributionof electric energy not owned or operated by electric utilities nor to workperformed on such installations not owned by a utility. The scope of thedraft proposal submitted by EEI and IBEW was limited to utilities only,and OSHA has decided to propose that the standard be applied in the samemanner. However, industrial generation, transmission, and distributionsystems are essentially the same as those of a utility, and the work performedon industrial systems is nearly identical to that performed on electricutility installations. One might assume that electric utility systems areof larger capacity than those operated by industrial plants. In generalthis is true, but not always. For example, one generating facility fora large steel plant in Sparrows Point, Maryland, has a generating capacityof 140 megawatts with a generating voltage of 13 kilovolts and with distributionvoltages of 34.5 and 69 kilovolts. This system is larger than those ofmany rural electric cooperatives that would be covered by the proposal.Additionally, the existing OSHA and national consensus standards, SubpartV of Part 1926 and ANSI C2, respectively, do extend their coverage to anyonedoing electric-utility-type work. Consideration is being given to expandingthe scope of the standard within this rulemaking procedure. Therefore,OSHA is soliciting comments on the appropriateness of extending coverageof the standard to all power generation, transmission, and distributionsystems. OSHA also requests data on the costs and benefits of expandingthe scope in this manner. Existing regulations contained in Subpart S of Part 1910 apply to the installationand design of electric utilization systems. Although andSection; 1910.302(a)(2)(v)states that electric utility ``installations * * * for the purpose of communicationor metering; or for the generation, control, transformation, transmission,and distribution of electric energy'' are not covered by Subpart S, electricutility installations used for other purposes (i.e., those for the electricutilization systems) are covered by Subpart S. (See <T3>Edison Electric Institute v. Occupational Safety and Health Administration,</T3>No. 86-1486 (DC Cir., June 7, 1988.) This current differentiationin coverage between electric utilization installations, which are coveredby Subpart S, and generation, transmission, and distribution installations,which are not covered by Subpart S, is carried forward in paragraph (a)(1)(ii)(C), which states that andSection; 1910.269 would not apply to electricalinstallations, safety-related work practices, or maintenance considerationscovered by Subpart S. OSHA published a Proposed Rule in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on November 30, 1987, proposing a new standardon electrical safety-related work practices for general industry. The electricalsafety-related work practice requirements would be added to the existinginstallation requirements in Subpart S of the General Industry Standards(Part 1910). A major issue in that rulemaking concerns the scope of thestandard, i.e., whether or not OSHA should separate coverage within anelectric power generating station based on whether or not electric equipmentis directly involved with the generation of electric power as opposed tothe utilization of electric power. For example, under the two current proposals (andSection; 1910.331 of SubpartS, Part II and andSection; 1910.269), work on a motor in the heating andair conditioning system would be covered by the work practices in SubpartS, but work on a similar motor used in the generating system would be coveredby andSection;1910.269. While these motors may seem identical, the hazardseach presents may be quite different, necessitating different work practices.The utilization-system motor must meet the requirements of existing SubpartS for grounding, guarding of live parts, and overcurrent protection, amongother provisions. The work practices in the Subpart S proposal are basedon the assumption that the utilization system is in compliance with theexisting installation requirements of Subpart S, which have been in effectfor the last 17 years. On the other hand, the generating-system motor isnot required to meet any OSHA electrical standards. For example, the motoris not required to be grounded; live parts may be exposed; and protectionagainst overcurrent is not required. An employee working on or near a generating-systemmotor cannot assume that its frame is grounded and therefore safe to touch.Accordingly, the work practices in the Subpart S proposal are not necessarilyappropriate for work on this motor. At the public hearing on the Subpart S proposal (August 9 and 10, 1988,in Washington, DC), the issue was raised as to whether or not it is appropriateto have two electrical work practice standards (i.e., andSection; 1910.269and Subpart S work practices) in effect at electric power generating stations.Therefore, OSHA is considering the incorporation of all of the requirementscontained in the electrical safety-related work practices proposal thatare appropriate for electric power generating stations into the final standardfor electric power generation, transmission, and distribution. This wouldeliminate the need for employers to use two separate standards for electricalsafety-related work practices in generating stations. OSHA requests commentson whether or not this approach should be taken and, if it is, whetheror not there are any requirements in the Subpart S proposal that are notappropriate for work in electric power generating stations.Paragraph (a)(1)(iii) of proposal andSection; 1910.269 explains the applicationof the section with respect to the rest of Part 1910. All other GeneralIndustry Standards would continue to apply to installations covered bythis proposal unless an exception is given in andSection; 1910.269. For example,proposed andSection; 1910.269(p)(1)(i) would require the critical componentsof mechanical elevating and rotating equipment to be inspected before eachshift. This proposed provision would not supersede existing andSection; 1910.180(d),which details specific requirements for the inspection of cranes. Referencein andSection; 1910.269 to other sections of Part 1910 are provided onlyfor emphasis.Paragraph (a)(2) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses training foremployees. Since it is widely recognized that electric-utility-type workrequires special knowledge and skills, OSHA is proposing, in paragraph(a)(2)(i), to require training of employees in the safety-related workpractices, safety procedures, and other personnel safety requirements inthe standard that pertain to their respective job assignments. Employeeswould also be required to be trained in and familiar with any other safetypractices necessary for their safety, including applicable emergency procedures.OSHA has not proposed to require periodic follow-up training; however,public comment is requested on the need for and effectiveness of this typeof training.Paragraph (a)(2)(ii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 contains additionalrequirements for the training of qualified employees. Because qualifiedemployees are allowed to work very close to electric power lines and equipmentand because they face a high risk of electrocution, it is important thatthey be specially trained. Towards this end, the proposal would requirethat these employees be trained in distinguishing live parts from otherparts of electric equipment, in determining nominal voltages of lines andequipment, in the clearance distances set forth in the proposal, and inthe techniques involved in working on or near live parts.Under paragraph (a)(2)(iii), the proposal would permit classroom or on-the-jobtraining or a combination of both. This would allow employers to continuethe types of training programs that are currently in existence. Additionally,if an employee has already been trained (through previous job assignments,for example), the employer would not have to duplicate previous instruction.However, the employer would be required, by paragraph (a)(2)(iv), to certifythat each employee has been trained. This certification should not necessitatethe employer's completing forms or creating new records; existing personnelrecords would normally suffice, or the employer could simply make out acertification for each employee upon completion of training.The proposal would not require follow-up training for employees. However,OSHA is requesting information on the need for such training. If the rulemakingrecord supports the need for follow-up training, the final rule will requireit.Paragraph (a)(3) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require that conditionsexisting in the work area be determined before work is started. Frequently,the conditions present at a jobsite can expose employees to unexpectedhazards. For example, the grounding system available at an outdoor sitecould have been damaged by the weather or by vehicular traffic, or communicationscables in the vicinity could reduce clearances to an unacceptable level.To protect employees from such adverse situations, the conditions presentin the work area should be known so that appropriate action can be taken.The proposed language has been taken from andSection; 1926.950(b)(1). A similarrequirement can be found in ANSI C2-1987, Section 420D.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (b)</ITAG>Paragraph (b) of andSection; 1910.269 proposes requirements for medical servicesand first aid. In accordance with proposed andSection; 1910.269(a)(1)(iii),paragraph (b) emphasizes that the requirements of andSection; 1910.151 apply.That existing section includes provisions for available medical personnel,first aid training and supplies, and facilities for drenching or flushingof the eyes and body in the event of exposure to corrosive materials.Paragraph (b)(1)(i) of proposed andSection; 910.269 would require that personstrained in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and first aid be availablewhen two or more employees are working with energized lines or energizedequipment. For field work, two trained persons would be required. For plantwork, there would have to be enough trained persons to provide a 4-minuteresponse time in case of accident. Because of the hazard of electric shockwhen work is performed with energized lines and equipment, cardiopulmonaryresuscitation often becomes necessary so that employees who may be injuredby electrical shock can be revived. CPR must be started within 4 minutesto be effective in reviving an employee whose heart has gone into fibrillation.OSHA requests comments on whether the requirement as proposed is reasonableand, if changes are suggested, on what the costs and benefits of the suggestedchanges would be.Paragraph (b)(1)(ii) or proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require thatfirst aid training be equivalent to the training provided by the AmericanRed Cross. This provision is proposed so that the quality of first aidtraining is defined. The Red Cross is recognized as having effective trainingprograms. OSHA requests comments on whether there are additional trainingprograms that provide equivalent training and that should also be listedin the regulation.In andSection; 1910.269(b)(2), OSHA is proposing that first aid supplieswhich have been recommended by a physician be placed in weatherproof containers,unless stored indoors, and that these containers be readily accessible.This is to ensure that proper first aid supplies are available and arein good condition when needed.Paragraph (b) (3) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require that firstaid kits be maintained ready for use and be inspected at least annuallyin accordance with an established schedule. This is to ensure that firstaid kits are maintained with all of the proper equipment.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (c)</ITAG>Paragraph (c) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require a job briefingto be conducted before each job. Most of the work performed under the proposalrequires planning in order to ensure employee safety (as well as to protectequipment and the general public). Typically, jobs involve working nearexposed electric conductors energized at thousands of volts. If the workis not thoroughly planned ahead of time, the possibility of human erroris increased greatly. To avoid problems, the task sequence is prescribedbefore work is started. For example, before climbing a pole, the employeemust determine if the pole is capable of remaining in place and if clearancesare sufficient, and he or she must determine what tools will be neededand what procedure should be used for performing the job. Without job planning,the worker may ignore the clearance requirements or may have to reclimbthe pole to retrieve a forgotten tool, resulting in increased exposureto the hazards of falling and contact with energized lines.When more than one employee is involved, the job plan must be communicatedto all the affected employees. If the job is planned but the plan is notdiscussed with the workers, one employee may perform his or her dutiesout of order, endangering the entire crew. Therefore, OSHA is proposingto require a job briefing before work is started. The briefing would cover:Hazards and work procedures involved, special precautions, energy sourcecontrols, and requirements for personal protective equipment.As proposed by paragraph (c)(1), at least one briefing would be requiredto be conducted before the start of each shift. However, only one briefingin a shift would be needed if all the jobs are similar in nature. Additionalplanning discussions must take place for work involving significant changesin routine. For example, if the first two jobs of the day involve workingon energized lines with live-line tools and the third job involves workingon a deenergized line, separate briefings should be conducted for eachtype of job.Under paragraph (c)(2), the required briefing would normally consist ofa concise discussion outlining the tasks to be performed. However, if thework is particularly hazardous or if the employees may not be able to recognizethe hazards involved, then a more thorough discussion must take place.With this provision, OSHA recognizes that employees are familiar with thetasks and hazards involved with routine work. However, it is importantto take the time to carefully discuss unusual work situations that maypose additional or different hazards to workers.Proposed paragraph (c)(3) exempts employees working alone from the requirementsfor job briefings. It would still be important for the employee to planthe work; however, work procedure discussions would not have relevancefor a single worker inasmuch as there would be no one else available fordiscussion. (If more than one employee are present, then an employee isnot considered to be ``working alone,'' regardless of how many employeesare actually working.) Although it may not be practical to enforce a requirementfor job planning, OSHA requests comments on the need for and desirabilityof such a requirement.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (d)</ITAG>Paragraph (d) of andSection; 1910.269 proposes hazardous energy control (lockout/tagout)requirements. The provisions of this proposed paragraph essentially arepatterned after the national consensus standard of the American NationalStandards Institute, ANSI Z244.1-1982, ``American National Standard forPersonal Protection_Lockout/Tagout of Energy Sources_Minimum Safety Requirements.''In addition, the provisions of this proposed paragraph are consistent andcompatible with the generic procedures to be established by OSHA's generalindustry standard for control of hazardous energy sources (lockout/tagout),which was published on April 29, 1983 (53 FR 15496). Because the provisionsof proposed andSection; 1910.269(d) address aspects of utility work thatare not necessarily unique to the electric utility industry, it may bedesirable to cover lockout and tagging of hazardous energy sources (otherthan electric power transmission and distribution lines and equipment)under OSHA's generic lockout standard. In fact, installations that arenot within the scope of this standard would be covered by the generic standard.OSHA requests public comment on whether the hazards addressed in proposedandSection; 1910.269(d) would be more appropriately covered by proposed andSection;1910.147, the generic lockout and tagging standard.OSHA will take all comments, data, and testimony received in response toboth the generic lockout/tagout proposal and this proposal into considerationin the development of a final rule for electric power generation, transmission,and distribution. If it is determined that this final standard will containlockout and tagging provisions, these requirements will be the same asthose in the final generic lockout/tagout standard, except as necessaryto provide for unique situations in electric power generation work.Paragraph (d)(1) would limit the application of the provisions of paragraph(d) to the control of energy sources in installations for the purpose ofelectric power generation, including related equipment for communicationor metering. Procedures for the control of electric energy used for purposesof transmission and distribution would be addressed by proposed andSection;1910.269(m).Paragraph (d)(2) lists general requirements. Paragraph (d)(2)(i) wouldrequire that the employer ensure that all potentially hazardous energyis isolated and locked out, or tagged out, or otherwise disabled in accordancewith the provisions of this standard, before an employee performs any activityduring which energization, start-up, or release of stored energy couldoccur and cause injury.Paragraph (d)(2)(ii) would require that a procedure be developed, documented,and implemented for the control of potentially hazardous energy.Paragraph (d)(2)(iii) proposes requirements for the procedure, includingcoverage of the scope, purpose, responsibility, authorization, rules, andtechniques to apply. This paragraph also lists specific minimum elementsof coverage.Paragraph (d)(2)(iv) would require periodic inspections to ensure thatthe provisions of the standard are followed. OSHA requests comments onwhether a minimum frequency for such inspections should be specified inthe standard.Paragraph (d)(2)(v) would require that the inspections be performed byauthorized employees and be designed to correct observed deviations orinadequacies.Paragraph (d)(2)(vi) would require that the employer certify that the inspectionshave been performed. However, if records of normal work schedule and operationdemonstrate adequate inspection activity, no additional certification wouldbe required. OSHA invites public comment on the feasibility and adequacyof the proposed provision.Paragraph (d)(2)(vii) would require employees to be trained to ensure theirunderstanding of the procedures. Separate training provisions are listedfor authorized employees, affected employees, and other employees who mayhave access to covered energy sources or their controls.(The terms ``authorized employee'' and ``affected employee'' are definedin proposed andSection; 1910.269(x). An authorized employee is an employeewho has the authority and responsibility to perform a specific assignmentand who is knowledgeable in the construction and operation of the equipmentand the hazards involved. An affected employee is one who erects, installs,constructs, repairs, adjusts, inspects, operates, or maintains a processor equipment.) Paragraph (d)(2)(viii) would require annual retraining for all authorizedand affected employees, either by regular on-the-job work assignments orby specific training. Paragraph (d)(2)(ix) would require the employer to certify that the employeetraining has been accomplished and has been kept up to date. Paragraph (d)(3) lists requirements for locks and tags. Paragraph (d)(3)(i)would require that locks or tags or both be provided by the employer andbe the only authorized devices used for lockout/tagout of energy sources.Other provisions in paragraph (d)(3) would require that locks and tagsbe capable of withstanding the environment to which they are exposed; bestandardized in color, shape, size, format, or any combination of theseelements; and include provisions for the identification of the employeesauthorizing the application of devices or applying them. Locks would berequired to be of such key code complexity that removal by any means otherthan the regular key would require excessive force or unusual techniques.Tags and their attachment mechanisms would be required to be of such designthat the possibility of accidental removal is minimized. Specific requirementsfor information to be placed on tags are contained in andSection; 1910.145,OSHA's general tag requirements. Paragraph (d)(4) lists requirements for energy isolating devices. Paragraph(d)(4)(i) would require each device to be labeled or marked to indicateits purpose, unless it is located and arranged so its purpose is evident,and paragraph (d)(4)(ii) would require that the devices be operated onlyby authorized persons or under their direct supervision. Paragraph (d)(5) lists requirements regarding notification to affectedemployees of the application and removal of lockout/tagout controls whenthe controls directly affect the employees' work activities. Paragraphs(d)(5) (i), (ii), and (iii), respectively, would require that notificationbe made by the employer or an authorized employee, before the applicationof lockout/tagout controls, and before the removal of lockout/tagout controls.Paragraph (d)(6) lists requirements for lockout/tagout application. Paragraphs(d)(6) (i), (ii), and (iii), respectively, would require that the pertinentoperating controls be turned off or to neutral position by designated employees,that the energy isolating devices be operated so as to isolate the equipmentor process from energy sources, and that a lock or tag or both be appliedto each energy isolating device by an authorized employee. Paragraph (d)(6)(iv) would require that locks be attached in such a manneras to hold the energy isolating devices in a safe position or that tagsbe attached in such a manner as to inhibit operation of the energy isolatingdevices. Tags would be required to be attached to the energy isolatingdevice unless the installation precludes such attachment, in which casethe tags would be required to be located so as to be immediately obviousto anyone attempting to operate the energy isolating devices. Paragraph (d)(6)(v) would require that, following the application of locksor tags or both to energy isolating devices, all potentially hazardousstored or residual energy be detected and be relieved, disconnected, orrestrained so as to be rendered safe.Paragraph (d)(6)(vi) would require, if there is a possibility of reaccumulationof stored energy to a hazardous level, that verification of isolation becontinued until the work is completed or until there is no longer a possibilityof such accumulation. Paragraph (d)(6)(vii) would require that an authorized employee take stepsto verify that isolation and deenergizing of locked out or tagged out equipmentor processes has been accomplished before work is started on the equipmentor processes. If direct contact is to be made with a normally energizedpart during the work, a test would be required to be performed to ensurethat the parts are deenergized. Paragraph (d)(6)(viii) would require the verification action to ensurethat affixing locks or tags or both to the energy isolating devices haspositioned or located the devices so that the equipment or process hasbeen isolated and deenergized effectively and so that any stored energyhas been rendered safe. The steps of the procedure proposed under paragraphs (d)(6) (vii) and (viii)may involve a deliberate attempt to start up equipment which should notbe capable of activation because of the application of control procedures.These provisions are intended to assure the employee that energy from themain power source has been effectively isolated and blocked and that injurycould not result from inadvertent activation of the operating controls.Another means of testing the equipment or process is by the use of appropriatetest instrumentation. This method would be appropriate for use in casesinvolving electric circuits and equipment, for example, where verificationof isolation could be accomplished by determining the relative energy levelreadings involved by using a voltmeter. Similar test equipment could beapplied to other energy types and sources. OSHA also considers the use of inspection procedures to be of criticalimportance throughout the lockout/tagout control process. Visual inspectioncan confirm that switches, valves, and breakers have been properly movedto and secured in the ``off'' or ``safe'' position. Observing the positionof the main electric power disconnect switch can, for example, confirmthat the switch is either in the ``off'' (open) or ``on'' (closed) position.Visual inspection can also verify whether or not locks and other protectivedevices have been applied to the control points in a manner that wouldimpede the unsafe movement of the switches or valves. Finally, an inspectioncan be used to verify that isolation has taken place by a determinationthat all motion has stopped and that all coasting parts such as flywheels,grinding wheels, and saw blades have come to rest. Paragraph (d)(7) lists the requirements for release from lockout/tagout.Paragraphs (d)(7) (i) and (ii), respectively, would require that an authorizedemployee first make a visual inspection of the work area to determine thatall nonessential items have been removed, that all components are operationallyintact, and that no inadvertent equipment start-up will result; and thenverify that employees are in the clear, before energy is restored to theequipment or process. It cannot be overemphasized that employees performing tasks on deenergizedequipment may be exposed to hazards involving serious injury or death ifthe status of lockout/tagout control conditions can be changed withouttheir knowledge. For this reason, OSHA is proposing in paragraph (d)(7)(iii)that, as a general rule, locks and tags be removed by the employees whoapplied them. An exception is provided for two types of situations in whichthe device may be removed under the direction of an authorized employeeusing specific procedures. Paragraph (d)(7)(iii)(A), as proposed, permitsthe use of the exception when the employee who applied the lock or tagis not available to remove it. This provision is intended to cover situationssuch as those that might arise from the sudden sickness or injury of anemployee or other emergency conditions. Proposed paragraph (d)(7)(iii)(B)would permit use of the exception for unique operating activities involvingcomplex systems, if the employer could demonstrate that it is not feasibleto have the device removed by the employee who applied it. Paragraph (d)(8) lists requirements for special lockout/tagout situations.Paragraph (d)(8)(i) would require that if there is a need for testing orpositioning of the equipment or process after the energy isolating devicesare locked or tagged, the following actions be taken in sequence: Clearthe equipment or process of tools and materials; clear the employees fromthe equipment or process area; clear the controls of locks and tags accordingto the established procedure; energize and proceed with the testing orpositioning; deenergize all systems; and reapply energy control measuresto continue the work. Paragraph (d)(8)(ii) would require that, when group locks or tags are used,the procedures must afford affected employees protection equivalent tothat provided by personal locks or tags. Paragraph (d)(8)(iii) would require that specific procedures be implementedto provide for continuity of lockout/tagout protection during shift oremployee changes.  Paragraph (d)(8)((iv) would require the employer to ensure that contractorsand their employees follow the lockout/tagout procedures in place at thework site. If the contractor does not provide qualified persons who havebeen trained properly in the procedures in use, the employer would be requiredto provide a qualified employee to operate or direct the operation of theenergy isolating devices and installation of the locks and tags. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph </ITAG>(e)  Paragraph (e) proposes requirements for entry into and work in enclosedspaces. An ``enclosed space'' is defined to be a space that has a limitedmeans of entry or egress, that is designed for periodic entry by employeesunder normal operating conditions, and that is not expected to containa hazardous atmosphere, but may contain one under unusual conditions. Inthis paragraph, OSHA intends to cover only the types of enclosed spacesthat are routinely entered by employees engaged in electric power generation,transmission, and distribution work and are unique to underground utilitywork. Such locations include manholes and vaults that provide employeesaccess to electric generation, transmission, and distribution equipment.This paragraph does not address other types of confined spaces, such asboilers, tanks and coal bunkers, that are common to other industries aswell. These locations will be addressed in OSHA's generic confined spacesstandard, which is currently being developed for general industry.  Electric utility companies have an estimated 14,350 employees engaged inunderground transmission and distribution work (where most of the workcovered by paragraph (e) occurs).\2\<NOTE/> Underground repair crews, in which these employees work,can typically expect to enter a manhole once or twice a day.\3\<NOTE/> The enclosed space entry procedure addressed by the proposalis a day-to-day part of the routine of these workers. This type of workis unique to underground utilities (such as electric, telephone, and gasutilities), and the hazards presented by these spaces are widely recognizedby these industries and their workers. Practices in use in these industriesinclude testing for the presence of flammable gases and vapors, testingfor oxygen deficiency, ventilation of the enclosed space, controls on theuse of open flames, and the use of an attendant outside the space. ExistingandSection; 1910.268(o) sets forth regulations addressing these areas inthe telecommunications industry, which exposes its employees to the samenon-electrical hazards as the electric utility industry. Consistent withthese industry-specific regulations, OSHA has decided to propose separaterequirements in this standard for employee entry into enclosed spaces thatare unique to the performance of electric power generation, transmission,and distribution work. However, other types of enclosed and confined spaces(such as boilers and tanks) are not addressed in this proposal, but willbe addressed in the forthcoming generic confined spaces standard.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ ERG, ``Preparation of an Economic Impact Study for theProposed OSHA Regulation Covering Electric Power Generation, Transmission,and Distribution,'' p. 8-8. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ <T3>Ibid, </T3>p. 8-21.   As the non-electrical hazards found in manholes, underground vaults, andsimilar enclosed spaces are the same in both telecommunications work andelectric power generation, transmission, and distribution work, requirementsrelating to these hazards should be similar. (In joint-use manholes, whereboth telecommunications and electric distribution equipment are present,telecommunications employees and electric utility employees have to workin the same manholes_though not necessarily at the same time.) Therefore,the provisions in proposed andSection; 1910.269(e) are based, in large part,on the requirements of existing andSection; 1910.268(o) relating to telecommunicationswork on underground installations. In carrying them over to this proposal,OSHA has modified and added to the existing telecommunications regulations.The Agency has also drawn from provisions in ANSI C2 and the EEI/IBEW draftthat relate to enclosed space hazards.  The introduction to paragraph (e) sets forth the scope of the enclosedspace provisions. As previously noted, enclosed spaces are defined as spacesthat have limited means of entry or egress, that are designed for periodicentry by employees under normal operating conditions, and that are notexpected to contain hazardous atmospheres but may contain them under unusualconditions. These spaces include manholes and unvented vaults. (The ventilationin vented vaults prevents a hazardous atmosphere from accumulating, sovented vaults are not covered.) OSHA requests information on other typesof enclosed spaces that would or should be addressed by paragraph (e) ofthe standard.Paragraph (e)(1) proposes the general requirement that employers ensurethe use of safe work practices by their employees. (Training in these practiceswould be required by proposed andSection; 1910.269(a) (2).) The safe workpractices include procedures for complying with the specific regulationscontained in paragraphs (e)(2) through (e)(12).  Some conditions within an enclosed space, such as high temperature andhigh pressure, make it hazardous to remove any cover from the space. Forexample, if high pressure is present within the space, the cover couldbe blown off in the process of removing it. To protect employees from suchhazards, paragraph (e)(2) would require a determination of whether or notit is safe to remove the cover. This determination should take the formof a quick check of the conditions expected to be in the enclosed space.The cover should be checked to see if it is hot and, if it is fastenedin place, should be loosened gradually to release any residual pressure.An evaluation should also be made of whether conditions at the site couldcause a hazardous atmosphere to accumulate in the space. Any conditionsmaking it unsafe for employees to remove the cover would be required tobe eliminated (i.e., reduced to the extent that it is no longer unsafe). Paragraph (e)(3) would require that openings to enclosed spaces be guardedto protect employees from falling into the space and to protect employeesin the enclosed space from being injured by objects entering the space.The guard could be in the form of a railing, a temporary cover, or anyother temporary barrier that provides the required protection. This provisionwas taken from existing andSection; 1910.268(o)(1)(i), which sets forth theequivalent requirement for underground telecommunications work.  Paragraph (e)(4) proposes to prohibit employees from entering enclosedspaces that contain a hazardous atmosphere. Once the hazardous atmosphereis removed (e.g., by ventilating the enclosed space) or if protection isprovided (e.g., through the use of a respirator for a toxic atmosphere),employees would be allowed to enter.  Paragraph (e)(5) addresses the use of an attendant outside the enclosedspace to provide assistance in an emergency. An attendant would be requiredany time there is reason to believe that a hazard exists because of trafficpatterns near the opening or if a hazard exists within the space. For example,a manhole that is subject to uncontrolled flooding would require an attendant.The purpose of the attendant would be to provide assistance in an emergency;however, he or she would not be precluded from performing other dutiesoutside the enclosed space, as long as those duties do not interfere withthe person's function as an attendant. The provisions of paragraph (e)(5)are based on existing andSection; 1910.268(o)(1)(ii). (See also proposedparagraph (t)(3) for requirements addressing the need for attendants outsideunderground installations containing energized electric equipment.)  Paragraph (e)(6) would require test instruments used to monitor atmospheresin enclosed spaces to be kept in calibration. This would ensure that testmeasurements are accurate so that hazardous conditions will not be overlooked.OSHA requests public comment on whether a specific level of accuracy (e.g.,plus or minus 10 percent) should be required in this provision.  Because of the lack of adequate ventilation, enclosed spaces can accumulatehazardous concentrations of flammable gases and vapors, or an oxygen deficientatmosphere could develop. It is important to keep concentrations of oxygenand flammable gases and vapors at safe levels; otherwise, an explosioncould occur while the employees are in the space, or an oxygen deficiencycould lead to the suffocation of an employee. Toward these ends, paragraphs(e)(7), (e)(8), (e)(9), (e)(10), and (e)(11) address the testing of theatmosphere in the space and ventilation of the space.  Paragraph (e)(7) would require the internal atmosphere of the enclosedspace to be tested for flammable gases and vapors. The results of the testwould have to indicate that the atmosphere is safe before employees couldenter. So that the results are accurate and relevant to the atmospherein the space at the time of employee entry, testing would be required tobe performed with a direct reading meter or similar instrument. Test equipmentthat samples the atmosphere so that the samples can be forwarded to a laboratoryfor analysis would not meet the requirements proposed in paragraph (e)(7). Paragraph (e)(8) proposes an equivalent requirement for testing the concentrationof oxygen in the atmosphere in an enclosed space. However, continuous forcedair ventilation is permitted as an alternative to testing. Such ventilationwould ensure that there would be sufficient oxygen in the manhole. (Seealso proposed paragraph (e)(10) for requirements relating to the lengthof time ventilation must be provided before employees are allowed to enterthe manhole.)If flammable gases or vapors are detected or if an oxygen deficiency isfound, paragraph (e)(9) would require the employer to provide forced airventilation to assure safe levels of oxygen and to prevent a hazardousconcentration of flammable gases or vapors (one which exceeds 10 percentof the lower explosive limit) from accumulating. As an alternative, theemployer could use a continuous monitoring program that ensures that nohazardous atmosphere develops and no increase in flammable gas or vaporconcentration occurs.The provisions of paragraphs (e)(7), (e)(8), and (e)(9) are based on therequirements contained in existing andSection; 1910.268(o)(2) and on ANSIC2-1987, Section 426B. Paragraph (e)(10) proposes specific requirements for the ventilation ofenclosed spaces. When forced air ventilation is used, it would be requiredto be maintained for a period of time long enough to purge the atmospherewithin the space of hazardous amounts of flammable gases and vapors andlong enough to supply an adequate concentration of oxygen. After the ventilationhas been maintained for this amount of time, employees can then safelyenter the space. OSHA requests public comment on whether the Agency shouldspecify what number of air changes of the atmosphere within the enclosedspace should be required before employees are allowed to enter. Paragraph (e)(10) would also require the air provided by the ventilatingequipment to be directed at the area within the enclosed space where employeesare at work. The forced air ventilation would be required to be maintainedthe entire time the employees are present within the space. These provisionsensure that a hazardous atmosphere does not reoccur where employees areworking. In order to ensure that the air supplied by the ventilating equipment willprovide a safe atmosphere, paragraph (e)(11) would require the air supplyto be from a clean source and would prohibit it from increasing the hazardsin the enclosed space. For example, positioning the air intake for theventilating equipment near the exhaust from a gasoline or diesel enginewould contaminate the atmosphere in the enclosed space. This practice wouldnot be allowed under the proposal. The use of open flames in enclosed spaces is safe only when flammable gasesor vapors are not present in hazardous quantities. For this reason, paragraph(e)(12) would require additional testing for flammable gases and vaporsif open flames are to be used in enclosed spaces. The tests must be performedimmediately before the open flame device is used and at least once perhour while the device is in use. OSHA requests comments on whether thefrequency of testing is appropriate or whether the frequency should beincreased or decreased. This requirement is based on existing andSection;1910.268(o)(5)(i). <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (f) </ITAG>Paragraph (f) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses trenching and excavatingoperations. This paragraph simply references the appropriate existing regulationsin the Construction Standards (Part 1926) pertaining to trenching and shoring,which are contained in 29 CFR Part 1926, Subpart P. Since trenching workand excavating work are typically considered construction operations andsince construction regulations dealing with the hazards involved alreadyexist, OSHA considered it appropriate to refer to the construction requirementsdirectly. This would ensure that the regulations are the same whether ornot the work is ``construction work'' as defined in andSection; 1910.12,as the hazards involved are common to all types of trenching and excavatingoperations. Employers covered by this proposal should already be familiarwith these requirements because they frequently perform the type of workcovered under Subpart V of Part 1926 (which contains a similar referencein andSection; 1926.956(c)(2)). OSHA has proposed, in a separate rulemaking project, to revise the regulationscontained in Subpart P of Part 1926. This proposal was published on April15, 1987 (52 FR 12288). Operations covered by proposed andSection; 1910.269would be required to follow whatever is promulgated as a final standardunder the Construction Standards rulemaking. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (g) </ITAG>Paragraph (g) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 proposes requirements forpersonal protective equipment (PPE), which includes eye and face protection,respiratory protection, head protection, foot protection, protective clothing,electrical protective equipment, and personal fall protection equipment.In accordance with proposed andSection; 1910.269(a) (1)(iii), proposed paragraph(g)(1) emphasizes that the requirements of Subpart I of Part 1910 apply.It should be realized that OSHA considers PPE which meets the requirementsof later editions of the American National Standards referenced in SubpartI to be in compliance with the current requirements of this subpart. Forexample, Subpart I of Part 1910 references American National Standard (Z89.1-1969)for Industrial Head Protection, although other later editions have beenpublished for head protection (i.e., ANSI Z89.2-1971 and Z89.1-1981). OSHAconsiders equipment meeting these newer standards to be acceptable. SubpartI of Part 1910 is scheduled for revision, and the updating of the PPE requirementswith the latest American National Standards will be accomplished at thattime. Paragraph (g)(2) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 proposes requirements forpersonal fall protection systems including fall arrest equipment (bodybelts and life lines) and work positioning equipment (body belts and safetystraps).In paragraphs (g)(2)(i) and (g)(2)(ii), OSHA is proposing that body belts,lifelines, and lanyards for fall arrest, and body belts and safety strapsfor work positioning, meet the requirements of andSection; 1926.104 and andSection;1926.959 of this chapter. Although these regulations are contained in theConstruction Standards, OSHA believes that they apply equally as well topersonal fall protection systems and to work positioning equipment usedin overhead electric line work. Additionally, body belts, lifelines, lanyards,and safety straps used in overhead line work are currently required tocomply with pertinent regulations of Part 1926, including andSection;andSection;1926.104 and 1926.959, during the construction of transmission and distributionlines and equipment. Since the same personal fall protection systems andwork positioning equipment are used during all phases of overhead electricline work (maintenance work and construction work alike), the proposal'sreference to existing construction standards is appropriate. OSHA has proposed, in a separate rulemaking project, Safety Standards forFall Protection in the Construction Industry (November 25, 1986, 51 FR42718), to revise and simplify most of the existing fall protection regulationsfor construction, which are currently scattered throughout 29 CFR Part1926, and to consolidate them in Subpart M of that Part. Requirements correspondingto andSection; 1926.104 were proposed to be placed in andSection; 1926.502(d).OSHA is also developing a general industry standard for fall protection.When this proposal is published, the Agency may wish to consolidate theexisting general industry requirements dealing with this subject. Paragraph (g)(2)(iii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require thatbody belts, safety straps, lanyards, lifelines, and body harnesses be inspectedbefore use each day to determine if the equipment is in safe working condition.This provision would also prohibit the use of defective equipment. Derivedfrom section 4.2 of American National Standard Requirements for SafetyBelts, Harnesses, Lanyards, Lifelines, and Drop Lines for Constructionand Industrial Use (ANSI A10.14-1975), this requirement helps ensure thatthe protective equipment in use will, in fact, be able to protect employeeswhen called upon to do so. Paragraph (g)(2)(iv) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require lifelinesto be protected against being cut or abraded since either of these conditionswill reduce the strength of the lifelines and could cause them to failduring use. In andSection; 1910.269(g)(2)(v), OSHA is proposing requirements coveringthe use of fall arrest, work positioning, and travel restricting equipment.Unless another type of fall protection is provided, one of these systemsmust be used by employees when they are working at heights more than 4feet (1.2 m) above the ground on poles, towers, trees, or structures orwhen they are working from vehicle-mounted elevating and rotating workplatforms. The provision further clarifies that the use of fall protectionequipment would not be required when a qualified employee (who meets therequirements of proposed andSection; 1910.269(h)(5)) is climbing or changinglocation on poles, towers, or similar structures which have steps or stepbolts. Such step bolts or ladders must meet the design requirements proposedin andSection; 1910.269, as well as the applicable requirements in SubpartO for fixed ladders. However, OSHA is proposing that fall protection equipment(safety straps) be used by employees climbing word poles not containingstep bolts except when climbing around obstructions, such as crossarms,pins, or braces. This paragraph is proposed to clarify when the use ofpersonal fall protection is required and when exceptions to its use arepermitted. The current OSHA telecommunications standard, in andSection; 1910.268(g)(1),requires the use of personal fall protection equipment when work is performedat heights more than 4 feet (1.2 m) above the ground. The existing standardsin Subpart D of Part 1910 also require fall protection (usually in theform of guard rails) for situations where employees are exposed to fallsof more than 4 feet (1.2 m), but EEI and IBEW have asserted that thereare problems with the use of personal fall protection equipment at heightsof less than 10 feet (3.1 m). For example, it was claimed that it is notalways possible, under some conditions, for the worker to tie off in amanner whereby he or she will not contact the ground (or a lower level)during the arrest of a fall. However, because the infeasibility of usingfall protection at the lower level was not proven, OSHA is proposing toretain the 4-foot (1.2 m) requirement, but is requesting comments on uniquesituations in personal fall protection for electric utilities. Paragraph (g)(2)(vi) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require that,when stopping or preventing a fall, fall arrest systems not produce anarresting force on an employee of more than ten times the employee's weightor 1800 pounds (8 kN), whichever is lower. Based on section 3.3.5 of ANSIA10.14-1975, and a National Bureau of Standards report, <T3>A Study of Personal Fall-Safety Equipment,</T3> (NBS IR 76-1146), aswell as other literature on fall arrest forces, this requirement is intendedto minimize injury to an employee in the event of a fall. (This requirement,as well as others in paragraph (g)(2) of proposed andSection; 1910.269, wascontained in Appendix D of OSHA's proposed rulemaking for powered platforms,andSection; 1910.66, published on January 22, 1985 (50 FR 2890).)Paragraph (g)(2)(vii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require that,when vertical lifelines or droplines are used, not more than one employeebe attached to any one lifeline. This limitation (based on section 3.2.6of ANSI A10.14-1975) recognizes that it is inherently unsafe to use a singlevertical lifeline to tie off two or more employees performing separatetasks. Movement by one employee could cause the lifeline to be pulled toone side. This could, in turn, cause the other employee to lose balance.Therefore, if one employee did fall, movement of the lifeline during thearrest of the fall would very likely cause other employees connected tothe lifeline to fall.In paragraphs (g)(2)(viii) and (g)(2)(ix), OSHA is proposing that snaphooksnot be connected to loops in webbing lanyards or to each other. This provisionwould prohibit two methods of attachment which are considered unsafe becausesnaphooks could accidentally disengage during use. These provisions arebased on sections 3.2.5 and 3.2.3.2 of ANSI A10.14-1975, respectively.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (h)</ITAG>Paragraph (h) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses ladders, platforms,stepbolts, and manhole steps. Paragraph (h)(1) emphasizes that the requirementsfor ladders in Subpart D of Part 1910 would continue to apply.Paragraph (h)(2) proposes requirements for special ladders and platformsused for electrical work. Because of the nature of overhead line work andthe limitations of structures available for ladder support, OSHA proposesthat andSection;andSection; 1910.25(d)(2)(i), 1910.25(d)(2)(iii), and 1910.26(c)(3)(iii),which deal with ladder support and placement, not apply to portable hookladders and other special ladders used on structures or on overhead lines.To provide employees with protection which approximates that afforded bythe ``exempted'' Subpart D provisions, proposed paragraphs (h)(2)(i) through(h)(2)(iv) would apply to these special types of ladders. These same paragraphswould also apply to platforms designed for and used in this type of work.The proposed requirements set forth the need to secure the special laddersand special platforms, specify the acceptable loads and proper strengthof this equipment, and provide that it be designed for the particular typesof application for which it is used. OSHA believes that the proposed alternativecriteria provide for the safe use of this special equipment; however, commentsare requested on whether the proposal provides adequate safety to employees.In andSection; 1910.269(h)(3), OSHA is proposing that portable metal andother portable conductive ladders not be used near exposed energized linesor equipment. This proposed paragraph addresses the hazard to employeesof contacting energized lines and equipment with conductive ladders. However,in specialized high-voltage work, the use of nonconductive ladders couldpresent a greater hazard to employees than the use of conductive ladders.The clearances between live parts operating at differing voltages and betweenthe live parts and grounded surfaces are large enough that the possibilityof accidentally contacting a live part with a conductive ladder is small.In such circumstances, using a conductive ladder can minimize the voltagedifferences between objects within an employee's reach, reducing the hazardto the employee. Therefore, the proposal would allow using a conductiveladder if the use of a nonconductive ladder would present a greater hazard.Paragraph (h)(4) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses step bolts andmanhole steps. The existing OSHA standards do not specifically addressstep bolts or manhole steps; rather, they address fixed ladders which arenot normally used in manholes or on poles. OSHA proposes that step boltsand manhole steps for general use meet paragraphs (h)(4)(i) through (h)(4)(xiv)and the requirements of andSection; 1910.27 for ladder safety devices. However,the step bolts or manhole steps would not need to be provided with laddersafety devices or equivalent fall protection, if only qualified employees(see discussion of proposed andSection; 1910.269(h)(5)) climb them. The requirementsof proposed paragraph (h)(4) address the design, installation, maintenance,and strength of step bolts and manhole steps. Current industry practices,existing andSection; 1910.268(h), and ASTM C478-82a formed the basis forthese requirements. Recognizing the potential hazards to employees associatedwith step bolts and manhole steps used in wet, damp, or corrosive atmospheres,OSHA solicits public comment on the following: (1) The need for separatedesign and installation criteria for these devices under such unique conditions;(2) the problems associated with using the existing ladder standards orthe requirements proposed in andSection;1910.269(h)(4) to regulate thesedevices; (3) injury or fatality data related to employee falls from thesedevices due to inadequate design or installation; and (4) whether or notexisting step bolts and manhole steps and their related standards wouldcomply with OSHA's proposed regulations.Paragraph (h)(5) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 sets forth the requirementsfor qualified employees. OSHA proposes that ladders or step bolts on triangulation,telecommunication, electrical power, and similar towers, and ladders onpoles and other structures (including stacks and chimneys) be exempt fromthe requirements in Subpart D of this part for ladder safety devices andcages if only qualified employees use these ladders. The requirements thataddress cages and ladder safety devices are presently contained in andSection;1910.27(d)(1) and (d)(5) of the General Industry Standards. OSHA is developinga proposed revision of all of Subpart D of Part 1910. Because this revisionwill likely result in a renumbering of the relevant sections and paragraphs,OSHA is proposing in andSection; 1910.269 to reference Subpart D generallyrathe than reference the specific regulations in question.To be recognized as qualified under paragraph (h)(5) of proposed andSection;1910.269, an employee would be required to have successfully completeda hands-on training program in the safe climbing of this type of equipmentand would be required to have climbing as one of his or her routine jobduties. OSHA recognizes that these ladders, as well as most step boltsand manhole steps, are used only a few times a year (or even less frequently)and then normally by trained employees who climb such devices on a routinebasis. If OSHA were to require compliance with the existing fixed ladderstandard in Subpart D, it would impose significant costs on employers forthe installation, maintenance, and inspection of fall protection systemsthat would seldom be used. The exposure of employees installing and maintainingthis equipment would likely exceed the exposure of the employees climbingthe ladders without personal fall protection. As an alternative, OSHA believesit appropriate to allow qualified employees to climb these ladders, stepbolts, or manhole steps without fall protection under certain conditions,as set forth in proposed paragraph (h)(5). First, the employer would haveto require the employee to complete a training program in the safe climbingof ladders, step bolts, or manhole steps; and, second, the exemption wouldapply only to employees who climb on a routine basis. Additionally, suchan employee would not be permitted to carry objects in his or her handswhile climbing. Once the employee reaches a work station, the employerwould be required to provide appropriate fall protection equipment, andthe employee would be required to use such protection. OSHA requests commentson this aspect of the proposal and invites commenters to submit suggestedalternatives or additional safeguards which may be necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (i) </ITAG>Proposed andSection;1910.269(i) addresses hand and portable power tools.Also, portable and vehicle-mounted generators supplying cord-and plug-connectedequipment would be covered by proposed andSection;1910.269(i). Electric tools connected by cord and plug would be required to meet proposedparagraph (i)(2). If the equipment is supplied by the wiring of a buildingor other premises, existing Subpart S of Part 1910 would continue to applyas it does currently. If premises wiring is not involved (in which caseSubpart S does not currently apply), proposed paragraph (i)(2)(ii) wouldrequire that the tool frame be grounded or that the tool be double insulatedor that the tool be supplied by an isolating transformer with ungroundedsecondary. Any of these three methods can protect employees from electricshock, which could directly injure the employee or which could cause aninvoluntary reaction leading to a secondary injury. In the preproposal stage of this document, OSHA received several commentssuggesting that ground-fault circuit interrupter (GFCI) protection be allowedas an additional option. However, although a GFCI can prevent electrocution,the device cannot by itself prevent an initial electric shock to an employeebefore it interrupts the circuit. This initial shock could lead to injuryfrom involuntary reaction. Therefore, OSHA has not proposed allowing theuse of a GFCI alone to protect employees using cord- and plug-connectedequipment. Paragraph (i)(3) of proposed andSection;1910.269 would essentially extendthe requirements of existing andSection;1926.404(f)(3) to electric transmissionand distribution field operations. The proposal would basically requirethat portable and vehicle-mounted generators provide a means for groundingcord- and plug-connected equipment and would allow the frame of the generatorto serve as the grounding electrode (reference ground). Proposed andSection;1910.269(i)(4) applies to pneumatic and hydraulic tools.Safe operating pressures would be required by paragraph (i)(4)(i). If a pneumatic or hydraulic tool is used where it may contact exposed energizedparts, the tool would be required to have a nonconductive hose (paragraph(i)(4)(ii)). A pneumatic tool would also have to have an accumulator tocollect moisture (paragraph (i)(4)(iii)). These two requirements wouldprotect employees from electric shock by restricting current flow throughhoses. Paragraphs (i)(4)(iv) and (i)(4)(v) propose work-practice requirementsto protect employees from the accidental release of pressure and from injectionof hydraulic oil into the body. The first of these two provisions wouldrequire the release of pressure before connections in the lines are broken,unless the quick-acting, self-closing connectors commonly found on toolsare used. The other would prohibit employees from attempting to use theirbodies in order to locate or stop a hydraulic leak. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (j) </ITAG>Paragraph (j) of proposed andSection;1910.269 contains requirements for live-linetools, some of which are commonly called ``hot sticks.'' This type of toolis used by qualified employees to handle energized conductors. The toolinsulates the employee from the energized line, allowing the employee tosafely perform the task at hand. For example, a wire tong, a slender insulatedpole with a clamp on one end, is used to hold a conductor at a distancewhile work is being performed. Common types of live-line tools includewire tongs, wire tong supports, tension links, and tie sticks. Paragraph (j)(1) proposes that live-line tools be designed and constructedto be able to withstand 100,000 V/ft if made of fiberglass, 75,000 V/ftis made of wood, or other equivalent tests. Since the proposed withstandvoltages are consistent with those in existing andSection; 1926.951(d) andwith ASTM F 711-81, <T3>Standard Specification for Fiberglass-Reinforced Plastic (FRP) Rodand Tube Used in Live-Line Tools,</T3> tools complying with standards currentlyin use in the industry would continue to be acceptable. Together with theclearance distances in proposed andSection; 1910.269(1), paragraph (j)(1)protects employees from electric shock during use of these tools.The performance criteria given in proposed paragraph (j)(1) are intendedto be ``design standards'' and are to be met at the time of manufacture.The test voltages and length of time that they are applied are not appropriatefor periodic retesting of the hot sticks because the live-line tools couldsustain damage during the test. OSHA requests information on whether retestingshould be required, what values of voltage and time should be used forretests, and what period of time should be allowed between retests.Paragraph (j)(2) proposes the daily visual inspection of live-line tools.If any contamination or defect that could lower the insulating value ofthe live-line tool exists, it could be discovered during this inspection,and the tool would have to be removed from service. This paragraph wouldprotect employees from the failure of live-line tools during use.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (k)</ITAG>Paragraph (k) proposes requirements for material handling and storage,with the general provision that Subpart N of Part 1910 would continue toapply except as modified in the paragraph.Paragraphs (k)(1) and (k)(2) address the handling and storage of materialsin the vicinity of energized lines and exposed parts of energized equipment.In general, as is the case through most of the General Industry Standards,material is not allowed to be taken or stored within 10 feet of the linesor exposed parts of equipment. This distance must be increased by 4 inchesfor every 10 kilovolts over 50 kilovolts. For materials storage, the clearancedistance must also be increased to account for the maximum sag and sideswing of any conductor and to account for the use of material handlingequipment. Maintaining these clearances protects unqualified employees,who are not trained in the recognition and avoidance of the hazards involved,from contacting the energized lines or equipment with materials being handled.In recognition of the need for certain employees to approach energizedparts more closely than 10 feet in order to perform their work, paragraphs(k)(1)(i), which addresses materials storage, and (k)(2), which addressesmaterials handling, regulate only the exposure of unqualified employeesto the hazards involved. The storage requirement proposed in paragraph(k)(1)(i) would not apply in areas which are restricted to qualified employees.Paragraph (k)(2) would not apply to qualified workers at all because clearancerequirements for qualified workers are contained in proposed andSection;1910.269(1), which covers work on or near energized parts.Paragraph (k)(1)(ii) proposes that material not be stored in the workingspace around energized lines or equipment. (See the discussion of paragraphs(u)(1) and (v)(3) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 for an explanation ofthe requirements for access and working space.) Storing materials in thisspace would tempt employees to work on energized equipment in cramped quartersif access were necessary in an emergency. Alternatively, if materials storedin the working space had to be moved so that adequate room could be provided,accidents could result from the movement of the material.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (l)</ITAG>Paragraph (l) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 covers the hazards of workingon or near exposed parts of energized lines or equipment. Paragraph (l)(1)proposes to prohibit unqualified employees from working on exposed liveparts of electric lines or equipment. Lacking any training in the constructionand operation of the lines and equipment and in the electrical hazardsinvolved, these workers would likely be electrocuted attempting to performthis type of work and would also expose others to injury as well. Similarly,in areas containing unguarded live parts energized at more than 50 volts,such untrained employees would not be familiar with the practices thatare necessary to avoid contact with these parts.However, employees in training, under the direct supervision of a qualifiedemployee, would be permitted to perform work on live parts and in areascontaining unguarded live parts. OSHA believes that the close supervisionof trainees will reveal errors ``in the act,'' before they cause accidents.Allowing these workers the experience of performing tasks under actualconditions may also better prepare the employees to work safely.Paragraph (l)(2) of proposed andSection; 1910.269, along with Tables R-6and R-7, sets forth the clearance requirements for work near exposed energizedparts. The language of this paragraph has been taken from existing andSection;1926.950(c)(1). Basically, the proposal would require employees to maintainthe clearances listed in the tables, unless the employee is insulated fromthe live part or the part is insulated from the employee or the employeeis insulated from all other conductive objects.The first exception to maintaining the listed clearance is that the employeebe insulated from the energized part. This insulation could take the formof rubber insulating gloves or rubber insulating gloves with sleeves. Thisequipment protects the employees from electric shock as he or she workson the line or equipment. Even though uninsulated parts of the employee'sbody may come closer to the live part than would otherwise be permittedby proposed Tables R-6 or R-7, the employee's hand would be insulated fromthe live part, and the working distances involved would be sufficient protectionagainst arc-over. (The proposed tables include a significant safety factorfor inadvertent movement, which is unnecessary for employees using rubberinsulating equipment.) OSHA does, however, request public comment on whetherrubber insulating sleeves should be required when gloves are used on linesor equipment energized at more than a given voltage.Of course, the insulation used would have to be designed for the voltage.(The proposed revision of andSection; 1910.137 gives use voltages for electricalprotective equipment.) As a clarification, paragraph (l)(2)(i) notes thatthe insulation is considered as protection only against parts upon whichwork is being performed; the required clearances would have to be maintainedfrom other exposed energized parts.Existing andSection; 1926.950(c)(1)(i), from which proposed andSection; 1910.269(l)(2)(i)was taken, also specifically permits the employee to be guarded from thelive parts. However, the introductory language in proposed paragraph (l)(2)requires clearances to be maintained from ``exposed'' energized parts.Guarded live parts would not be addressed by the rule. Similarly, redundanciesin paragraphs (c)(1)(ii) and (iii) of andSection; 1926.950 have not beencarried forward into paragraphs (l)(2)(ii) and (iii) of proposed andSection;1910.269.As a second opinion to maintaining the clearances, paragraph (l)(2)(ii)of proposed andSection; 1910.269 allows the energized part to be insulatedfrom the employee. Such insulation could be in the form of insulating blanketsor line hose or other suitable insulating equipment. Again, the insulationwould have to be adequate for the voltage. Paragraphs (l)(2)(i) and (ii) recognize the protection afforded to theemployee by an insulating barrier between the employee and the energizedpart. As long as the insulation is appropriate and is in good condition,current will not flow through the worker, and he or she is protected. The third option (proposed paragraph (l)(2)(iii)) to the maintenance ofclearance distances is to insulate the employee from conductive objectsother than the live part upon which work is to be performed. Much of thework performed under this option is called ``live-line bare-hand'' work.(For specific practices for this type of work, see the discussion of proposedandSection; 1910.269(q)(3).) In this type of work, the employee is in contactwith the energized line, like a bird on a wire, but is not contacting anotherconductive object at a different potential. Because there is no completecircuit, current cannot flow through the worker, and he or she is protected.The clearance distances in Table R-6 are for AC voltages up to 765 kilovolts,nominal. Taken in large part from existing Table V-1 in Part 1926, eachof these distances provide a sufficient gap between the worker and theline so that current cannot arc to the employee under the most adversetransient conditions, plus an extra amount for inadvertent movement onthe part of the employee. To make it clear that direct contact with liveparts is not permitted, OSHA is proposing to add to the distances givenin the existing standard an ``avoid contact'' entry under the lowest voltage.Additionally, to make the proposal more consistent with ANSI C2, OSHA isproposing to adopt a clearance distance of 2 feet for voltages between1.1 and 15 kilovolts. Table V-1 gives no clearance distances below 2100volts.Table R-7 applies to DC voltages between 250 and 750 kilovolts, nominal.These distances have been taken directly from Tabel 422-3 of ANSI C2-1984.Since systems of DC voltages other than those listed are rare, no distancesare presented for them in the table. If further information is suppliedduring the course of this rulemaking supporting clearances for other voltages,OSHA will consider adding them to the table.For the highest voltages, the two proposed tables contain notes permittingclearance distances smaller than those listed. The smaller clearance mustbe at least the length of the line insulator, and the smaller clearancemust be necessary to perform the work. In the existing Construction Standards,Subpart V uses a similar note. In contrast, ANSI C2-1984 has separate tablesfor AC voltages of 345 to 765 kilovolts, nominal, and for all DC voltagesof systems with a known transient overvoltage factor. (For further information,see ANSI C2-1984, Tables 422-2 and 422-4.) The ANSI C-2 tables use clearanceswhich increase with increasing surge factors and provide for greater clearances,in many cases, than the footnotes in OSHA's proposed tables. OSHA requestscomments on whether it would be more appropriate to use the ANSI clearancesfor the affected voltages and whether the ANSI tables provide better protectionfor employees than the OSHA proposal.Paragraph (1)(3) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require employeesto position themselves so that a shock or slip will not cause the worker'sbody to move towards exposed parts at a potential different from that ofthe employee. Since slips, and even electric shocks, are not entirely preventable,it is important for the employee to take a working position so that suchan event will not increase the severity of any incurred injury. This proposedrequirement does not come from existing Subpart V; it has been taken fromANSI C2-1984, Section 422F.Paragraph (1)(4) addresses the practices of connecting and disconnectinglines and equipment. Common industry practice, as reflected in ANSI C2-1984;Section 422G, is to make a connection so that the source is connected asthe last item in sequence and to break a connection so that the sourceis removed as the first item in sequence. In this way, conducting wiresand devices used to make and break the connection are deenergized duringalmost the entire procedure. Since these wires and devices must be handledduring the procedure, the proposed requirement would reduce the chancefor an electrical accident.Taken from ANSI C2-1984, Section 420I2, proposed andSection; 1910.269(1)(5)would prohibit the wearing of conductive articles by employees workingnear exposed live parts of equipment if these articles would increase thehazards associated with accidental contact with the live parts. This requirementis not intended to preclude workers from wearing metal rings or watch bandsif the work being performed already exposes them to electric shock hazards,and the wearing of metal would not increase the hazards. (For example,for work performed on an overhead line, the wearing of a ring does notincrease the likelihood that an employee would contact the line, nor wouldit increase the severity of the injury should contact occur.) However,this requirement would protect employees working on energized circuitswith small clearances and high current capacities (such as some battery-suppliedcircuits) from severe burn hazards to which they would not otherwise beexposed. The proposal would also protect workers who are only minimallyexposed to shock hazards from being injured as a result of a dangling chain'smaking contact with a energized part.In a matter related to the clothing worn by electric utility workers, ithas come to OSHA's attention that certain clothing fabrics are easily ignitedand can pose severe burn hazards. Since qualified employees are commonlyexposed to electric arcs, it has been suggested that clothing made of thesematerials be prohibited for exposed employees. Additionally, American Societyfor Testing and Materials Committee F-18 on Electrical Protective Equipmentfor Workers is exploring possible standards for application to clothing.However, since no standards currently exist, OSHA is requesting publiccomment on the desirability of adopting requirements in this area and onthe costs and benefits of any suggested provisions.To protect employees from contacting energized parts, paragraph (1)(6)of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require fuses for circuits over 300volts to be installed and removed using insulated tools or gloves. Additionally,employees installing expulsion-type fuses would be required to wear eyeprotection and would have to stand clear of the fuse's exhaust path. Thisrequirement has been taken from ANSI C2-1984, Section 4200.Paragraph (1)(7) explains that covered conductors are treated under theproposal as uninsulated. (See the definition of ``covered conductor'' inproposed andSection; 1910.269(x).) The covering on this type of wire protectsthe conductor from the weather but does not provide adequate insulatingvalue.Since ungrounded metal frames of equipment can become energized, paragraph(1)(8) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require the testing of thesemetal parts for voltage before they can be treated as deenergized.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph </ITAG>(m)Paragraph (m) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses the deenergizingof electric transmission and distribution lines and equipment for the protectionof employees. Because paragraph (m) would cover this area, the generalrequirements for hazardous energy control in paragraph (d) of proposedandSection; 1910.269 would not apply to the disconnection of transmissionand distribution lines and equipment from sources of electrical energy.In addition to setting forth the application of proposed andSection; 1910.269(m),paragraph (m)(1) explains that conductors and equipment that have not beendeenergized under the procedures of either paragraph (d) or (m) of proposedandSection; 1910.269 would have to be treated as energized. Therefore, thereare no gaps in the coverage of these two paragraphs.Proposed andSection; 1910.269(m)(2) outlines how the individual provisionsin paragraph (m)(3) would apply under various conditions. The entire paragraph(m)(3) would apply to situations in which the employee must depend on othersfor deenergizing the circuits or in which the employee must obtain authorizationto perform the task himself of herself. All of paragraph (m)(3) would alsoapply if a single employee, other than the system operator, is in completecontrol of the lines or equipment and of their means of disconnection.In this case, the employee in charge would be required to take the placeof the system operator, as necessary. (The system operator is a qualifiedperson, commonly located in a control room, who operates the system orits parts.)If an employee is working alone and if the means of disconnection are visibleto the employee, the only requirements of paragraph (m)(3) which wouldapply would be those directly pertaining to the deenergizing and reenergizingof lines and equipment. Unnecessary provisions for tagging and for communicationwith others would not apply.Under any of the preceding scenarios, disconnecting means that are accessibleto people not under the employer's control would be required to be renderedinoperable. For example, a switch handle mounted at the bottom of a utilitypole that is not on the employer's premises would have to be locked inthe open position while the overhead line was deenergized. This requirementwould prevent a member of the general public from closing the switch.Paragraph (m)(3) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 sets forth the exact procedurewhich would have to be followed in the order presented in the rule. Exceptas noted, the proposed rules are consistent with existing andSection; 1926.950(d)(1),although the language has been taken in large part from ANSI C2-1984, Section423. OSHA has attempted to simplify the language of the consensus standardand to write the requirements in performance-oriented terms whenever possible.Paragraph (m)(3)(i), the first requirement, proposes that the system operatorbe requested to deenergize a particular section of line or equipment. Inorder for control to be maintained over authority, a single designatedemployee would be assigned this task. This designated employee thus becomesthe employee in charge and is responsible for the clearance for work.The second step (paragraph (m)(3)(ii)) would be to open all switches throughwhich electrical energy could flow to the section of line or equipment.Also, the switches would be required to be tagged to indicate that employeesare at work. This paragraph would ensure that the lines are disconnectedfrom their sources of supply and would protect against the accidental reclosingof the switches.Paragraph (m)(3)(iii) would also require the tagging of automatically andremotely controlled switches. An automatically or remotely control switchwould also have to be rendered inoperable if the design of the switch allowsfor it to be made inoperable. This provision would also protect employeesfrom the accidental operation of switches. OSHA requests public commenton whether it is appropriate to require all new and replacement switchesthat are to be automatically or remotely controlled to be designed so thatthey could be rendered inoperable and on whether it is feasible for suchswitches to be so designed.Paragraph (m)(3)(iv) proposes that tags prohibit operation of the switchesto which they are attached. They would also be required to state that employeesare at work.After the previous four requirements have been met and after the employeein charge of the work has been given a clearance by the system operator,the employee in charge would be required, by paragraph (m)(3)(v), to testthe lines or equipment. This test would ensure that the lines had in factbeen deenergized and would prevent accidents resulting from someone's openingthe wrong disconnect. Existing andSection; 1926.950(d)(1)(iii) permits visualinspection in lieu of tests. However, because of the increasing amountof cogeneration (electric generation of power by customers of the utility),which can unknowingly supply lines with electricity, a visual determinationof the state of energization is not always accurate. OSHA believes it isimportant that lines and equipment on which work is to be performed alwaysbe tested for an energized condition, so that employees will not falselybelieve that the line or equipment is dead.Paragraph (m)(3)(vi) proposes the installation of the protective groundsrequired by proposed andSection; 1910.269(n) at this point in the sequenceof events. Since the lines or equipment have been deenergized and testedin accordance with the previous provisions, it is now safe to install aprotective ground.After the six previous rules have been followed, paragraph (m)(3)(vii)would permit the lines or equipment to be treated as deenergized.Paragraph (m)(3)(viii) proposes that each independent crew separately followthe steps outlined in andSection; 1910.269(m)(3) to ensure that a group ofworkers does not make faulty assumptions about what steps have been orwill be taken by another group to deenergize lines or equipment.In some cases, as when an employee in charge has to leave the job becauseof illness, it may be necessary to transfer a clearance. Under such conditions,paragraph (m)(3)(ix) would require the system operator and the employeesin the crew to be informed of the transfer. The new employee in chargewould then be responsible for the clearance. It is important that onlyone employee at a time be responsible for any clearance; otherwise, independentaction by any worker could endanger the entire crew.Once work is completed, the clearance will have to be released so thatthe lines or equipment can be reenergized. Paragraph (m)(3)(x) covers thisprocedure. To ensure that it is safe to release the clearance, the employeein charge must: (1) Notify workers in the crew of the release, (2) determinethat they are clear of the lines and equipment, (3) determine that groundshave been removed, and (4) notify the system operator that the clearanceis to be released.According to paragraph (m)(3)(xi), action may be taken to reenergize thelines or equipment only after grounds and tags have been removed, afterall clearances have been released, and after all employees are in the clear.This protects employees from the possibility that the line or equipmentcould be reenergized while employees are still at work.Paragraph (m)(3)(xii) proposes that the employee releasing the clearancebe the one who was responsible for requesting it. This rule would ensurethat any one clearance is always under the control of a single employee.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (n)</ITAG>Paragraph (n) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses protective grounding.As noted in paragraph (n)(1), the entire paragraph (n) would apply to thegrounding of deenergized transmission and distribution lines and equipmentfor the purpose of protecting employees. Sometimes, normally energizedlines and equipment which have been deenergized to permit employees towork become accidentally energized by contact with another energized circuitor by failure of the clearance system outlined in andSection; 1910.269(m).Grounding is used to protect employees from injury should such reenergizingoccur. Grounding also provides protection against static charges on a lineand induced voltages. (These static and induced voltages can be high enoughto endanger employees, either directly from electric shock or indirectlyfrom involuntary reaction.)Additionally, paragraph (n)(1) indicates that paragraph (n)(4) would applyboth to the grounding of transmission and distribution lines and equipmentand to the protective grounding of nonelectrical equipment such as aeriallift trucks. Under normal conditions, such equipment would not be connectedto a source of electric energy. However, to protect employees in case ofaccidental contact of the equipment with live parts, protective groundingwould be required elsewhere in the proposal (in andSection; 1910.269(q)(3)(x),for example); and, to ensure the adequacy of this grounding, the provisionsof paragraph (n)(4) would have to be followed.The general requirement proposed in paragraph (n)(2) states the conditionsunder which lines and equipment must be grounded. Basically, in order forlines or equipment to be treated as deenergized, they must be deenergizedunder paragraph (m) of proposed andSection;1910.269 and grounded. Groundingcould be omitted only if the installation of a ground is impracticableor if the conditions resulting from the installation of a ground wouldintroduce more serious hazards than work without grounds. Since it is expectedthat conditions warranting the absence of protective grounds would be rare,OSHA invites public comment on what conditions are appropriate for thisexception and on whether the standard should list the specific types ofconditions for which grounding would not be required.If grounds are not installed and the lines and equipment are to be treatedas deenergized, however, additional precautions would have to be observed.Obviously, the lines and equipment would still have to be deenergized bythe procedures of proposed andSection;1910.269(m). Also, there may be nopossibility of contact with another source of voltage, and the hazard ofinduced voltage may not be present. Since these precautions do not protectagainst the possible reenergizing of the lines or equipment, the lack ofgrounding would be permitted only in very limited circumstances, as mentionedin the previous paragraph.Paragraph (n)(3) of proposed andSection;1910.269 would require protectivegrounds to be installed at the work location. Under most fault conditions,this grounding location minimizes the voltage to which the worker wouldbe exposed. However, if it is not feasible to provide a ground where theemployee is working, grounds would be required on both sides of the worklocation. This type of situation could arise when an employee is workingfrom an aerial lift between two structures supporting a transmission ordistribution line. Providing a personal ground at the lift may not be feasible;and, in such an instance, grounding the line at each adjacent structurewould nearly always provide the worker with adequate protection.Paragraph (n)(4) proposes requirements which grounding equipment must meet.So that the protective grounding equipment does not fail, it would be requiredto have an ampacity high enough so that the fault current would be carriedfor the amount of time necessary to allow protective devices to interruptthe circuit. The impedance of the grounding equipment would be requiredto be low enough to ensure the quick operation of the protective devices.Although the grounding equipment alone cannot prevent the worker from receivinga perhaps lethal electric shock, these proposed rules would help ensurethe prompt clearing of the circuit supplying voltage to the point wherethe employee is working. The grounding equipment would limit the durationand reduce the severity of any electric shock, but would not itself preventshock from occurring. For this reason, the proposal does not recognizethe use of protective grounds as the sole method of protection againstelectric shock. Other methods of protection, such as insulation or proceduresfor the deenergization of lines and equipment, are used in conjunctionwith protective grounding to protect employees adequately.Paragraph (n)(5) of proposed andSection;1910.269 would require lines andequipment that are to be grounded to be tested for voltage. If a previouslyinstalled ground is evident, no test need be conducted. These proposedrequirements prevent energized equipment from being grounded, which couldresult in injury to the employee installing the ground.Paragraphs (n)(6) and (n)(7) set forth the proposed procedure for installingand removing grounds. To protect employees in the event that the ``deenergized''equipment to be grounded is or becomes energized, the proposal would requirethe ``equipment end'' of the grounding device to be applied last and removedfirst and that insulating equipment be used for both procedures in orderto protect workers.With certain underground cable installations, a fault at one location alongthe cable can create a substantial potential difference between the earthat that location and the earth at other locations. Under normal conditions,this is not a hazard. However, if an employee is in contact with a remoteground (by being in contact with a conductor that is grounded at a remotestation), he or she can be exposed to the difference in potential (becausehe or she is also in contact with the local ground). To protect employeesin such situations, proposed paragraph (n)(8) would prohibit groundingcables at remote locations if a hazardous potential transfer could occurunder fault conditions.Proposed paragraph (n)(9) would permit the removal of grounds for testpurposes. To protect workers, though, the previously grounded lines andequipment would have to be treated as energized while they remain ungrounded.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (o)</ITAG>Paragraph (o) of proposed andSection;1910.269 would set forth safety practicerequirements covering electrical hazards arising out of the special testingof lines and equipment (namely, in-service and out-of-service, as wellas new lines and equipment) to determine maintenance needs and fitnessfor service. Generally, the need to conduct tests on new and idle linesand equipment as part of normal checkout procedures, in addition to maintenanceevaluation, is specified in the National Electrical Safety Code (ANSI C2-1984).Basically, as stated in paragraph (o)(1), the proposed rules would applyonly to testing involving interim measurements utilizing high voltage,high power, or combinations of both, as opposed to testing involving continuousmeasurements as in routine metering, relaying and normal line work.For the purposes of the proposed requirements, high-voltage testing isassumed to involve voltage sources having sufficient energy to cause injuryand with magnitudes generally in excess of 1000 volts, nominal. High-powertesting involves sources where fault currents, load currents, magnetizingcurrents, or line dropping currents are used for testing, either at therated voltage of the equipment under test or at lower voltages. Paragraph(o) would cover such testing in laboratories, in shops and substationsunder the exclusive control of the electric utility, and in the field andon lines at sites also as part of the utility operation.Examples of typical special tests in which either high-voltage sourcesor high-power sources are used as part of an electric utility's operationand maintenance activity include cable-fault locating, large capacitiveload tests, high current fault-closure tests, insulation resistance andleakage tests, direct-current proof tests, and other tests requiring directconnection to power lines.Excluded from the scope statement of proposed paragraph (o)(1) are routineinspection and maintenance measurements made by qualified employees inaccordance with established work practice rules where the hazards usuallyassociated with the use of intrinsic high-voltage or high-power sourcesrequire only those normal precautions peculiar to such periodic work. Twotypical examples of such excluded test work procedures would be ``phasing-out''testing and testing for a ``no voltage'' condition.Paragraph (o)(2)(i) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 explains that employerswould be required to establish additional work practices governing employeesengaged in certain testing activities. These work practices are intendedto delineate precautions that employees must observe to be protected fromthe hazards of high-voltage or high-power testing. For example, if high-voltagesources are used in the testing, employees would be required to followestablished safety practices to protect against such typical hazards asinadvertent arcing or voltage overstress destruction, as well as accidentalcontact with objects which have become residually charged by induced voltagefrom electric field exposure. If power sources are used in the testing,employees would be required to follow established safety practices to protectagainst such typical hazards as ground voltage rise as well as exposureto excessive electromagnetically-caused physical forces associated withthe passage of heavy current.These practices would apply to work performed at both permanent and temporarytest areas, i.e., areas permanently located in the controlled environmentof a laboratory or shop and in areas temporarily located in the non-controlledfield environment. As a minimum, the safety work practices would be requiredto cover the following types of test associated activities:(1) Guarding the test area to prevent inadvertent contact with energizedparts,(2) Safe grounding practices to be observed, (3) Precautions to be taken in the use of control and measuring circuits,and(4) Periodic checks of field test areas.Paragraph (o)(2)(ii) complements the general requirement regarding theuse of safe work practices in test areas by proposing that all employeesinvolved in this type of work be trained in these safety test practices,and further proposing that a periodic review of these practices by theemployees be conducted from time to time as a means of providing reemphasisand updating.Although specific work practices used in test areas are generally uniqueto the particular test being conducted, three basic elements affectingsafety are commonly found to some degree at all test sites: guarding, grounding,and the safe utilization of control and measuring circuits. By consideringsafe work practices in these three categories, OSHA has attempted to achievea performance-oriented standard applicable to utility work involving testingand test facilities.OSHA believes that guarding can best be achieved when it is provided botharound and within test areas. By controlling access to all parts, whichare likely to become energized by either direct or inductive coupling,accidental contact by employees will be averted. Paragraph (o)(3)(i) proposesthe guarding of permanent test areas by having them completely enclosedby walls or some other type of physical barrier. In the case of field testing,paragraph (o)(3)(ii) attempts to achieve a level of safety for temporarytest sites comparable to that achieved in laboratory test areas. For theseareas, a barricade of tapes and cones or observation by an attendant wouldbe acceptable methods of guarding.Since the effectiveness of the guarding means employed can be severelycompromised by failing to remove them when they are not required, frequentsafety checks must be made to monitor its use. For example, leaving barriersin place for a week at a time when testing is performed only an hour ortwo per day is likely to result in disregard for the barriers.Within test areas, whether temporary or permanent, additional safety canbe achieved by observing guarding practices that control access to testareas. Paragraph (o)(3)(iii) would therefore require that such guardingbe provided if the test equipment or apparatus under test is likely tobecome energized as part of the testing by either direct or inductive coupling.A combination of guards and barriers, preferably interlocked, is intendedto provide protection to all employees in the vicinity.Suitable grounding is another important work practice that can be employedfor the protection of personnel from the hazards of high-voltage or high-powertesting. If high currents are intentionally employed in the testing, anisolated ground-return conductor, adequate for the service, would be requiredso that no intentional passage of heavy current, with its attendant voltagerise, is permitted in the ground grid or in the earth. Another safety considerationinvolving grounding is that all conductive parts accessible to the testoperator during the time that the equipment is operating at high voltageshall be maintained at ground potential, except portions of the equipmentthat are isolated from the test operator by suitable guarding.Paragraph (o)(4)(i) would require that grounding practices be establishedand implemented for particular test facilities and that the basic groundingpractice be to treat as energized all ungrounded terminals of test equipmentor apparatus under test until reliably determined otherwise. Paragraph(o)(4)(ii) proposes that visible grounds be properly applied before workis performed on the circuit or item or apparatus under test. Paragraph(o)(4)(iii) addresses the hazards resulting from the use of inadequateground-returns in which a voltage rise in the ground grid or in the earthcan result whenever high currents are employed in the testing. Test personnelwho may be exposed to such potentials would be required to be protectedby establishing an essentially equipotential safe area by employing anisolated ground-return system. Another grounding situation is recognizedby paragraph (o)(4)(iv) in which grounding through the power cord of testequipment may be inadequate and actually increase the hazard to test operators.Normally, good practice requires the use of an equipment grounding conductorin the power cord to connect the equipment to a ground connection in thepower receptacle. However, in some circumstances, this practice can preventsatisfactory measurements, or current induced in the grounding conductorcan cause a hazard to personnel. If these conditions exist, the use ofthe equipment ground conductor is not mandatory and paragraph (o)(4)(iv)requires that an equivalent safety ground be provided. Paragraph (o)(4)(v)would further require that a ground be placed on the high-voltage terminaland any other exposed terminals when the test area is entered after deenergizing.Finally, in the case of high capacitance equipment or apparatus, beforea direct ground could be applied, the initial grounding discharge wouldbe required to be accomplished through a resistor having an adequate energyrating.Paragraph (o)(4)(vi) recognizes the hazards associated with field testingin which test trailers or vans are used. In these cases, considerationmust always be given to the possibility of voltage gradients developingin the earth during impulse, short-circuit, inrush, or oscillatory conditions.Such voltages may appear between the feet of an observer, or between hisor her body and a grounded object, and are usually referred to as ``step''and ``touch'' potentials. Thus, in addition to requiring the chassis ofsuch vehicles to be grounded, paragraph (o)(4)(iv) provides for a performance-orientedapproach by requiring that protection be provided against hazardous touchpotentials by bonding, by insulation, or by isolation. The protection providedby each of these methods is described in the following examples: (1) Protection by bonding can be effected by providing, around the vehicle,an area covered by a metallic mat or mesh of substantial cross-sectionand low impedance which is bonded to the vehicle at several points andis also bonded to an adequate number of driven ground rods or, where available,to an adequate number of accessible points on the station ground grid.All bonding conductors should be of sufficient electrical size to keepthe voltage developed during maximum anticipated current tests at a safevalue. The mat should be of a size which precludes simultaneous contactwith the vehicle and with the earth or with metallic structures not adequatelybonded to the mat. (2) Protection by insulation can be accomplished, for example, by providingaround the vehicle an area of dry wooden planks covered with rubber insulatingblankets. The physical extent of the insulated area should be sufficientto prevent simultaneous contact with the vehicle, or the ground lead ofthe vehicle, and with the earth or with metallic structures in the vicinity.(3) Protection by isolation can be implemented by providing effective meansto exclude personnel from any area where simultaneous contact can be madewith the vehicle (or conductive parts electrically connected to the vehicle)and with other conductive materials. A combination of barriers togetherwith effective, preferably interlocked, restraints to prevent the inadvertentexit from the vehicle during the testing may be employed.Finally, a third category of safe work practices applicable to employeesperforming testing work, which complements the first two safety work practicesof guarding and grounding, involves work practices associated with theinstallation of control and measurement circuits utilized at test facilities.Practices necessary for protection of personnel and equipment from thehazards of the high-voltage or high-power testing must be observed forevery test where special signal-gathering equipment is used, i.e., meters,oscilloscopes, and other special instruments. In addition, special settingsof protective relays and the re-examination of backup schemes may be necessaryto ensure an adequate level of safety during the tests or to minimize theeffects of the testing on other parts of the system under test. As a consequence,paragraphs (o)(5)(i) through (o)(5)(iii) address the principal safe workpractices involving control and measuring circuit utilization within thetest area. Generally control and measuring circuit wiring should remainwithin the test area. If this is not possible, however, paragraph (o)(5)(i)covers requirements to minimize hazards should it become necessary to havethe test wiring routed outside the test area. Paragraph (o)(5)(ii) coversthe avoidance of possible hazards arising from inadvertent contact withenergized accessible terminals or parts of meters and other test instruments.Work practices involving the proper routing and connection of the temporarywiring to protect against damage are covered in paragraph (o)(5)(iii).This paragraph would also require the safety work practice of keeping separate,to the maximum extent possible, the various functional wiring used forthe test set-up to minimize the coupling of hazardous voltages into thecontrol and measuring circuits. A final work practice requirement for employeesafety is covered in paragraph (o)(5)(iv) which would require, if employeesare present within the guarded test area during the test, a test observerwho can, in cases of emergency, immediately deenergize all control andmeasuring test circuits for safety purposes.Since the environment in which field tests are conducted differs in importantrespects from that of the laboratory tests, extra care must be taken toensure appropriate levels of safety. Permanent fences and gates for isolatingthe field test area are not usually provided, nor is there permanent conduitfor the instrumentation and control wiring. As a further hazard, theremay be other sources of high-voltage electric energy in the vicinity inaddition to the source of test voltage.It is not always possible in the field to prevent ingress of persons intoa test area physically, as is accomplished by the fences and interlockedgates of the laboratory environment. Consequently, readily recognizablemeans are required to actively discourage such ingress.Before test potential or current is applied to a test area, the test operatorin charge would be required to ensure that all necessary barriers are inplace.As a consequence of these safety considerations, proposed paragraph (o)(6)(i)calls for a safety check to be made at temporary or field test areas atthe beginning of each group of continuous tests. Paragraph (o)(6)(ii) wouldrequire that, as a minimum for the safety check, the person responsiblefor the testing verify, before the initiation of a continuous period oftesting, the status of a general group of safety conditions.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (p)</ITAG>Requirements for mechanical equipment are proposed in andSection; 1910.269(p).Paragraph (p)(1) proposes general requirements for mechanical equipmentused in the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power.Paragraph (p)(1)(i) would require that the critical safety components ofmechanical elevating and rotating equipment be inspected on each shiftduring which such equipment is used.Paragraph (p)(1)(ii) would require a reverse signal alarm or a designatedemployee to signal when it is safe to back up the vehicle for vehiclesoperated under certain conditions exposing an employee to hazards. Thisprovision is based on existing andSection;andSection; 1926.601(b)(4) and 1926.602(a)(9)(ii),which apply to construction. Because electric utilities use the same equipmentfor maintenance work and for construction and because the type of workbeing performed is similar in both situations, OSHA believes it is appropriateto make the requirements applying to this equipment the same whether maintenanceor construction work is being performed. As is the case in the constructionstandards, the proposed requirement would only apply to off-highway jobsites(not open to public traffic). The Department of Transportation has jurisdictionover the operation of vehicles on public roads. (It should be noted thatthe provision would apply to highway vehicles used at off-highway jobsites.)Paragraph (p)(1)(iii) would prohibit the operator of an electric line truckfrom leaving his or her position at the controls while a load is suspendedif doing so might endanger any employee, including the operator.Paragraph (p)(1)(iv) would require roll-over protective structures forcertain types of mechanical equipment. This equipment is frequently usedby electric utilities during construction work, and Subpart W of Part 1926requires it to have such protection. The proposal would extend the protectionafforded by the construction standards to operations that do not involveconstruction work. The roll-over protective structures would be requiredto conform to Subpart W of Part 1926.Paragraph (p)(2) proposes requirements for outriggers. Paragraph (p)(2)(i)would require that vehicular equipment which is provided with outriggersbe operated with the outriggers extended and firmly set. It would alsorequire that the outriggers not be extended or retracted outside the clearview of the operator unless all employees are outside the range of possibleequipment motion.Paragraph (p)(2)(ii) applies where the work area or terrain precludes theuse of outriggers and would limit the operation of the equipment only withinthe maximum load ratings as specified by the manufacturer for the particularconfiguration without outriggers.Paragraph (p)(3) would limit the applied load for lifting equipment toloads within its maximum load rating for the conditions under which itis actually being used.Even in electric-utility operations, contact with live parts through mechanicalequipment causes many fatalities each year. Typical industry practice andexisting rules in Subpart V of the Construction Standards require aeriallifts and truck-mounted booms to be kept away from exposed energized linesand equipment distances greater than or equal to those in proposed TableR-6. However, some contact with the energized parts does occur during thehundreds of thousands of operations carried out near overhead power lineseach year. If the equipment operator is distracted briefly or if the distancesinvolved or the speed of the equipment towards the line is misjudged, contactwith the lines is the expected result, especially when the clearance distancesare relatively small. (It should be noted that many accidents of this typeoccur in general industry even though a 10-foot clearance is required.Increasing the clearance distances would probably not reduce the numberof accidents.) Because these types of contacts cannot be totally avoided,OSHA believes that additional requirements are necessary for operatingmechanized devices near exposed energized lines. Paragraph (p)(4) of proposedandSection; 1910.269 addresses this problem.Paragraph (p)(4)(i) would require that the clearance distances in TableR-6 be maintained between the equipment and the live parts while equipmentis being operated near exposed energized lines or equipment. This is consistentwith current practices. If the clearance cannot be accurately determinedby the operator, an extra person would be required, by paragraph (p)(4)(ii),to observe the operation and give warnings when the specified clearancedistance is approached. In addition, if it is possible during operationfor the equipment to come closer to the live parts than this clearance,one of two alternative protective measures would also have to be takenunder proposed paragraph (p)(4)(iii). The first alternative is for themechanical equipment and any attached load to be treated as live parts.The second alternative is for the equipment to be insulated for the voltageinvolved. Under this alternative, the mechanical equipment would have tobe positioned so that uninsulated portions of the equipment could not comewithin the specified clearance distance of the line. The proposal wouldthus protect against contact with the energized parts and would protectemployees from electric shock in case contact was made.In the development of paragraph (p)(4), OSHA considered other methods ofprotecting employees from accidental contact with exposed energized lines.For example, OSHA considered allowing the mechanical equipment to be groundedas an additional option to the two alternatives proposed in paragraph (p)(4)(iii).However, grounding does not provide sufficient protection for employees,because if contact is made with a line of common distribution voltage,the equipment will still rise to a hazardous voltage with respect to earthonly a few feet from the grounding point. OSHA is requesting comments andsuggestions on the proposed rule and any additional methods of protectingemployees from contact with energized parts through mechanical equipment.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (q)</ITAG>Paragraph (q) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would apply to work involvingoverhead lines or equipment. The types of work performed on overhead linesand addressed by this paragraph include the installation and removal ofoverhead lines, live-line bare-hand work, and work on towers and structures.While performing this type of work, employees are exposed to the commonhazards of falls and electric shock.Paragraph (q)(1)(i) would require the employer to determine that elevatedstructures such as poles and towers are of adequate strength to withstandthe stresses which will be imposed by the work to be performed. For example,if the work involves removing and reinstalling an existing line on a utilitypole, the pole will be subjected to the weight of the employee (a verticalforce) and to the release and replacement of the force imposed by the overheadline (a vertical and possibly a horizontal force). The additional stressinvolved may cause the pole to break, particularly if the pole has rottedat its base. If the pole or structure could not withstand the loads tobe imposed, it would be required to be reinforced so that failure doesnot occur. This rule would protect employees from falling to the groundupon failure of the pole or other elevated structure.When poles are handled near overhead lines, it is necessary to protectthe pole from contact with the lines. Paragraph (q)(1)(ii) would requirethis and would also require employees handling the poles to be insulatedfrom the pole. These requirements protect the employees from hazards causedby falling power lines and by contact of the pole (which could be of wood,metal, or reinforced concrete) with the line. These requirements are inaddition to the requirements in paragraph (p)(4) for operations involvingmechanical equipment.To protect employees from falling into holes into which poles are to beplaced, paragraph (q)(1)(iii) proposes that the holes be guarded by barriersor attended by employees.The provisions contained in proposed andSection; 1910.269(q)(2) have beentaken, in large part, from existing andSection; 1926.955(c), on stringingand removing lines, and andSection; 1926.955(d), on stringing adjacent toenergized lines. However, the proposal has combined these provisions intoa single paragraph (q)(2).Paragraph (q)(2)(i) would require precautions to be taken to prevent theline being installed from contacting existing energized lines. Althoughspecific measures are not listed in the proposal, common practice includesthe use of the following techniques: stringing conductors by means of thetension stringing method (which keeps the conductors off the gound andclear of energized circuits) and the use of rope nets and guards (whichphysically prevent one line from contacting another). These precautions,or equivalent measures, are necessary to protect employees against electricshock and against the effects of equipment damage resulting from accidentalcontact of the line being installed with energized parts.Even though the precautions taken under paragraph (q)(2)(i) minimize thepossibility of accidental contact, there is still a significant risk thatthe line being installed could make contact with energized lines. Paragraph(q)(2)(i)(A) would require the line being installed, plus any connectedequipment, to be treated as energized if any of several listed accidentsituations could energize the line being installed. This would ensure that,in the event of contact with other energized lines, these workers wouldbe handling the equipment (which would now be energized as a result) onlythrough insulating devices. Paragraph (q)(2)(i)(B) would allow employeesworking aloft to be protected by grounding the line being installed. Unlikeemployees on the ground, those working on an elevated structure or in anaerial lift would not be exposed to a hazardous voltage gradient upon energizationof the conductor being strung as long as the conductor was grounded atthe work location.Paragraph (q)(2)(ii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require the disablingof the automatic-reclosing feature of the devices protecting any circuitof more than 600 volts which would be passed over by the conductors beinginstalled. If it were not made inoperative, this feature would cause thecircuit protective devices to reenergize the circuit after they had tripped,exposing the employees to additional or more severe injury.Paragraph (q)(2)(iii) proposes rules protecting workers from the hazardof voltage induced on lines being installed near (and usually parallelto) other energized lines. These rules, which provide supplemental provisionson grounding, would be in addition to those elsewhere in the proposal.In general, when there exists a hazard because of induced voltage on overheadlines, the lines being installed must be grounded to minimize the voltageand to protect employees handling the lines from electric shock.OSHA has not provided guidelines for determining whether or not a hazardexists due to induced voltage. The hazard depends not only on the voltageof the existing line, but also on the length of the line being installedand the distance between the existing line and the new one. OSHA requestscomments on what guidelines can be used to determine if an induced voltagepresents a hazard to employees.Paragraph (q)(2)(iv) proposes that reel handling equipment be in safe operatingcondition and be leveled and aligned. Proper alignment of the stringingmachines will help prevent failure of the equipment, conductors, and supportingstructures, which could result in injury to workers.Prevention of the failure of the line pulling equipment and accessoriesis also the purpose of proposed paragraphs (q)(2) (v), (vi), and (vii).These provisions respectively would require the operation to be performedwithin the load limits of the equipment, would require the repair or replacementof defective apparatus, and would prohibit the use of conductor grips notspecifically designed for use in pulling operations.When the tension stringing method is used, the pulling rig (which takesup the pulling rope and thereby pulls the conductors into place) is separatedfrom the reel stands and tensioner (which pay out the conductors and applytension to them) by one or more spans (the distance between the structuressupporting the conductors). In an emergency, the pulling equipment operatormay have to shut down the operation. Paragraph (q)(2)(viii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require communicationto be maintained between the reel tender and the pulling rig operator,so that in case of emergency at the conductor supply end, the pulling rigoperator can shut the equipment down before injury-causing damage occurs.This paragraph would also prohibit the operation of the pulling rig underunsafe conditions.Paragraph (q)(2)(ix) would prohibit employees from unnecessarily workingdirectly beneath overhead operations or on the cross arm to minimize exposureof employees to injury resulting from the failure of equipment, conductors,or supporting structures during pulling operations.Under certain conditions, work must be performed on transmission and distributionlines while they remain energized. Sometimes, this work is accomplishedusing rubber insulating equipment or live-line tools. However, this equipmenthas voltage and other limitations which make it impossible to insulatethe employee performing work on live lines under all conditions. In suchcases, usually on medium- and high-voltage transmission lines, the workis performed using the live-line bare-hand technique. If work is to beperformed ``bare handed,'' the employee works from an insulated aerialplatform and is electrically bonded to the energized line. Since thereis essentially no potential difference across the worker's body, he orshe is protected from electric shock. Proposed paragraph (q)(3) addressesthe live-line bare-hand technique.Paragraph (q)(3)(i) proposes that employees using or supervising the useof the live-line bare-hand method on energized lines be trained in theuse of the technique. Periodic retraining, as necessary, would also berequired. Without this training, employees would not be able to performthe highly specialized work safely.Before work can be started, the voltage of the lines on which work is tobe performed must be known. This voltage determines the clearance distancesand the types of equipment which can be used. If the voltage is higherthan expected, the clearances will be too small and the equipment may notbe safe for use. Therefore, paragraph (q)(3)(ii) would require that a determinationbe made of the voltage of the circuit, of the clearance distances involved,and of the voltage limitations of equipment to be used.Paragraph (q)(3)(iii) proposes that insulated tools and equipment be designed,tested, and intended for live-line bare-hand work and that they be keptclean and dry. This requirement is important to ensure that equipment doesnot fail under constant contact with high voltage sources.Paragraph (q)(3)(iv) would require the automatic-reclosing feature of circuitprotective devices to be made inoperative. In case of a fault at the worksite, it is important for the circuit to be deenergized as quickly as possibleand for it to remain deenergized once the protective devices have openedthe circuit. This would prevent any possible injuries from becoming moresevere.Sometimes the weather makes live-line bare-hand work unsafe. For example,lightning strikes on lines being worked can create severe transient voltages,against which the proposed clearance distances may not provide completeprotection. Additionally, the wind can reduce the clearance below acceptablevalues. To provide protection against environmental conditions which canincrease the hazards by an unacceptable degree, paragraph (q)(3)(v) wouldprohibit live-line bare-hand work in the midst of a thunderstorm or underany conditions which reduce the clearance distances below required values.If insulating guards are provided to prevent hazardous approach to otherenergized parts and to ground, then work may be performed under conditionsreducing the clearance distances.Paragraph (q)(3)(vi) would require the use of a conductive device, usuallyin the form of a conductive bucket liner, which creates an area of equipotentialin which the employee can safely work. The employee would be bonded tothis device by means of conductive shoes or leg clips or by another effectivemethod. Additionally, if necessary to protect employees further, electrostaticshielding would be required.To avoid receiving a shock caused by charging current, the employee mustbond the conductive bucket liner (or other conductive device) to the energizedconductor before he or she touches the conductor. Typically, a hot stickis used to bring a bonding jumper (already connected to the conductivebucket liner) into contact with the live line. This connection brings theequipotential area surounding the employee to the same voltage as thatof the line. Paragraph (q)(3)(vii) would require the bonding of the conductivedevice before any employee contacts the energized conductor and would requirethis connection to be maintained until work is completed.Paragraph (q)(3)(viii) would require aerial lifts used for live-line bare-handwork to be equipped with upper controls that are within reach of any employeein the bucket and with lower controls which permit override operation atbase of the boom. Upper controls are necessary so that employees in thebucket can exactly control the lift's direction and speed of approach tothe live line. Control by workers on the ground responding to directionsfrom those in the bucket could lead to contact by an employee in the liftwith the energized conductor before the bonding jumper is in place. Controlsare needed at ground level so that employees in the lift who might be disabledas a result of an accident or illness could be promptly lowered and assisted. For this reason, paragraph (q)(3)(ix) proposes that ground level controlsnot be operated except in case of emergency. OSHA requests comments onwhether there are operations involving live-line bare-hand work that requirethe use of the lower controls in lieu of the ones in the lift.  Paragraph (q)(3)(x) would require aerial lift controls to be checked toensure that they are in proper working order.  To protect employees on the ground from the electric shock that would bereceived upon touching the truck supporting the aerial lift, paragraph(q)(3)(xi) would require the truck to be grounded or treated as energized. Aerial lifts that are used in live-line bare-hand work are exposed to thefull line-to-ground voltage of the circuit for the duration of the job.To ensure that the insulating value of the lift being used is high enoughto protect employees, paragraph (q)(3)(xii) would require a boom-currenttest to be made before work is started each day. The test would also berequired when a higher voltage is encountered and when conditions changeto a degree that warrants retesting the equipment.  Under the proposal, the test would consist of placing the bucket in contactwith a source of voltage equal to that being encountered during the joband keeping it there for at least 3 minutes. To provide employees witha level of protection equivalent to that provided by American NationalStandard for Vehicle-Mounted Elevating and Rotating Aerial Devices (ANSIA92.2-1979), proposed andSection; 1910.269(q)(3)(xii) would permit a leakagecurrent of up to 1 microampere per kilovolt of nominal phase-to-<T3>ground</T3> voltage. In contrast, the corresponding provisions in SubpartV of Part 1926 (andSection; 1926.955(e)(11)) and in the draft submitted toOSHA by EEI and IBEW allow up to 1 microampere of current for every kilovoltof phase-to-<T3>phase</T3> voltage. (For a three-phase, Y-connected system, the phase-to-phasevoltage equals 1.73 times the phase-to-ground voltage.) Because of theinconsistency between the proposal and OSHA's existing standard, the Agencyrequests comments on the appropriateness of the leakage current level permittedby the proposal.  Paragraph (q)(3)(xii) would require the suspension of related work activityany time (not only during tests) a malfunction of the equipment is evident.This requirement is intended to prevent the failure of insulated aerialdevices during use.  Paragraphs (q)(3)(xiii), (q)(3)(xiv), and (q)(3)(xv) of proposed andSection;1910.269 would require the clearance distances specified in Table R-8 tobe maintained from grounded objects and from objects at a potential differentfrom that at which the bucket is energized. Under paragraph (q)(3)(xiii),the clearance distances in Table R-8 would not apply if the objects areprotected by insulating guards. The distances listed in this table arebasically the same as those in Table V-2 in Subpart V of the ConstructionStandards. It should be noted that the phase-to-ground clearances are thesame as those proposed in Table R-6. Both the phase-to-ground and phase-to-phaseclearances are based on equations which provide sufficient distance forarc-over protection plus a constant amount for inadvertent movement.  If work is being performed on the highest three voltages listed, the footnoteto Table V-2 allows the clearance distance for a phase-to-phase exposureto be reduced to the smallest distance between the phase to which the employeeis bonded and a grounded surface. However, this distance is engineeredinto the system based on a phase-to-ground voltage; a phase-to-phase voltageshould result in a clearance higher by a factor of 1.73, at least, to accountfor the higher voltage involved. Since the clearances permitted by thefootnote to Table V-2 are too small for phase-to-phase exposures, OSHAhas proposed to increase the minimum distances under the footnote for phase-to-phaseexposures by a factor of 1.73. OSHA invites comments on the appropriatenessof the proposed footnote and requests suggestions alternative approaches.(For additional discussion of the distances in the proposed tables andthe rationale for proposing them, see the explanation of proposed andSection;1910.269(1).)Paragraph (q)(3)(xvi) would prohibit the use of hand lines between thebucket and boom and between the bucket and ground. Such use of lines couldset up a potential difference across the employee in the bucket. If a non-conductiveline is supported by the energized conductor, as permitted by the proposedparagraph, no potential difference is generated at the bucket. Unless therope is insulated for the voltage, employees on the ground must treat itas energized.For similar reasons, paragraph (q)(3)(xvii) would prohibit passing uninsulatedequipment or materials to an employee bonded to an energized part.Paragraph (q)(3)(xviii) would require a durable chart reflecting the clearancedistances prescribed by Table R-8 to be mounted so that it would be visibleto the operator of the boom. Of course, a table with clearances greaterthan those required would also be acceptable. Paragraph (q)(3)(xix) wouldrequire a non-conductive measuring device to be available to the employeein the lift. Compliance with these proposed provisions will assist theemployee in determining the clearances required by the standard.Paragraph (q)(4) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses the hazards associatedwith towers and other structures supporting overhead lines.To protect employees on the ground from the hazards of falling objects,paragraph (q)(4)(i) would prohibit workers from standing under a toweror other structure, unless their presence is necessary to assist employeesworking above.Paragraph (q)(4)(ii) relates to operations which involve lifting and positioningtower sections. The first proposed provision would require tag lines orother similar devices to be used to control tower sections being positioned.The use of tag lines protects employees from being struck by tower sectionsthat are in motion.Paragraph (q)(4)(iii) would require loadlines to remain in place untilthe load is secured so that it cannot topple and injure an employee.Some weather conditions can make work from towers and other overhead structuresmore hazardous than usual. For example, icy conditions may make slips andfalls much more likely, in fact even unavoidable. Under such conditions,work from towers and other structures would generally be prohibited byproposed andSection; 1910.269(q)(4)(iv). However, when emergency power restorationwork is involved, the additional risk may be necessary for public safety,and the proposal would allow such work to be performed even in bad weather.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (r) </ITAG>Paragraph (r) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses safety considerationsrelated to line-clearance tree trimming. As can be seen from the definitionin proposed andSection; 1910.269(x), line-clearance tree trimming is thetrimming of any tree or brush that is within 10 feet (305 cm) of an electricpower line. Since proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses hazards uniqueto electric utility operations, general tree trimming is not covered bythis proposed paragraph. For example, tree trimming contractors performingwork at a residence where there were no overhead power lines within 10feet of any trees would not be required to follow proposed andSection; 1910.269(r).The requirements for this paragraph have been taken, in large part, fromANSI Z133.1-1982, <T3>American National Standard Safety Requirements for Pruning, Trimming,Repairing, Maintaining, and Removing Trees, and for Cutting Brush.</T3>Paragraph (r)(1) covers the electrical hazards associated with line-clearancetree trimming. As proposed, this paragraph would not apply to qualifiedemployees. These employees are highly trained and are adequately protectedby other provisions in the proposal, including the requirements for personalprotective equipment in paragraph (g) and for working on or near exposedenergized parts in paragraph (1). Tree trimming workers, on the other hand,do not have such extensive training, and more stringent requirements dealingwith electrical hazards are necessary and appropriate. Proposed paragraph(r)(1) sets forth such requirements.In addressing these employees (who are not ``qualified employees''), theproposal separates them into two groups: Line-clearance tree trimmers andother tree workers. The standard would allow only ``line-clearance treetrimmers,'' as defined in paragraph (x), to perform tree trimming within10 feet of power lines. Line-clearance tree trimmers have training in thetechniques necessary to trim trees safely near overhead power lines. Thistraining instructs these employees in methods of trimming trees so thatthe cut limbs will not contact the power lines. However, training in theuse of electrical protective equipment is usually lacking. (For the purposesof paragraph (r), trainess working under the supervision of a qualifiedline-clearance tree trimmer are considered to be qualified line-clearancetree trimmers.) Other employees have received little or no instructionin the safe practices necessary for line-clearance tree trimming. The proposaltreats these two groups of employees separately, taking their differentdegrees of training into account.Paragraph (r)(1)(i) would require an inspection to be made of the treeon which work is to be performed to see if an electric conductor passeswithin 10 feet of the tree. This inspection will give an indication ofwhether an electrical hazard exists.Not all employees possess the requisite knowledge and skills to enablethem to work safely very close to energized electric power lines. Employeeswho are not line-clearance tree trimmers would be required by proposedparagraph (r)(1)(ii) to stay at least 10 feet (305 cm) from energized conductorsand equipment. This distance would increase by 4 inches (10 cm) for every10 kilovolts that the equipment is energized over 50 kilovolts. This rulewould protect the worker who is not familiar with the electrical hazardsinvolved from being electrocuted.Paragraph (r)(1)(iii) would require that employees working on trees within10 feet (305 cm) of exposed energized overhead conductors or equipmentbe line-clearance tree trimmers. This requirement would prevent employeeswho are not completely familiar with the hazards involved or the safetypractices to be followed from working where an electrical hazard exists.Paragraph (r)(l)(iv) lists the conditions under which a second qualifiedline-clearance tree trimmer would be required to be present. The listedconditions are: If the employee is to come closer than 10 feet (305 cm)to the energized part; if a branch or limb is closer to the live partsthan the distances listed in Tables R-6 and R-7; or if roping must be usedto remove branches or limbs from live parts. Under these conditions, aline-clearance tree trimmer is placed in a more hazardous environment thanis usual, and errors are more likely to lead to an electrical accident.The second employee would be able to assist an employee in trouble or wouldbe able to summon help readily. In general, line-clearance tree trimmers do not have the experience ortraining for work on overhead electric power lines. However, they do havethe training and skills necessary to be able to perform work safely nearthese lines. By using special techniques and equipment, these workers trimtrees that are close to the overhead lines without bringing their bodiesor other conductive objects within the danger zone. Therefore, paragraph(r)(l)(v) proposes the same clearance distances (listed in proposed TablesR-6 and R-7) for line-clearance work as those for regular line work, butthe proposal does not permit line-clearance tree trimmers to come closerthan the clearances in the tables even when using protective equipment.Employees could receive an electric shock through the branches of the treesthey are trimming if the branch, once it is cut or breaks free, contactsan energized conductor. To prevent electric shock to an employee if thisshould occur, paragraph (r)(l)(vi) would require branches that are closerto the lines than permitted under Table R-6 or R-7 to be removed by theuse of insulating equipment in accordance with the requirements of proposedandSection; 1910.269(j). Paragraph (r)(l)(vii) would prohibit ladders, platforms, and aerial devicesfrom coming closing to energized lines than the distances listed in TablesR-6 and R-7. This provision is intended to prevent electric shock to line-clearancetree trimmers, who are not familiar with the practices necessary to contactthe lines safely. Paragraph (r)(l)(viii) would prohibit line-clearance tree-trimming operationsduring storms and under emergency conditions. Line-clearance tree trimmersdo not have sufficient training to enable them to work safely under suchconditions. In andSection; 1910.269(r)(2), OSHA is proposing requirements for brush chippers.These proposed requirements would specify that chippers be equipped witha locking ignition system, that access panels be in place during operation,that the inlet feed hopper be of sufficient length to prevent workers fromcontacting the blades during operation, that trailer chippers be chockedor secured when not attached to a vehicle, and that employees wear propereye and face protection in the area of operation. (Because no specificexemption is given in proposed paragraph (r)(2), the existing general machineguarding requirements of andSection; 1910.212 would continue to apply tobrush chippers.) The proposed requirements are derived from Section 5.3of ANSI Z133.1-1982 and are intended to prevent injury to employees operatingor maintaining brush chippers. In andSection; 1910.269(r)(3), OSHA is proposing requirements for sprayersand associated equipment. These proposed provisions would require walkingand working surfaces to be slip-resistant. If the slippery conditions cannotbe removed, slip-resistant footwear or handrails meeting the requirementsof Subpart D of Part 1910 would be required to be used to prevent employeesfrom slipping. In addition, if the spraying operation takes place withthe vehicle in motion, the area from which the operator works must be providedwith guardrails to protect him or her from falling from the vehicle. Theseproposed requirements are based on the requirements of Section 5.4 of ANSIZ133.1-1982. Paragraph (r)(4) proposes requirements for stump cutters. These proposedrequirements would specify that cutters be equipped with enclosures orguards to protect employees from the blades and debris, and that employeeswear eye and face protection in the immediate area of stump grinding operations.These requirements are essentially the same as those contained in Section5.5 of ANSI Z133.1-1982. Paragraph (r)(5) proposes requirements intended to protect employees fromthe hazards presented by power saws. Proposed paragraph (r)(5) emphasizesthat the requirements of andSection; 1910.266(c)(5) apply (dealing with instructionsfor power saw operations). In addition, andSection; 1910.269(r)(5) proposesrequirements for starting saws, saw design relative to chain movement andidling speed, saw operation, refueling, cleaning, and other saw maintenance.These requirements are based on Section 6.2 of ANSI Z133.1-1982 and onrequirements contained in the draft standard recommended by EEI and IBEW.In andSection; 1910.269(r)(6), OSHA is proposing requirements for backpackpower units. To protect employees operating or maintaining this equipmentand other employees in the area, the proposed requirements specify thatno one other than the operator be within 10 feet (305 cm) of the cuttinghead of the brush saw, that the unit be equipped with a quick shutoff switch,and that power unit engines be stopped for all cleaning, refueling, adjustments,and repairs. These requirements are based on requirements contained inSection 6.3 of ANSI Z133.1-1982.Paragraph (r)(7) proposes requirements for climbing rope. To protect employeesfrom hazards posed by rope breakage, these requirements propose that ropeshave a specified minimum strength (taken from section 7.9 of the ANSI standard),that defective or damaged rope not be used, that rope contact with chemicalsbe avoided, that climbing rope not be spliced to effect repair, that ropeends be secured to prevent unraveling, and that ropes be stored properly.If there exists a possibility that the rope will be taken closer to exposedenergized lines than the clearances specified in Table R-6 or R-7, employeeson the ground or in contact with ground must treat the rope as energizedand may not contact it unless electrical protective equipment is used.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph </ITAG>(s)Proposed andSection; 1910.269(s) addresses communication facilities associatedwith electric power generation, transmission, and distribution systems.Typical communications installations include those for microwave signalingand power line carriers.Microwave signaling systems are addressed by proposed paragraph (s)(1).To protect employee's eyes from being injured by microwave radiation, paragraph(s)(1)(i) would prohibit employees from looking into an open waveguideor antenna which is connected to an energized source of microwave radiation.Existing andSection; 1910.97, which covers non-ionizing radiation, prescribesa warning sign with a special symbol indicating non-ionizing radiationhazards. Paragraph (s)(1)(ii) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would requireareas which contain radiation in excess of the radiation protection guideset forth in andSection; 1910.97 to be posted with the warning sign. Also,the proposal would require the lower half of that sign to be labeled asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Radiation in this area may exceed hazardous limitations and specialprecautions are required. Obtain specific instructoin before entering.</ITAG>The sign would warn employees about the hazards present in the area andwould inform them that special instructions would be necessary to enterthe area. In andSection; 1910.97, the radiation protection guide is advisory only.Proposed andSection; 1910.269(s)(1)(iii) would make the guide mandatory forelectric utilities by requiring the employer to institute measures thatprevent any employee's exposure from being greater than that set forthin the guide. These measures may be of an administrative nature (such aslimitations on the duration of exposure) or of an engineering nature (suchas a design of the system that limits the emitted radiation to that permittedby the guide) or may involve the use of personal protective equipment.Power line carrier systems use the power line itself to carry signals betweenequipment at different points on the line. Because of this, OSHA is proposing,in paragraph (s)(2), that work associated with power line carrier installationsbe performed according to the requirements for work on energized lines.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph </ITAG>(t)In many electric distribution systems, electrical equipment is installedin enclosures, such as manholes and vaults, set beneath the earth. ProposedandSection; 1910.269(t) addresses safety for these underground electricalinstallations. The requirements proposed in this paragraph are in additionto requirements contained elsewhere in the proposal because paragraph (t)only contains considerations unique to underground facilities. For example,paragraph (e), relating to confined spaces, would also apply to undergroundoperations involving entry into a confined space.Paragraph (t)(1) would require the use of ladders or other climbing devicesfor entrance into and exit from manholes and subsurface vaults that aremore than 4 feet (122 cm) deep. Because employees can easily be injuredin the course of jumping into subsurface enclosures or in climbing on thecables and hangers which have been installed in these enclosures, the proposalwould require the use of appropriate devices for employees entering andexiting manholes and vaults. The practice of climbing on equipment suchas cables and cable hangers would be specifically prohibited by paragraph(t)(1). OSHA requests public comment on the appropriateness of requiringladders or other climbing devices for subsurface enclosures more than 4feet (122 cm) deep, as opposed to requiring them for shallower enclosuresor for deeper enclosures.Paragraph (t)(2) would require equipment used to lower materials and toolsinto manholes or vaults to be capable of supporting the weight and wouldrequire this equipment to be checked for defects before use. Along withhead protection requirements contained in Subpart I, this provision wouldprotect employees against falling tools and material. To provide additionalprotection for employees in the manhole or vault, paragraph (t)(2) wouldrequire these employees to be in the clear when hot solder or other hotcompounds are lowered into the enclosure, because of the possibility ofburns in case of a spill. OSHA requests comments on whether the loweringof other materials poses hazards to employees that are not addressed inthe proposal.Paragraph (t)(3) proposes a requirement for attendants for manholes. Duringthe time work is being performed in a manhole which contains electric equipmentenergized at more than 250 volts, an employee would be required to be availablein the immediate vicinity (but not normally in the manhole) to render emergencyassistance as may be needed. However, the attendant would be allowed toenter the manhole, for brief periods, to provide other than emergency assistanceto those inside. Also, an employee working alone would be permitted toenter a manhold briefly for the purpose of inspection, housekeeping, takingreadings, or other similar work, if this work could be performed safely.OSHA requests comments on whether employees should ever be allowed to entermanholes alone and, if so, under what conditions and for what length oftime. Direct communications would be required to be maintained among allemployees involved in the job, including any attendants, the employeesin the manhole, and employees in separate manholes working on the samejob.    The provisions proposed in paragraph (t)(3) are necessary so that assistancecan be provided in emergencies to employees working in manholes, wherethe employees work unobserved and where undetected injury is likely tooccur. Taken from existing andSection; 1926.956(b)(1), these requirementshave been accepted as protecting employees within the manhole without exposingthe attendants outside to a greater risk. The existing and proposed standardapply to manholes containing equipment energized at any voltage. However,EEI and IBEW suggested that OSHA required attendants only if the voltageexceeds 250 volts. Although it might seem safe to allow employees to workalone in manholes containing equipment energized at 250 volts or less,employees could be seriously injured at these lower voltages under certainconditions. OSHA requests public comment on whether an attendant is necessaryfor entry into manholes or vaults containing electric equipment energizedat 250 volts or less.    To install cables into the underground ducts, or conduits, which will containthem, employees use a series of short jointed rods or a long flexible rodinserted into the ducts. The insertion of these rods into the ducts isknown as ``rodding.'' The rods are used to thread the cable-pulling ropethrough the conduit. After the rods have been withdrawn and the cable-pullingropes have been inserted, the cables can then be pulled through by mechanicalmeans.   Paragraph (t)(4) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 would require the ductrods to be inserted in the direction presenting the least hazard to employees.To make sure that the rod does not contact live parts in the far manholeor vault, the proposed rule would also require an employee to be stationedat the remote end of the rodding operation.    If any energized cables are to be moved during underground operations,paragraph (t)(5) would require them to be inspected for possible defectsthat could lead to a fault. (If a defect is found, the requirements ofparagraph (t)(7) would apply.) Then, the cables could be moved only underthe supervision of a qualified employee. These provisions would protectemployees against possibly defective cables, which could fault upon beingmoved, leading to serious injury. To prevent accidents resulting from working on the wrong cable, one thatmay be energized, paragraph (t)(6) would require the identification ofthe proper cable when multiple cables are present in a work area. The identificationmust be made by electrical means, unless the proper cable is obvious becauseof appearance or location. Since defective energized cables may fail with an enormous release of energy,precautions must be taken to minimize the possibility of such an occurrencewhile an employee is working in a manhole. Therefore, paragraph (t)(7)proposes to prohibit employees from working in a manhole which containsan energized cable with a defect that could lead to a fault. Typical abnormalitiesthat could expose employees to injury are listed as: oil or compound leakingfrom a cable or joint (splice), a broken cable sheath or joint sleeve,hot localized surface temperatures on a cable or joint, or a joint thatis swollen so much that its circumference exceeds 3.5 times the standardsleeve diameter. OSHA invites comments on whether there are additionaldefects which should be listed (though the performance language of therule includes any obvious major abnormality, regardless of whether it islisted). OSHA also invites data on whether any of the listed defects couldnot possibly lead to a fault in the cable system. Under some service load conditions, it may not be acceptable for the electricutility to deenergize the cable with the defect at the same time that anotherline is deenergized for maintenance work. In such cases, the proposal wouldallow the defective cable or splice to remain energized as long as theemployees in the manhole are protected against the possible effects ofa failure. For example, a ballistic blanket wrapped around a defectivesplice can protect against injury from the effects of a fault in the splice.Paragraph (t)(8) would require metallic sheath continuity to be maintainedwhile work is performed on underground cables. Bonding across an openingin a cable's sheath protects employees against shock from a differencein potential on either side of the opening. <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (u) </ITAG>Paragraph (u) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses work performed insubstations. As is the case elsewhere in the proposal, the provisions ofthis paragraph apply in addition to the requirements contained in otherportions of the proposal, such as paragraph (1) on clearances. Paragraph (u)(1) would require that enough space be provided around electricequipment to allow ready and safe access to and operation and maintenanceof the equipment. This rule would prevent employees from contacting exposedlive parts as a result of insufficient maneuvering room. A note has beenproposed to recognize, as constituting compliance, the provisions of ANSIC2-1987 for the design of workspace for electric equipment. OSHA realizesthat older installations may not meet the exact dimensions set forth inthe latest version of the national consensus standard. The Agency believesthat the language of proposed andSection; 1910.269(u)(1) is sufficientlyperformance oriented that older installations built to specifications inthe standards that were in effect at the time they were constructed wouldlikely meet the requirement for sufficient workspace. Proposed paragraph (u)(2) would require draw-out-type circuit breakersto be inserted and removed while the breaker is in the open position. Additionally,if the design of the control devices permits, the control circuit for thecircuit breaker would have to be rendered inoperative. (Some circuit breakerand control device designs do not incorporate a feature allowing the controldevice for the breaker to be rendered inoperative.) These provisions areintended to prevent arcing which could injure employees. Because voltages can be impressed or induced on large metal objects nearsubstation equipment, paragraph (u)(3)(i) would require conductive fencesaround substations to be grounded. Continuity across openings would alsobe required in order to eliminate voltage differences between adjacentparts of the fence.Paragraph (u)(3)(ii) proposes the locking of unattended substations. Althoughthis provision appears to be related to public safety, worker safety couldalso be affected by undeterred public access to stations. For example,an unauthorized person in a substation could accidentally energize circuitswhich have been deenergized for work to be performed.Paragraph (u)(4) addresses the guarding of energized parts. Rooms and spacescontaining electric supply conductors or equipment would be required tobe enclosed within fences, screens, partitions, or walls to prevent unqualifiedpersons from entering. The entrances to such rooms and spaces would berequired to be locked or attended, and warning signs would have to be posted.These provisions, which are proposed in paragraph (u)(4)(i), are intendedto prevent unqualified persons from gaining access to high voltage equipmentand from contacting exposed live parts. Paragraph (u)(4)(ii) would require live parts operating at more than 150volts to be guarded, by physical guards or by location, or insulated. Thisprovision would protect qualified employees from accidentally contactingenergized parts. Guidance for clearance distances appropriate for guardingby location can be found in ANSI C2. Installations meeting the ANSI provisionscomply with paragraph (u)(4)(ii). Paragraphs (u)(4) (i) and (ii) are basedon Sections 110A and 124A.1, respectively, of ANSI C2-1987. Paragraph (u)(4)(iii) would require the guarding of live parts within acompartment to be maintained during operation and maintenance functions.This guarding is intended to prevent accidental contact with energizedparts and to prevent objects from being dropped on energized parts. However,since access must be gained to energized equipment by qualified employees,an exception to this proposed requirement would allow the removal of guardsfor this purpose. In such cases, paragraph (u)(4)(iv) would protect otheremployees nearby by requiring the installation of protective barriers aroundthe work area. So that employees can receive pertinent information on conditions thataffect safety at the substation, paragraph (u)(5)(i) would require employeeswho do not regularly work at the station to report their presence, usuallyto the employee in charge. Typical conditions affecting safety in substationsinclude the location of energized equipment in the area and the limitsof any deenergized work area. Paragraph (u)(5)(ii) proposes that this specificinformation be communicated to employees during the job briefing requiredby proposed andSection;1910.269(c). <ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (v) </ITAG>Paragraph (v) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 contains requirements pertainingto electric power generating plants and to work practices used in theseplants. As is the case elsewhere in the proposal, the provisions of paragraph(v) would apply in addition to the other requirements of the standard.Paragraph (v)(1)(i) would require the employer to maintain interlocks andother safety devices (such as relief valves) in a safe and operable condition.This requirement would ensure that these devices perform their intendedfunction of protecting workers when called upon to do so. To ensure furtherthat these devices remain operable, paragraph (v)(1)(ii) would prohibitthem from being modified to defeat their function, except as necessaryfor the test, repair, or adjustment of the device. Sometimes the brushes on a generator or exciter must be replaced whilethe machine is in operation. This work is unusually hazardous, and extremecaution must be observed by employees performing the job. To protect theseworkers, paragraph (v)(2) proposes extra requirements for replacing brusheswhile the generator is in service. Since filed windings and exciters areoperated in an underground condition, there is no voltage with respectto ground on the brushes as long as there is no ground fault in the circuit.So that no voltage to ground is present while employees are changing thebrushes, paragraph (v)(2)(ii) would require the exciter-field circuit tobe checked to ensure that a ground condition does not exist. Additionally,any ground detection devices must be disconnected and tagged. Paragraph (v)(3) would require that enough space be provided around electricequipment to allow ready and safe access to, and operation and maintenanceof, the equipment. this rule would prevent employees from contacting exposedlive parts as a result of insufficient maneuvering room. A note has beenproposed to recognize, as constituting compliance, the provisions of ANSIC2-1987 for the design of workspace for electric equipment. OSHA realizesthat older installations may not meet the exact dimensions set forth inthe latest version of the national consensus standard. The Agency believesthat the language of proposed andSection; 1910.269(v)(3) is sufficientlyperformance oriented that older installations built to specifications inthe standards that were in effect at the time they were constructed wouldlikely meet the requirement for sufficient workspace. Paragraph (v)(4) addresses the guarding of energized parts. Rooms and spacescontaining electric supply conductors or equipment would be required tobe enclosed within fences, screens, partitions, or walls to prevent unqualifiedpersons from entering. The entrances to such rooms and spaces would berequired to be locked or attended, and warning signs would have to be posted.These provisions, which are proposed in paragraph (v)(4)(i), are intendedto prevent unqualified persons from gaining access to high voltage equipmentand from contacting exposed live parts. Paragraph (v)(4)(ii) would require live parts operating at more 150 voltsto be guarded, by physical guards or by location, or insulated. This provisionwould protect qualified employees from accidentally contacting energizedparts. Guidance for clearance distances appropriate for guarding by locationcan be found in ANSI C2. Installations meeting the ANSI provisions complywith paragraph (v)(4)(ii). Paragraphs (v)(4) (i) and (ii) are based onSections 110A and 124A.1, respectively, of ANSI C2-1987. Paragraph (v)(4)(iii) would require the guarding of live parts within acompartment to be maintained during operation and maintenance functions.This guarding is intended to prevent accidental contact with energizedparts and to prevent objects from being dropped on energized parts. However,since access must be gained to energized equipment by qualified employees,an exception to this proposed requirement would allow the removal of guardsfor this purpose. In such cases, paragraph (v)(4)(iv) would protect otheremployees nearby by requiring the installation of protective barriers aroundthe work area. Paragraph (v)(5) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 addresses the breakingof pressure connections. If hazardous pressures or temperatures may bepresent on a line, paragraph (v)(5)(i) would require that the line be isolated,drained, and locked out or tagged in accordance with proposed andSection;1910.269(d) before a valve bonnet or suffing box gland is moved or removedand before a flanged joint or other pressure connection is broken. Paragraph (v)(5)(ii) would require that the bolts, nuts, or other fastenersthen be loosened. However, before they are removed, special care must beexercised to ensure that the connection is not under pressure. For example,once the fasteners are loosened, the cover should carefully be tapped looseto allow any residual pressure to be relieved.Boilers are an essential part of steam-driven electric generating plants.Water is heated and converted to steam, which in turn drives the steamturbine generating equipment. Boilers, whether of the watertube or firetubetype, contain spaces that must be entered periodically for maintenance.To ensure that work can be safely initiated, paragraph (v)(6)(i) wouldrequire an inspection to be undertaken by a designated person. To protectemployees who may have to reenter the work area from hazards arising fromincomplete work or other problems which may have occurred during the courseof work, this paragraph would require a similar inspection to be performedafter work is completed. As a further precaution, this paragraph proposesa requirement for eye protection during cleaning operations.Proposed paragraph (v)(6)(ii) would require that provision be made to adequatelyshield employees working near the end of water or steam tubes during cleaningoperations.In andSection; 1910.269(v)(7), OSHA is proposing requirements for chemicalcleaning of boilers and pressure vessels. These proposed requirements specifythat areas be cordoned off to restrict access during cleaning and thatthe number of workers in the area be limited to those needed to do theoperation. Because of the flammability of chemicals used in cleaning andthe possibility of flammable gases in the boiler or pressure vessel, theproposal would prohibit smoking, welding, and other ignition sources duringcleaning operations. In addition, requirements are proposed for the useof protective clothing, goggles, boots, and gloves and for the availabilityof clean water or emergency showers in the general area of work. Theseproposed provisions recognize the hazards of chemical cleaning and areintended to minimize risks to employees during these operations.In andSection; 1910.269(v)(8), OSHA is proposing requirements for chlorinesystem safety. (These requirements would, of course, be in addition toother provisions in Part 1910 addressing the hazards of exposure to chlorine,such as those in Subparts I and Z.) OSHA proposes that gaseous chlorinesystem enclosures be posted with signs restricting entry and warning ofthe hazards. Entry into the restricted area would be permitted only fordesignated employees equipped with personal protective equipment and wouldbe limited to the number required to perform the task. In addition, OSHAproposes that emergency repair kits for repair of chlorine leaks be availableand that chlorine tanks, pipes, and equipment be purged and isolated fromother sources of chlorine before employee operations begin. Lastly, OSHAproposes that the employer take precautions to prevent accidental mixingof chlorine with reactive materials which could produce a hazardous situation.Paragraph (v)(9) of proposed andSection; 1910.269 proposes requirements forboiler repair work. These proposed requirements specify that boiler furnacesand ash hoppers be inspected for possible falling objects, such as failedliners, before repair work is begun. If this hazard exists, overhead protectionwould be required to be provided. Additionally, OSHA proposes that employeesstand clear of the opening of an operating boiler when opening the doorto prevent injury which may be caused by hot gases escaping from the opendoor.In andSection; 1910.269(v)(10), OSHA is proposing requirements for turbine-generatorsystems. Turbine generators are typically cooled by air or hydrogen circulatedby fans mounted on the generator rotor. The requirements proposed in paragraph(v)(10) address the fire and explosion hazards of hydrogen in turbine generatorsand are based on requirements in the draft standard recommended by EEIand IBEW. These proposed requirements would prohibit smoking or other ignitionsources near hydrogen or hydrogen sealing systems and require the postingof signs warning of the explosion hazard. In addition, conditions of excessivehydrogen makeup or abnormal pressure loss would be considered to be anemergency situation requiring correction, and a quantity of inert gas suitablefor purging hydrogen from generators would be required to be available.In paragraph (v)(11), OSHA is proposing requirements for the handling ofcoal and ash, including the use of railroad equipment and conveyors. Paragraph(v)(11)(i) would permit only designated persons to operate railroad equipment.Designated persons are persons who are qualified to perform a given task(in this instance, operate railroad equipment) and who are assigned bythe employer to perform this task.Restricting the running of railroad equipment to persons who are knowledgeableof the way to operate the equipment and of the accepted rules, such asright-of-way and signalling, will prevent accidents by assuring that theequipment operator is competent.In paragraph (v)(11)(ii), a warning is required to be given before a locomotiveor locomotive crane is moved. This warning will allow employees the opportunityto stand clear of the train and track before the equipment moves.The proposal would require, in paragraphs (v)(11) (iii) and (iv), thatdrawheads not be aligned by employees kicking the drawheads (to preventinjury to or loss of the employees' feet) and that drawheads and knucklesnot be shifted while railroad equipment is in motion (to prevent runawayrail cars). (A drawhead is the body of the automatic coupler, and the knuckleis the movable arm which connects with the drawhead to form the couplingon cars and locomotives.)Paragraph (v)(11)(v) proposes that railroad cars, when stopped for unloading,be blocked to prevent the cars from moving.In paragraph (v)(11)(vi), the standard would require an emergency meansto enable employees to stop railcar dumping during this operation. In theevent an incident occurs, this safeguard will allow interruption of thedumping operation to preclude or minimize injury to employees.Paragraph (v)(11)(vii) proposes that employees be trained and knowledgeableif they work in areas where coal- and ash-handling conveyors operate. Forexample, their training and knowledge should be thorough in the subjectsof the operation of the conveyor system, the hazards associated with conveyors,how to minimize these hazards, and in the requirements of this standardthat pertain to conveyor operation. The standard would require, in paragraph (v)(11)(viii), that employeesbe prohibited from riding on coal- or ash-handling conveyors. Belt conveyorsare not designed to carry persons and riding the conveying medium can bevery hazardous. This paragraph would further require that employees onlybe allowed to cross over a belt conveyor at walkways, unless the conveyoris locked out or tagged in accordance with proposed andSection; 1910.269(d).Paragraph (v)(11)(ix) addresses the hazard of unexpected startup of conveyors.If a conveyor could cause injury when it is started, the proposal wouldrequire that personnel in the area be alerted by a signal or by a designatedemployee that the conveyor is about to start. For automatically and remotelycontrolled conveyors, an audible warning device that could be heard atall points along the conveyor where personnel could be present would berequired. However, a visual warning would be permitted if it would be moreeffective in alerting employees. Exceptions to the requirement for warning devices would be given if thesystem function would be seriously hindered by the required time delayor if the intent of the warning could be misinterpreted (as when many differentconveyors and allied devices are used). In such cases, warning signs wouldbe required to be provided at locations along the conveyor where it isnot guarded by position or location. These exceptions protect employeesat conveyor installations that cannot have warning devices installed fordesign reasons. OSHA requests information on safer alternatives to warningsigns. The provisions of paragraph (v)(11)(ix) are intended to protect employeesfrom getting caught in and injured by a conveyor that is started unexpectedly.This paragraph is based on provisions in Safety Standards for Conveyorsand Related Equipment, ASME/ANSI B20.1-1987. Paragraph (v)(11)(x) addresses hazards associated with emergency situationsinvolving automatically and remotely controlled conveyors. These conveyorswould be required to have emergency stop devices so that the equipmentcould be deenergized in case an employee becomes endangered by its operation.However, if the design, function, and operation of a conveyor is not hazardousto personnel, an emergency stop would not be required. The emergency stop devices would have to be easily identifiable and wouldhave to be placed anywhere the conveyor is not guarded. They would alsobe required to act directly on the control of the conveyor (not dependenton the stopping of other intermediate equipment) and to be installed sothat they cannot be overridden. The requirements proposed in paragraph (v)(11)(x) are also based on ASME/ANSIB20.1-1987. In andSection; 1910.269(v)(11)(xi), OSHA is proposing that, where a combustibleatmosphere may be produced in coal-handling operations, sources of ignitionbe eliminated or controlled to prevent ignition of combustible gases. Thisrequirement is proposed to mitigate the hazard of fire and explosion incoal-handling operations and would indicate that a combustible atmospheremay occur in these operations. An area in which this may occur must beconsidered a Class II location as far as ignition sources are concerned.(See Subpart S of Part 1910 for requirements pertaining to the controlof electrical ignition sources in Class II locations, which are locationsthat are hazardous because of the presence of combustible dust, such ascoal dust.) In paragraphs (v)(11) (xii) and (xiii), OSHA is proposing that employeesnot be allowed to work on or beneath overhanging coal, and that employeesentering a bunker or silo wear a safety harness with lifeline attachedto a fixed support outside the bunker attended at all times by a standbyemployee. Based on requirements contained in the draft standard recommendedby EEI and IBEW, these requirements address the hazards of being struckor crushed by falling coal and of suffocating by being buried in coal.Paragraph (v)(12) proposes requirements for walking and working surfaces.Proposed paragraph (v)(12)(i) emphasizes that the requirements of SubpartD of Part 1910 would continue to apply. However, paragraph (v)(12)(ii)would provide an exception to the Subpart D requirements whereby a floorhole, through which passes machinery, piping, or other equipment that mayexpand or contract in the hole, is permitted to be guarded by a toeboardif the opening around the machinery or pipe is 12 inches (30.5 cm) or less.This provision recognizes the need to provide for expansion and contractionof equipment, and OSHA believes that a toeboard will normally prevent anemployee's foot from entering the opening as well as prevent tools fromfalling through the hole. However, OSHA recognizes that this conditionis not unique to electric utility workplaces, and comments are requestedon whether this exception to an existing general industry requirement iswarranted and whether it will provide adequate protection. Paragraph (v)(13) proposes that employees working near gates, valves, intakes,or flumes of a hydroplant would be required to be warned before changesare made in water flow rates, if such a change would pose a hazard to employees.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (w)</ITAG>Paragraph (w) proposes requirements for special conditions that are encounteredduring electric power generation, transmission, and distribution work.Since capacitors store electric charge and can release electrical energyeven when disconnected from their sources of supply, some additional precautionsto those proposed in paragraphs (m) (deenergizing lines and equipment)and (n) (grounding) of andSection; 1910.269 may be necessary when work isperformed on capacitors or on lines which are connected to capacitors.Paragraph (w)(1) proposes precautions which will enable this equipmentto be considered as deenergized. Under paragraph (w)(1)(i), capacitorson which work is to be performed would have to be disconnected from theirsources of supply and short-circuited. This would not only remove the sourcesof electric current but would relieve the capacitors of their charge aswell. However, for work on individual capacitors in a series-parallel capacitorbank, each unit would have to be short-circuited between its terminalsand the capacitor tank or rack, with the rack grounded; otherwise, individualcapacitors could retain a charge. This consideration is proposed in paragraph(w)(1)(ii). Lastly, paragraph (w)(1)(iii) would require lines to whichcapacitors are connected to be short-circuited before the lines can beconsidered deenergized.Although the magnetic flux density in the core of a current transformeris usually very low, resulting in a low secondary voltage, it will riseto saturation if the secondary circuit is opened while the transformerprimary is energized. If this occurs, the magnetic flux will induce a voltagein the secondary winding high enough to be hazardous to the insulationin the secondary circuit and to personnel. Because of this hazard to workers,paragraph (w)(2) would prohibit the opening of the secondary circuit ofa current transformer while the primary is energized. If the primary cannotbe deenergized for work to be performed on the secondary, then the secondarycircuit would have to be bridged so that an open-circuit condition wouldnot result.In a series streetlighting circuit, the lamps are connected in series,and the same current flows in each lamp. This current is supplied by aconstant-current transformer, which provides a constant current at a variablevoltage from a source of constant voltage and variable current. Like thecurrent transformer, the constant current source attempts to supply currenteven when the secondary circuit is open. The resultant open-circuit voltagecan be very high and hazardous to employees. For this reason, paragraph(w)(3) proposes a requirement, similar to that in paragraph (w)(2), thateither the streetlighting transformer be deenergized or the circuit bebridged to avoid an open-circuit condition.Frequently, electric power generation, transmission, and distribution employeesmust work at night or in enclosed places, such as manholes, that are notilluminated by the sun. Since inadvertent contact with live parts can befatal, good lighting is important to the safety of these workers. Therefore,paragraph (w)(4) proposes that sufficient illumination be provided so thatwork can be performed safely. Specific guidance is not provided in theproposal, but OSHA requests comments and supporting data with respect tolevels of illumination that are necessary for safety.To protect employees working in areas that expose them to the hazards ofdrowning, paragraph (w)(5) would require the provision and use of personalflotation devices. Additionally, to ensure that these devices will providethe necessary protection upon demand, they would have to be approved bythe U.S. Coast Guard, be maintained in safe condition, and be regularlyinspected for defects that render them unsuitable for use. Employees wouldnot be permitted to cross streams unless a safe means of passage is provided.Employees working in areas exposed to pedestrain or vehicular traffic areexposed to additional hazards compared to those working on the employer'spremises, where public access is restricted. One serious additional hazardfaced by workers exposed to the public is that of being struck by a vehicle(or even by a person). To protect employees against being injured as aresult of traffic mishaps, paragraph (w)(6) would require the placementof warning signs or flags or other warning devices to channel approachingtraffic away from the work area if the conditions in the area pose a hazardto employees. If warning signs are not sufficient protection or if employeesare working in an area in which there are excavations, barricades wouldhave to be erected. Additionally, warning lights would be required fornight work.Paragraph (w)(7) would caution employees about the hazards of voltage backfeeddue to sources of cogeneration or due to the configuration of the circuitinvolved. Under conditions of voltage backfeed, the lines upon which workis to be performed remain energized after the main source of power hasbeen disconnected. As noted by this section, the lines would have to beworked as energized, under the provisions of paragraph (1) of proposedandSection; 1910.269, or could be worked as deenergized, following paragraphs(m) and (n) of proposed andSection; 1910.269. The referenced paragraphs containthe appropriate precautions to be taken in case of voltage backfeed.Sometimes electric power generation, transmission, and distribution workinvolves the use of lasers. Appropriate requirements for the installation,operation, and adjustment of lasers are contained in existing andSection;1926.54 of the Construction Standards.Rather than develop different requirements for electric power generation,transmission, and distribution work, OSHA has proposed to adopt the constructionregulation by reference in paragraph (w)(8) of andSection;1910.269.To ensure that hydraulic equipment retains its insulating value, paragraph(w)(9) would require the hydraulic fluid used in insulated sections ofsuch equipment to be of the insulating type.<ITAG tagnum="81">Paragraph (x)</ITAG>Proposed andSection;1910.269(x) contains definitions of terms used in theproposal. Since these definitions have been taken, in large part, fromconsensus standards and existing OSHA regulations and since the definitionsincluded are generally self-explanatory, OSHA expects these terms to bewell understood, and no explanation is given here. However, in the discussionof the proposed provision in which the term first appears, the Agency hasprovided an explanation of any term whose meaning may not be readily apparent.OSHA requests public comment on these definitions and welcomes any suggestionsoffered by the public.<ITAG tagnum="85">IV. Summary of the Preliminary Regulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibilityand Environmental Impact Assessment</ITAG>IntroductionExecutive Order 12291 (46 FR 13197, February 19, 1981) requires that aregulatory impact analysis be conducted for any rule having major economicconsequences for the national economy, individual industries, geographicalregions, or levels of government. In addition, the Regulatory FlexibilityAct of 1980 (Pub. L. 96-353, 94 Stat. 1164 [5 U.S.C. 601, <T3>et seq.</T3>]) requires OSHA to determine whether a proposed regulationwill have a significant economic impact on a substantial number of smallentities, and the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 (42U.S.C. 4321, <T3>et seq.</T3>) requires the agency to assess the environmental consequencesof regulatory actions.In order to comply with these requirements OSHA has prepared a PreliminaryRegulatory Impact and Regulatory Flexibility Assessment (PRIA) for theproposed electric power generation, transmission, and distribution standard.This assessment includes a profile of the industries that would be affected,the estimated number of employees who would be affected and the technologicalfeasibility, costs, benefits, and overall economic impact of the proposedstandard. The PRIA is available in the OSHA Docket Office.Since the proposed standard is not likely: (1) To have an annual effecton the economy of $100 million; (2) to result in a major increase in costsor prices for consumers, industries, government agencies, or geographicregions; or (3) to have significant adverse effects on competition, employment,investment, productivity, innovation, or the ability of United States-basedenterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprises, the proposal doesnot constitute a major rule under the cost criteria of Executive Order12291.Data SourcesThe primary source of information used for this assessment is a June 1986report by the Eastern Research Group (ERG) entitled, ``Preparation of anEconomic Impact Study for the Proposed OSHA Regulation Covering ElectricPower Generation, Transmission, and Distribution.'' (This document is alsoavailable in the Docket Office.) OSHA welcomes additional comments, andall information supplied will be carefully reviewed and evaluated for incorporationinto the Regulatory Impact Assessment (RIA) that will accompany the finalrule.Industry ProfileThe three distinct phases in supplying electricity to an electric utility'scustomers are: (1) Generation; (2) transmission, and (3) distribution.Electric power generation is the use of generating plants to convert theenergy from fossil fuel, water, nuclear fuel, geothermal sources, the sun,etc. to electricity. Electric power transmission carries the huge quantitiesof generated elecricity to the systems that deliver the electricity. Electricpower distribution carries the electricity to its industrial, commercial,and residential users.The proposed standard would primarily affect electric utilities, electricalcontractor line crews, and line-clearance tree-trimming contractors. Thereare approximately 3,200 companies and organizations that comprise the electricutility industry. Of these, 273 are privately owned, 958 are rural cooperatives,and about 2,000 are publicly owned. Private utilities are the largest entitieswithin the electric utilities as evidenced by the fact that the largest183 private utilities generate about 75 percent of the electricity in theUnited States. Of these 183 electric utilities, 145 are vertically integrated(i.e., they own generating plants, transmission systems, and distributionnetworks), 26 have only generation plants, 3 have only transmission systems,and 9 have transmission systems and distribution networks. Electric utilitiesare found in two SIC codes. SIC 911 (Electric Services: ``Establishmentsengaged in the generation, transmission, and/or distribution of electricenergy for sale'') and SIC 4931 (Electric and Other Services Combined:``Establishments primarily engaged in providing electric services in combinationwith other services, with electric services as the major part though lessthan 95 percent of the total'').The market structure in which electric utilities function is best describedas a regulated monopoly. There are substantial economies of scale in electricpower operations within a given geographical area so that the most technologicallyefficient system is to have one or a few electric power suppliers. Therates that electric utilities can charge, however, are subject to approvalby state or local government agencies. In general, these agencies allowa utility to recoup its expenditures plus a percentage of its capital assets.Included within these expenditures are those spent upon the safety andhealth of the employees.OSHA estimates that the revenue from the electric power operations of allelectric utilities was about $170 billion in 1985. Of this revenue, the183 largest private electric utilities received about $135 billion andhad an average revenue of about $738 million from electric power operations.Electrical contractor line crews are used by electric utilities to performoperation, maintenance, and construction activities. Most of the approximately1,800 contractors who do this work for electric utilities are medium-sizedelectrical contractors who also work on other projects for other clients.Line-clearance tree-trimming contractors are used by electric utilitiesto perform routine tree-trimming around power lines. There are 55 largerand medium size landscaping companies that have about 95 percent of thisbusiness and between 1,500 and 2,000 small companies that perform the restof this work.OSHA has no information concerning the revenues received by these two typesof contractors from work performed for electric utilities. OSHA requestsinformation concerning these revenues, and any information received willbe reviewed for incorporation into the RIA that will accompany the finalrule.Population-at-RiskThe data currently available to OSHA indicate that the proposed standardwould affect 657,775 employees. Of these, 608,575 are employed by electricutilities, about 13,200 are employed by electrical contractors, and about36,000 are employed by line-clearance tree-trimming contractors. Of the608,575 electric utility employees who perform electrical power operations,138,399 are operation and maintenance personnel who face the most riskfrom hazards that are the primary focus of this proposed standard. (A totalof 284,210 employees would face some risk from these hazards.)Technological FeasibilityOSHA has determined that the proposed standard is technologically feasible.The proposal would not require the installation of large-scale, state-of-the-artcapital equipment. All of the provisions of the proposal involve equipment,evaluations, and work practices that are widely used and readily available.In this regard, it should be noted that the proposal is based substantiallyupon three source documents: A draft proposal jointly submitted by theEdison Electric Institute and the International Brotherhood of ElectricalWorkers; a national consensus standard, the National Electrical SafetyCode (ANSI C-2); and the requirements of Subpart V of OSHA's current constructionstandards in 29 CFR Part 1926.Summary of CostOSHA has used current work practices as its baseline for estimating thecost of attaining full compliance with the proposed standard, and theseestimates are summarized in Table A. As seen in the table, OSHA has estimatedthat the annual cost of full compliance with the proposed standard wouldbe about $20.723 million of which $16.341 million would be spent by electricutilities, $1.608 million would be spent by contractor line crews, and$2.774 million would be spent by line-clearance tree-trimming contractors.As shown in Table A, the provision having the highest annual cost (i.e.,$5.605 million) is the requirement for initial and refresher safety training.The next highest annual cost (i.e., $3.380 million) is for inspecting mechanicalelevating equipment, such as bucket and boom trucks working in enclosedand entry-permit confined spaces.BenefitsThe proper use of safety equipment and appropriate work practices willprevent fatalities in electric utilities. About 70-percent of the fatalitiesoccurring in electric utilities are a consequence of employee contact withelectric wiring or an electrical apparatus. This is particularly hazardousbecause the electricity is transmitted at thousands and hundreds of thousandsof volts.OSHA has estimated that there are between 68 and 75 fatalities occurringannually among electric utility and electric utility contractor employees.In addition, there are an estimated 43,725 annual injuries, of which 21,175are lost-workday injuries and 22,560 are non-lost-workday injuries. Thenumber of annual lost workdays is about 367,255.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table A._Cost of Compliance With the Proposed Standard by Industryand by Provision</T4><ITAG tagnum="96">[In millions of 1986 dollars]</ITAG><H1>Industry (provision)</H1><H1>Cost \1\</H1>Electric utilities:<ITAG tagnum="3">Refresher safety training</ITAG><D>4.307</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Safety enforcement</ITAG><D>3.380</D><ITAG tagnum="3">CPR and first aid training</ITAG><D> .119</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Enclosed spaces</ITAG><D>2.498</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Lockout/tagout procedures</ITAG><D> .007</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Mechanical elevating equipment inspection</ITAG><D>2.539</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Working on overhead lines</ITAG><D>1.271</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Insulating blanket retesting</ITAG><D> .485</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Line clearance procedures</ITAG><D>1.087</D><ITAG tagnum="3">High-voltage testing safety procedures</ITAG><D> .009</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Isolation and depressurization of connections</ITAG><D> .639</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Subtotal</ITAG><D>16.341</D><R>n,d</R>Contract linemen:<ITAG tagnum="3">Refresher safety training</ITAG><D> .831</D><ITAG tagnum="3">CPR and first aid training</ITAG><D> .230</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Mechanical elevating equipment inspection</ITAG><D> .368</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Working on overhead lines</ITAG><D> .179</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Subtotal</ITAG><D>1.608</D><R>n,d</R>Line-clearance tree-trimming contractors:<ITAG tagnum="3">Initial safety training</ITAG><D> .467</D><ITAG tagnum="3">CPR and first aid training</ITAG><D>2.307</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Subtotal</ITAG><D>2.774</D><R>n,d</R><ITAG tagnum="5">Total</ITAG><D>20.723</D><F>\1\ Annual cost of compliance.</F></ITAG>The proposed standard would not cover electrical utilization hazards currentlycovered by existing Part 1910 but would address those work practices involvingthe generation, transmission, and distribution of electricity. In particular,the proposed standard is designed to reduce the hazards that cause fatalitiesand serious lost-workday injuries. The hazards that are directly coveredby the proposed standard are electrocution and injuries due to electricshock. In addition, the proposed standard would directly affect fatalitiesand injuries associated with four other types of accidents: (1) Struckby or struck against; (2) fall; (3) caught in or between; and (4) contactwith temperature extremes. OSHA has determined that in electric utilities95-percent of all fatalities, 56.2-percent of all injuries, 45.2-percentof the lost-workday injuries, and 59.8-percent of the non-lost-workdayinjuries are due to electric shock or to one of these 4 types of accidents.After adjusting for the injuries that are caused by hazards that are notaddressed by the proposed standard or that are already addressed by theexisting General Industry Standards, OSHA has determined that the proposedstandard could address the hazards that annually cause 30 to 34 fatalitiesand 3,260 injuries (of which 1,290 are lost-workday injuries, involving22,345 annual lost workdays, and 1,970 are non-lost-workday injuries) incurredby electric utility and electric utility contractor employees. OSHA has determined that of these fatalities and injuries, about 80-percentof the electrocutions, 60-percent of the other fatalities, and two thirdsof the injuries would be prevented by compliance with the proposed standard.Thus, OSHA has estimated that compliance with this proposed standard wouldannually prevent between 24 and 28 fatalities and 2,175 injuries of which860 are lost-workday injuries, involving 14,920 prevented lost workdays,and 1,315 are non-lost-workday injuries. Economic Impact The proposed standard would have an economic impact upon electric utilities;however, the $16.341 million annual cost of compliance is about 0.1-percentof the estimated $18.764 billion in annual net income after taxes. In addition,the expenditures upon employee safety would be considered to be a costof electric power production that public utility rate commissions wouldallow electric utilities to capture through minimum rate increases. OSHAbelieves that the proposed standard would have no significant economicimpact upon the electrical contract line crews and line-clearance tree-trimmingcontractors. Their increased costs would be passed onto the electric utilitywhich, in turn, would pass these costs onto its customers. OSHA requestsinformation concerning this conclusion, and any comments received willbe reviewed and evaluated for incorporation into the final rule and intothe RIA that will accompany the final rule. Regulatory Flexibility Analysis Pursuant to the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 601), theAssistant Secretary has preliminarily determined that the proposed standardwould not have a significant impact upon a substantial number of smallentities. OSHA solicits comments and information on this issue, and anycomments received will be reviewed and evaluated for incorporation intothe RIA of the final rule. Environmental Impact Assessment_Finding of No Significant Impact The proposed standard and its alternatives have been reviewed in accordancewith the requirements of the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of1969 (42 U.S.C. 4321, <T3>et seq.), </T3>the regulations of the Council on Environmental Quality(CEQ) (40 CFR Part 1500), and the Department of Labor's NEPA Procedures(29 CFR Part 11). As a result of this review, the Assistant Secretary forOSHA has determined that the proposed standard will have no significantenvironmental impact. The procedures and applications of the proposed provisionsdo not impact on air, water or soil quality, plant or animal life, theuse of land, or other aspects of the environment and therefore are notanticipated to have any significant effect on the environment. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Federalism</ITAG>This proposed standard has been reviewed in accordance with Executive Order12612 (52 FR 41685, October 30, 1987), regarding Federalism. This Orderrequires that agencies, to the extent possible, refrain from limiting Statepolicy options, consult with States before taking any actions that wouldrestrict State policy options, and take such actions only when there isclear constitutional authority and the presence of a problem of nationalscope. The Order provides for preemption of State law only if there isa clear Congressional intent for the agency to do so. Any such preemptionis to be limited to the extent possible. Section 18 of the Occupational Safety and Health Act (OSH Act) expressesCongress' clear intent to preempt State laws relating to issues with respectto which Federal OSHA has promulgated occupational safety or health standards.Under the OSH Act a State can avoid preemption only if it submits, andobtains Federal approval of, a plan for the development of such standardsand their enforcement. Occupational safety and health standards developedby such Plan-States must, among other things, be at least as effectivein providing safe and healthful employment and places of employment asthe Federal standards. The Federally proposed electric power generation, transmission, and distributionstandard is drafted so that employers in every State would be protectedby general, performance-oriented standards. To the extent that there areState or regional peculiarities caused by the terrain, the climate, orother factors, States with occupational safety and health plans approvedunder Section 18 of the OSH Act would be able to develop their own Statestandards to deal with any special problems. Morevover, the performancenature of this proposed standard, of and by itself, allows for flexibilityby all States and employers to provide as much safety as possible usingvarying methods consonant with conditions in each State.In short, there is a clear national problem related to occupational safetyin electric transmission and distribution work. While the individual States,if all acted, might be able collectively to deal with the safety problemsinvolved, most have not elected to do so in the seventeen years since theenactment of the OSH Act. States which have elected to participate underSection 18 of the OSH Act would not be preempted by this proposed regulationand would be able to deal with special, local conditions within the frameworkprovided by this performance-oriented standard while ensuring that theirstandards are at least as effective as the Federal standard. State commentsare invited on this proposal and will be fully considered before a finalrule is promulgated. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. OMB Review Under the Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG>In accordance with the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (454 U.S.C. 3501,<T3>et seq.</T3>) and the regulations issued pursuant thereto (5 CFR Part1320), OSH certifies that it has submitted the information collection requirementscontained in paragraphs (d)(2)(ii) and (d)(2)(iii) of this proposed standardto the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for review under section 3504(h)of that Act. Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto be 80 hours per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the DocketOffice at the address listed in the Public Participation section of thispreamble and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs; Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Public Participation</ITAG>Interested persons are invited to submit written comments with respectto this proposal and all issues involved therein. The data, views, andarguments must be postmarked on or before May 1, 1989 and submitted inquadruplicate to the Docket Officer; Docket No. S-015, Rm. N3670; U.S.Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration; 200Constitution Ave., NW.; Washington, DC 20210. Written submissions mustclearly identify the provisions of the proposal which are addressed andthe position taken with respect to each issue. The data, views, and arguments that are submitted will be available forpublic inspection and copying at the Docket Office. All timely writtensubmissions received will be made part of the record of this proceeding.Additionally, under section 6(b)(3) of the OSH Act (29 U.S.C. 657(b)(3))and 29 CFR 1911.11, interested persons may file objections to the proposaland request an informal public hearing. The objections and hearing requestsshould be submitted in quadruplicate to the Docket Office at the aforementionedaddress and must comply with the following conditions: 1. The objections must include the name and address of the objector; 2. The objections must be postmarked on or before May 1, 1989 and submittedto the Docket Office at the previously mentioned address; 3. The objections must specify with particularity the provisions of theproposed rule to which objection is taken and must state the grounds therefor;4. Each objection must be separately stated and numbered; and 5. The objections must be accompanied by a detailed summary of the evidenceproposed to be adduced at the requested hearing. If objections and requests for a hearing are timely filed, a hearing willbe scheduled under section 6(b)(3) of the OSH Act. OSHA recognizes that there may be interested persons who, through theirknowledge of safety or their experience in the operations involved, wouldwish to endorse or support certain provisions in the standard. OSHA welcomessuch supportive comments, including any pertinent accident data or costinformation which may be available, in order that the record of this rulemakingwill present a balanced picture of the public response on the issues involved.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. State Plan Standards </ITAG>The 23 States and 2 Territories with their own OSHA-approved occupationalsafety and health plans must adopt a comparable standard within 6 monthsof the publication date of a final standard. These States are: Alaska,Arizona, California,\4\<NOTE/> Connecticut,\4\ Hawaii, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Maryland,Michigan, Minnesota, Nevada, New Mexico, New York,\4\ North Carolina, Oregon,Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah, Vermont, Virginia, VirginIslands, Washington, Wyoming. Until such time as a State standard is promulgated,Federal OSHA will provide interim enforcement assistance, as appropriate.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\Plan covers only State and local government employees.<ITAG tagnum="84">IX. List of Index Terms </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 29 CFR Part 1910 </ITAG>Electric power, Fire Prevention, Flammable materials, Occupational safetyand health, Occupational Safety and Health Administration, Safety, Signsand symbols, and Tools. <ITAG tagnum="84">X. Authority </ITAG>This document was prepared under the direction of John A. Pendergrass,Assistant Secretary of Labor for Occupational Safety and Health, U.S. Departmentof Labor, 200 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20210. Accordingly, pursuant to sections 4, 6, and 8 of the Occupational Safetyand Health Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1593, 1599, 29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657),Secretary of Labor's Order No. 9-83 (48 FR 35736), and 29 CFR Part 1911,it is proposed to amend 29 CFR Part 1910 as set forth below. <ITAG tagnum="21">Signed at Washington, DC, this 24th day of January 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">John A. Pendergrass, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of Labor. </ITAG>Part 1910 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations would be amendedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 29_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Subpart I of Part 1910 would be revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4, 6, 8, Occupational Safety and Health Act of1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71 (36FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736), as applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sections 1910.134 and 1910.137 also issued under 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>2. By revising andSection;1910.137 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1910.137 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Electrical protective equipment.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Design requirements. </T3>Insulating blankets, matting, covers, linehose, gloves, and sleeves made of rubber shall meet the following requirements:(1) <T3>Manufacture and marking. </T3>(i) Blankets, gloves, and sleeves shallbe produced by a seamless process.(ii) Each item shall be clearly marked as follows:(A) Class 0 equipment shall be marked Class 0.(B) Class 1 equipment shall be marked Class 1.(C) Class 2 equipment shall be marked Class 2.(D) Class 3 equipment shall be marked Class 3.(E) Class 4 equipment shall be marked Class 4.(F) Non-ozone-resistant equipment other than matting shall be marked TypeI.(G) Ozone-resistant equipment other than matting shall be marked Type II.(H) Other markings, such as the manufacturer's identification and the sizeof the equipment, may be provided, as appropriate.(iii) Markings shall be nonconducting and shall be applied in such a manneras not to impair the insulating qualities of the equipment.(iv) Markings on gloves shall be confined to the cuff portion of the glove.(2) <T3>Electrical requirements. </T3>(i) Equipment shall be capable of withstandingthe a-c proof-test voltage specified in Table I-2 or the d-c proof-testvoltage specified in I-3. The proof test shall reliably indicate that theequipment can withstand the voltage involved. The test voltage shall beapplied continuously for 3 minutes for equipment other than matting andshall be applied continuously for 1 minute for matting.(ii) When the a-c proof test is used on gloves, the 60-hertz proof-testcurrent may not exceed the values specified in Table I-2 at any time duringthe test period. If the a-c proof test is made at a frequency other than60 hertz, the permissible proof-test current shall be computed from thedirect ratio of the frequencies.(iii) Equipment that has been subjected to a minimum breakdown voltagetest may not be used for electrical protection.(iv) Material used for Type II insulating equipment shall be capable ofwithstanding an ozone test, with no visible effects. Any visible signsof ozone deterioration of the material, such as checking, cracking, breaks,or pitting, is evidence of failure to meet the requirements for ozone-resistancematerial.(3) <T3>Workmanship and finish. </T3>(i) Equipment shall be free of harmfulphysical irregularities which can be detected by thorough test or inspection.(ii) Surface irregularities that may be present on all rubber goods becauseof imperfections on forms or molds or because of inherent difficultiesin the manufacturing process and that may appear as indentations, protuberances,or imbedded foreign material are acceptable under the following conditions:(A) The indentation or protuberance tends to blend into a smooth slopewhen the material is stretched.(B) Foreign material remains in place when the insulating material is foldedand stretches with the insulating material surrounding it. (C) No irregularities occur in the palm-side of a glove, exclusive of thegauntlet, or in the finger or thumb crotches.<ITAG tagnum="25"><T4>Note: </T4>Rubber insulating equipment meeting the following nationalconsensus standards is deemed to be in compliance with paragraph (a) ofthis section:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) D 120-87, Specificationfor Rubber Insulating Gloves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 178-81, Specification for Rubber Insulating Matting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1048-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Blankets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1049-83, Specification for Rubber Insulating Covers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1050-85, Specification for Rubber Insulating Line Hose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1051-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Sleeves.</ITAG>(b) <T3>In-service care and use. </T3>(1) Electrical protective equipment shallbe maintained in a safe, reliable condition.(2) The following specific requirements apply to insulating blankets, covers,line hose, gloves, and sleeves made of rubber:(i) Maximum use voltages shall conform to those listed in Table I-4.(ii) Insulating equipment shall be inspected for damage before each day'suse and immediately following any incident that can reasonably be suspectedof having caused damage. Insulating gloves shall also be given an air test.(iii) Insulating equipment with any of the following defects may not beused:(A) A hole, tear, puncture, or cut;(B) Ozone cutting or ozone checking;(C) An embedded foreign object;(D) Any of the following texture changes: swelling, softening, hardening,or becoming sticky or inelastic.(E) Any other defect that damages the insulating properties.(iv) Insulating equipment found to have other defects that might affectits insulating properties shall be removed from service and returned fortesting under paragraphs (b)(2)(viii) and (b)(2)(ix) of this section.(v) Insulating equipment shall be cleaned as needed to remove foreign substances.(vi) Insulating equipment shall be stored in such a location and in sucha manner as to protect it from light, temperature extremes, excessive humidity,ozone, and other injurious substances and conditions.(vii) Protector gloves shall be worn over insulating gloves, except asfollows:(A) Protector gloves need not be used with Class 0 gloves, under limited-useconditions, where small equipment and parts manipulation necessitate unusuallyhigh finger dexterity.(B) Any other class of glove may be used for similar work without protectorgloves if the possibility of physical damage to the gloves is small andif the class of glove is one class higher than that required for the voltageinvolved. Insulating gloves that have been used without protector glovesmay not be used at a higher voltage until they have been tested under theprovisions of paragraphs (b)(2)(viii) and (b)(2)(ix) of this section.(viii) Electrical protective equipment shall be subjected to periodic electricaltests. Test voltages and the maximum intervals between tests shall be inaccordance with Tables I-4 and I-5.(ix) The test method used under paragraphs (b)(2)(viii) and (b)(2)(xi)of this section shall reliably indicate whether the insulating equipmentcan withstand the voltages involved.<ITAG tagnum="25"><T4>Note: </T4>Standard electrical test methods considered as meeting thisrequirement are given in the following national consensus standards:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) D 120-87, Specificationfor Rubber Insulating Gloves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1048-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Blankets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1049-83, Specification for Rubber Insulating Covers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1050-85, Specification for Rubber Insulating Line Hose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM D 1051-87, Specification for Rubber Insulating Sleeves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM F 478-87, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating LineHose and Covers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM F 479-83, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating Blankets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">ASTM F 496-85, Specification for In-Service Care of Insulating Glovesand Sleeves.</ITAG>(x) Insulating equipment failing to pass inspections or electrical testsmay not be used by employees, except as follows:(A) Rubber insulating line hose may be used in shorter lengths with thedefective portion cut off.(B) Rubber insulating blankets may be repaired using a compatible patchthat results in physical and electrical properties equal to those of theblanket.(C) Rubber insulating blankets may be salvaged by severing the defectivearea from the undamaged portion of the blanket. The resulting undamagedarea may not be smaller than 22 inches by 22 inches (560 mm by 560 mm)for Class 1, 2, 3, and 4 blankets.(D) Rubber insulating gloves and sleeves with minor physical defects, suchas small cuts, tears, or punctures, may be repaired by the applicationof a compatible patch. Also, rubber insulating gloves and sleeves withminor surface blemishes may be repaired with a compatible liquid compound.the patched area shall have electrical and physical properties equal tothose of the surrounding material. Repairs to gloves are permitted onlyin the gauntlet area.(xi) Repaired insulating equipment shall be retested before it may be usedby employees.(xii) The employer shall certify that equipment has been tested in accordancewith the requirements of paragraphs (b)(2)(viii), (b)(2)(ix), and (b)(2)(xi)of this section. The certification shall identify the equipment that passedthe test and the date it was tested.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,i1,s100,15,15,15,15,15</C><T4>Table </T4>I-2._A-C <T4>Proof-Test Requirements</T4><H1>Class of Equipment</H1><H1>Proof-Test Voltage rms V</H1><H1>Maximum Proof-Test Current, mA (gloves only)</H1><H2>267-mm (10.5-in) Glove</H2><H2>356-mm (14-in Glove</H2><H2>406-mm (16-in) Glove</H2><H2>457-mm (18-in) Glove</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">0<D>5,000</D><D>8</D><D>12</D><D>14</D><D>16</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1<D>10,000</D><D/><D>14</D><D>16</D><D>18</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2<D>20,000</D><D/><D>16</D><D>18</D><D>20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3<D>30,000</D><D/><D>18</D><D>20</D><D>22</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4<D>40,000</D><D/><D/><D>22</D><D>24</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s50,10</C><T4>Table</T4> I-3._D-C<T4> Proof-Test Requirements</T4><H1/>Class of equipment:<H1/>Proof-test voltage, avg V<ITAG tagnum="3">0</ITAG><D>20,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">1</ITAG><D>40,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">2</ITAG><D>50,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3</ITAG><D>60,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">4</ITAG><D>70,000</D><F/><T4>Note.</T4>_The d-c voltages listed in this table are not appropriatefor proof testing rubber insulating line hose or covers. For this equipment,d-c proof tests shall use a voltage high enough to indicate that the equipmentcan be safely used at the voltages listed in Table I-4. See ASTM D 1050-85and ASTM D 1049-83 for further information on proof tests for rubber insulatingline hose and covers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>I-4._<T4>Rubber Insulating Equipment, Voltage Requirements</T4><H1>Class designation</H1><H1>Maximum use voltage \1\ a-c_rms</H1><H1>Retest voltage a-c_rms</H1><H1>Retest voltage d-c_avg</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">0 <D>1,000 </D><D>5,000 </D><D>20,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>7,500 </D><D>\2\ 10,000 </D><D>40,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>17,000 </D><D>\2\ 20,000 </D><D>50,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>26,500 </D><D>\2\ 30,000 </D><D>60,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>36,000 </D><D>\2\ 40,000 </D><D>70,000 </D><F>\1\ The maximum use voltage is the a-c voltage (rms) classificationof the protective equipment that designates the maximum nominal designvoltage of the energized system that may be safely worked. The nominaldesign voltage is equal to the phase-to-phase voltage on multiphase circuits.If there is no multiphase exposure in a system area and if the voltageexposure is limited to the phase-to-ground potential, the phase-to-groundpotential is considered to be the nominal design voltage.</F><F>\2\ If use is limited to nominal voltages less than the maximum usevoltage, the voltage at which other than Class 0 equipment is tested maybe reduced according to the following formula:</F><F>  Retest voltage (a-c, rms) = nominal use voltage + 2000 + (0.05 andmultiply;retest voltage given in Table I-4)</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,xs72,r20</C><T4>Table </T4>I-5._<T4>Rubber Insulating Equipment Test Intervals</T4><H1>Type of equipment</H1><H1>When to test</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating line hose <D>Upon indication that insulating value is suspect. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating covers <D>Upon indication that insulating value is suspect. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating blankets <D>Before first issue and every 12 months thereafter.\1\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating gloves <D>Before first issue and every 6 months thereafter.\1\ </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Rubber insulating sleeves <D>Before first issue and every 12 months thereafter.\1\ </D><F>\1\ If the insulating equipment has been electrically tested but notissued for service, it may not be placed into service unless it has beenelectrically tested within the previous 12 months.</F></ITAG></ITAG> 3. The authority citation for Subpart R of Part 1910 would be revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 4, 6, 8, Occupational Safety and Health Act of1970 (29 U.S.C. 653, 655, 657); Secretary of Labor's Order No. 12-71 (36FR 8754), 8-76 (41 FR 25059), or 9-83 (48 FR 35736), as applicable. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sections 1910.261, 1910.262, 1910.265, 1910.266, 1910.267, 1910.268,1910.269, 1910.274, 1910.275 also issued under 29 CFR Part 1911.</ITAG>4. By adding andSection; 1910.269 to Subpart R to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1910.269 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Electric power generation, transmission, and distribution. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>_(1) <T3>Application. </T3>(i) This section covers work practices, installations,and equipment associated with the operation and maintenance of electricpower generation, control, transformation, transmission, and distributionlines and equipment. These provisions apply to: (A) Power generation, transmission, and distribution installations, includingrelated equipment for the purpose of communication or metering, which areunder the exclusive control of the utility and are accessible only to qualifiedemployees as part of the utility operation; and (B) Other installations at an electric power generating station, as follows:(<T3>1</T3>) Fuel and ash handling and processing installations, such ascoal conveyors and crushers,(<T3>2</T3>) Water and steam installations, such as penstocks, pipelines,and tanks, providing a source of energy for turbine generators,(<T3>3</T3>) Chlorine and hydrogen systems, and (<T3>4</T3>) Walking and working surfaces within an electric power generatingstation.(C) Test sites under the exclusive control of electric utilities whereelectrical testing, involving temporary measurements associated with electricpower generation, transmission, and distribution, is performed in laboratories,in the field, in substations, and on lines, as opposed to metering, relayingand routine line work; and (D) Line-clearance tree-trimming operations, as follows:(<T3>1</T3>) The entire andSection; 1910.269, except paragraph (r)(1), appliesto line-clearance tree-trimming operations performed by qualified employees(those who are knowledgeable in the construction and operation of electricpower generation, transmission, or distribution equipment and the hazardsinvolved).(<T3>2</T3>) Paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (g), (k), (p), and (r) of this sectionapply to line-clearance tree-trimming operations performed by line clearancetree trimmers who are not qualified employees.(ii) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(1)(i) of this section, andSection; 1910.269does not apply:(A) To construction work, as defined in andSection;1910.12;(B) To work performed on electric power generation and distribution equipmentcontained in industrial establishments and non-utilities; or (C) To electrical installations, electrical safety-related work practices,or electrical maintenance considerations covered by Subpart S of this part.(iii) This section applies in addition to all other applicable standardscontained in this Part 1910. Specific references in this section to othersections of Part 1910 are provided for emphasis only.(2) <T3>Training</T3>. (i) Employees shall be trained in and familiar withthe safety-related work practices, safety procedures, and other personnelsafety requirements in this section that pertain to their respective jobassignments. Employees shall also be trained in and familiar with any othersafety practices, including applicable emergency procedures, which arenot addressed by this section but which are necessary for their safety.(ii) Qualified employees shall also be trained and competent in:(A) The skills and techniques necessary to distinguish exposed live partsfrom other parts of electric equipment,(B) The skills and techniques necessary to determine the nominal voltageof exposed live parts,(C) The clearance distances specified in this section corresponding tothe voltages to which the qualified employee will be exposed, and(D) The proper use of the special precautionary techniques, personal protectiveequipment, insulating and shielding materials, and insulated tools associatedwith working on or near exposed energized parts of electric equipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_For the purposes of this section, a person must have thistraining in order to be considered a qualified person.</ITAG>(iii) The training required by paragraph (a)(2) of this section shall beof the classroom or on-the-job type.(iv) The employer shall certify that each employee has received the trainingrequired by paragraph (a)(2) of this section. This certification shallbe made when the employee successfully completes the training and shallbe maintained for the duration of the employee's employment.(3) <T3>Existing conditions.</T3> Existing conditions shall be determined beforework is started. Such conditions include, but are not limited to, the nominalvoltages of lines and equipment, including switching transients, inducedvoltages, integrity of grounds, condition of poles, environmental conditionsrelative to safety, and the locations of circuits and equipment, includingpower and communication lines, CATV, and fire arlarm circuits.(b) <T3>Medical services and first aid.</T3> The employer shall provide medicalservices and first aid as required in andSection; 1910.151. In addition tothe requirements of andSection; 1910.151, the following requirements alsoapply:(1)<T3> Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid training. </T3>(i) Whenemployees are working on or with energized lines or equipment, personstrained in first aid including cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) shallbe available as follows:(A) For field work involving two or more employees at a work location,at least two trained persons shall be available.(B) For fixed work locations such as generating stations, the number oftrained persons available shall be sufficient to enable emergency treatmentto begin within 4 minutes of an accident.(ii) The first aid training shall be equivalent to that provided by theAmerican Red Cross multimedia course.(2)<T3> First aid supplies.</T3> First aid supplies recommended by a physicianshall be placed in weatherproof containers, unless stored indoors, andcontainers shall be readily accessible.(3) <T3>First aid kits.</T3> Each first aid kit shall be properly maintained,shall be readily available for use, and shall be inspected at least onceper year in accordance with an established schedule.(c) <T3>Job briefing.</T3> Before starting each job, the employer shall ensurethat the employee in charge shall conduct a job briefing with the employeesinvolved. The briefing shall cover such subjects as: Hazards associatedwith the job, work procedures involved, special precautions, energy sourcecontrols, and personal protective equipment requirements.(1) <T3>Number of briefings.</T3> If the work or operations to be performedduring the work day or shift are repetitive and similar, at least one jobbriefing shall be conducted before the start of the first job of the dayor shift. Additional job briefings shall be held if significant changes,which might affect the safety of the employees, occur during the courseof the work.(2) <T3>Extent of briefing.</T3> A brief discussion is satisfactory if thework involved is routine and if the employee, by virtue of training andexperience, can reasonably be expected to recognize and avoid the hazardsinvolved in the job. A more extensive discussion shall be conducted:(i) If the work is complicated or particularly hazardous, or(ii) If the employee cannot be expected to recognize and avoid the hazardsinvolved in the job.(3)<T3> Working alone.</T3> Paragraph (c) of this section does not apply ifan employee is working alone.(d) <T3>Hazardous energy control (lockout/tagout) procedures_</T3>(1)<T3> Application.</T3> The provisions of this paragraph apply to the useof lockout/tagout procedures for the control of energy sources in installationsfor the purpose of electric power generation, including related equipmentfor communication or metering. Locking and tagging procedures for the deenergizationcontrol of electric energy sources which are used exclusively for purposesof transmission and distribution are addressed by paragraph (m) of thissection.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Installations in electric power generation facilities thatare not for the purpose of generation are covered under andSection; 1910.147.</ITAG>(2)<T3> General.</T3> (i) The employer shall ensure that, before an employeeperforms any activities where the unexpected energization, start-up, orrelease of stored energy could occur and cause injury, all potentiallyhazardous energy sources shall be isolated, locked out/tagged out, andotherwise disabled, in accordance with this paragraph (d).(ii) A procedure shall be developed, documented, and implemented by theemployer for the control of potentially hazardous energy sources coveredby this paragraph (d).(iii) The procedure shall clearly and specifically outline the scope, purpose,responsibility, authorization, rules, and techniques to be applied to thecontrol of hazardous energy, and measures to enforce compliance including,but not limited to, the following:(A) A specific statement as to the intended use of this procedure;  (B) Specific procedural steps for the shutting down, isolating, blockingand securing of energy sources;  (C) Specific procedural steps for the removal and transfer of locks ortags or both and the responsibility for them; and  (D) Specific requirements for testing a system to determine and verifythe effectiveness of lockout/tagout and other energy control measures. (iv) The employer shall conduct periodic inspections to ensure that theprovisions of paragraph (d) of this section are being implemented.  (v) The inspections shall be performed by authorized employees and shallbe designed to correct any deviations or inadequacies observed.  (vi) The employer shall certify that the inspections required by paragraphs(d)(2)(iv) and (d)(2)(v) of this section have been accomplished. If normalwork schedule and operation records demonstrate adequate inspection activity,no additional certification is required.  (vii) The employer shall provide training to ensure that the purpose andfunction of the energy control procedures are understood by employees andthat the knowledge and skills required for the safe application and removalof energy controls are available as needed.  (A) Authorized employees shall receive training in the recognition of applicablehazardous energy sources and in the use of adequate methods and means forenergy isolation and control.  (B) Affected employees shall be instructed in the purpose and use of theenergy control procedure.  (C) Other employees who may have access to the area containing the equipmentor the controls shall be instructed about the energy control procedurebeing used and about how it affects their work operations.  (viii) Periodic retraining, either by regular on-the-job work assignmentor by specific training, shall be provided by the employer for all authorizedand affected employees at least on an annual basis to maintain employeeproficiency and to introduce new or revised control methods and procedures. (ix) The employer shall certify that employee training has been accomplishedand has been kept up to date.  (3) <T3>Locks and tags. </T3>(i) Locks or tags or both shall be provided bythe employer and shall be the only authorized devices used for lockout/tagoutof energy sources.  (ii) Locks and tags shall be capable of withstanding the environment towhich they are exposed for the maximum period of time that exposure isexpected.  (iii) Locks and tags shall be standardized in at least one of the followingcriteria: Color, shape, size, type, or format.  (iv) Locks shall be of such key code complexity that removal by any othermeans than the regular key would require excessive force or unusual techniques,such as metal cutting tools. Tags and attachment mechanisms shall be ofsuch design that the possibility of accidental removal is minimized.  (v) Locks and tags shall include provisions for the identification of theemployees applying or authorizing the application of the device.  (vi) Tags shall warn against hazardous conditions if the equipment is reenergizedand shall include one of the following legends: Do Not Start, Do Not Open,Do Not Close, Do Not Energize, or similar language.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>For specific provisions covering accident prevention tags,see andSection; 1910.145.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Energy isolating devices. </T3>(i) Each energy isolating device shallbe labeled or marked to indicate its purpose, unless it is located andarranged so its purpose is evident.  (ii) Energy isolating devices may be operated only by authorized employeesor under the direct supervision of authorized employees. (5) <T3>Notification. </T3>Affected employees shall be notified of the applicationand removal of lockout/tagout controls whenever such controls directlyaffect the employees' work activities. Notification shall be made as follows:(i) By the employer or an authorized employee;(ii) Before the application of lockout/tagout controls; and(iii) Before the removal of lockout/tagout controls from the equipmentor process.(6) <T3>Lockout/tagout application. </T3>(i) Operating controls that wouldallow the operation of the equipment upon which work is being performedshall be turned off or to the neutral position by designated employees.(ii) Energy isolating devices shall be operated in such a manner as toisolate the equipment or process from energy sources.(iii) A lock or a tag or both shall be applied to each energy isolatingdevice by an authorized employee.(iv) Locks shall be attached in such a manner as to hold energy isolatingdevices in a safe position, or tags shall be attached in such a manneras to inhibit the operation of energy isolating devices. Tags shall beattached to the energy isolating device unless the installation precludesthis attachment. In such cases, the tags shall be located as to be immediatelyobvious to anyone attempting to operate the energy isolating devices.(v) Following the application of locks or tags or both to energy isolatingdevices, all potentially hazardous stored or residual energy shall be detectedand shall be relieved, disconnected, or restrained so as to be renderedsafe.(vi) If there is a possibility of reaccumulation of stored energy to hazardouslevel, verification of isolation shall be continued until the activityis completed or until the possibility of such accumulation no longer exists.(vii) Before work is started on equipment or processes that have been lockedout or tagged out, an authorized employee shall inspect the equipment orprocesses and take other steps necessary to verify that isolation and deenergizationof the equipment or process has been accomplished. If direct contact isto be made with normally energized parts during work, a test shall be performedto ensure that these parts are deenergized.(viii) The steps taken under paragraph (d)(6)(vii) of this section shallensure that the locks or tags or both are so positioned or located thatthe energy isolating or disconnecting means has isolated and deenergizedthe equipment or process effectively and that any stored energy has beenrendered safe.(7) <T3>Release from lockout/tagout. </T3>(i) Before energy is restored tothe equipment or process, an authorized employee shall make a visual inspectionof the work area to determine that all nonessential items have been removed,that all components are operationally intact, and that no inadvertent equipmentstart-up will result.(ii) Before energy is restored to the equipment or process, verificationshall be made by an authorized employee that employees are in the clear.(iii) A lock or tag may be removed from each energy isolating device onlyby the employee who applied the lock or tag. However, locks and tags maybe removed under the direction of an authorized employee under the followingconditions, only if the authorized employee follows specific procedureswhich have been developed for those conditions:(A) If the employee who applied a personal lock or tag is not availableto remove it; or(B) If unique operating conditions involving complex systems are presentand the employer can demonstrate that it is not feasible to do otherwise.(8) <T3>Additional requirements. </T3>(i) If the energy isolating devices arelocked or tagged, and if there is a need to test or position the equipmentor process, the following sequence of actions shall be implemented:(A) Clear the equipment or process of tools and materials;(B) Clear the employees from the equipment or process areas;(C) Clear the controls of locks and tags according to the establishingprocedure;(D) Energize and proceed with the testing or positioning; and (E) Deenergize all systems, reapply energy control measures in accordancewith paragraph (d)(6) of this section to continue the work.(ii) When locks or tags belonging to a crew, craft, department, or othergroup are used, the procedures shall afford affected employees a levelof protection equivalent to that provided by personal locks or tags.(iii) Specific procedures shall be implemented to provide for the continuityof lockout/tagout protection during shift or employee changes.(iv) The employer shall ensure that contractors and their employees followthe lockout/tagout procedures in place at the work site. If the contractordoes not provide authorized persons who have been properly trained in thelockout/tagout procedure in use, the employer shall provide an authorizedemployee to operate or direct the operation of the energy isolating devicesand installation of the locks and tags.(e) <T3>Enclosed spaces.</T3> This paragraph covers enclosed spaces that maybe entered by employees. It does not apply to vented vaults. (1) <T3>Safe work practices.</T3> The employer shall assure the use of safework practices for entry into and work in enclosed spaces. (2) <T3>Evaluation of potential hazards.</T3> Before any entrance cover toan enclosed space is removed, the employer shall determine whether it issafe to do so after evaluating any atmospheric pressure or temperaturedifferences and whether there might be a hazardous atmosphere in the space.Any conditions making it unsafe to remove the cover shall be eliminatedbefore the cover is removed. (3) <T3>Removal of covers.</T3> When covers are removed from enclosed spaces,the opening shall be promptly guarded by a railing, temporary cover, orother temporary barrier intended to prevent an accidental fall throughthe opening and to protect employees working in the space from objectsentering the space. (4) <T3>Hazardous atmosphere.</T3> Employees may not enter any enclosed spacewhile it contains a hazardous atmosphere, unless the employee is protectedfrom the hazards that exist or may develop within the space. (5) <T3>Attendants.</T3> While work is being performed in the enclosed space,a person with basic first aid training shall be immediately available torender emergency assistance if there is reason to believe that a hazardmay exist in the space or if a hazard exists because of traffic patternsin the area of the opening used for entry. That person is not precludedfrom performing other duties outside the enclosed space. (6) <T3>Calibration of test instruments.</T3> Test instruments used to monitoratmospheres in enclosed spaces shall be kept in calibration. (7) <T3>Testing for flammable gases and vapors.</T3> Before an employee entersan enclosed space, the internal atmosphere shall be tested for flammablegases and vapors with a direct-reading meter or similar instrument capableof collection and immediate analysis of data samples without need for off-siteevaluation. (8) <T3>Testing for oxygen deficiency.</T3> Before an employee enters an enclosedspace, the internal atmosphere shall be tested for oxygen deficiency witha direct-reading meter or similar instrument, capable of collection andimmediate analysis of data samples without need for off-site evaluation.If continuous forced air ventilation is provided, oxygen deficiency testingis not required.  (9) <T3>Ventilation and monitoring.</T3> If flammable gases or vapors are detectedor if an oxygen deficiency is found, forced air ventilation shall be usedto maintain oxygen at a safe level and to prevent a hazardous concentrationof flammable gases and vapors from accumulating. A continuous monitoringprogram to ensure that no increase in flammable gas or vapor concentrationoccurs may be followed in lieu of ventilation, if flammable gases or vaporsare detected at safe levels. (10) <T3>Specific ventilation requirements.</T3> If continuous forced air ventilationis used, it shall begin before entry is made and shall be maintained longenough to ensure that a safe atmosphere exists before employees are allowedto enter the work area. The forced air ventilation shall be so directedas to ventilate the immediate area where employees are present within theenclosed space and shall continue until all employees leave the enclosedspace. (11) <T3>Air supply.</T3> The air supply for the continuous forced air ventilationshall be from a clean source and may not increase the hazards in the enclosedspace. (12) <T3>Open flames.</T3> If open flames are used in enclosed spaces, a testfor flammable gases and vapors shall be made immediately before the openflame device is used and at least once per hour while the device is usedin the space. (f) <T3>Trenches and excavations.</T3> Trenching and excavation operationsshall comply with andSection;andSection; 1926.650, 1926.651, 1926.652, and1926.653 of this chapter.(g) <T3>Personal protective equipment.</T3>_(1) <T3>General.</T3> Personal protective equipment shall meet the requirementsof Subpart I of this Part. Head protection meeting the requirements ofAmerican National Standard for Industrial Protective Helmets for ElectricalWorkers (ANSI Z89.2-1971) is deemed to be in compliance with andSection;1910.135.(2) <T3>Fall protection.</T3> (i) Body belts, lifelines, and lanyards for fallarrest shall meet the requirements of andSection; 1926.104 of this chapter.(ii) Body belts and safety straps for work positioning shall meet the requirementsof andSection; 1926.959 of this chapter.(iii) Body belts, safety straps, lanyards, lifelines, and body harnessesshall be inspected before use each day to determine that the equipmentis in safe working condition. Defective equipment may not be used.(iv) Lifelines shall be protected against being cut or abraded.(v) Fall arrest equipment, work positioning equipment, or travel restrictingequipment shall be used by employees working at elevated locations morethan 4 feet (1.2 m) above the ground on poles, towers, trees, or structuresand by employees working from vehicle-mounted elevating and rotating workplatforms if other fall protection has not been provided. The use of fallprotection equipment is not required when a qualified employee who meetsthe requirements of paragraph (h)(5) of this section is climbing or changinglocation on poles, towers, or similar structures containing steps or stepbolts. Fall protection equipment shall be used by all employees climbingwood poles not containing step bolts except when they are climbing aroundobstructions, such as crossarms, pins, or braces.(vi) When stopping or arresting a fall, fall arrest systems may not producean arresting force on an employee of more than ten times the employee'sweight or 1800 pounds (8kN), whichever is lower.(vii) If vertical lifelines or droplines are used, not more than one employeemay be attached to any one lifeline.(viii) Snaphooks may not be connected to loops made in webbing-type lanyards.(ix) Snaphooks may not be connected to each other.(h) <T3>Ladders, platforms, step bolts, and manhole steps</T3>_(1) <T3>General.</T3> Requirements for ladders contained in Subpart D of thispart apply, except as specifically noted in paragraphs (h)(2) and (h)(5)of this section.(2) <T3>Special ladders and platforms.</T3> Portable ladders and platformsused on structures or conductors in conjunction with overhead line workshall meet the following requirements in lieu of paragraphs (d)(2)(i) and(d)(2)(iii) of andSection; 1910.25 and paragraph (c)(3)(iii) of andSection;1910.26:(i) Ladders and platforms shall be secured to prevent their becoming accidentallydislodged.(ii) Ladders and platforms may not be loaded in excess of the working loadsfor which they are intended.(iii) Ladders and platforms shall be designed for the application for whichthey are used.(iv) In the configurations that they are used, ladders and platforms shallbe capable of supporting without failure at least four times the maximumintended load.(3) <T3>Conductive ladders.</T3> Portable metal ladders and other portableconductive ladders may not be used near exposed energized lines or equipment.However, in specialized high-voltage work, conductive ladders shall beused where the employer demonstrates that nonconductive ladders would presenta greater hazard than conductive ladders.(4) <T3>Step bolts and manhole steps.</T3> (i) Step bolts and manhole stepsshall be equipped with a ladder safety device meeting the requirementsof andSection; 1910.27 unless the step bolts and manhole steps are used onlyby qualified employees who meet the requirements of paragraph (h)(5) ofthis section.(ii) Step bolts and manhole steps shall be spaced uniformly not less than8 inches (20 cm) apart nor more than 18 inches (46 cm) apart. A 36-inch(91.4-cm) spacing between step bolts on one side of the supporting member,where there is an alternating pattern with the other side, meets this requirement.(iii) The spacing between the first or last step bolt or manhole step andthe entry or exit surface shall vary no more than 2 inches (5.1 cm) fromthe spacing between step bolts or manhole steps, and employees shall bemade aware of any variation.(iv) The minimum step width of step bolts shall be 4.5 inches (11.4 cm).The minimum clear step width of manhole steps shall be 10 inches (25.4cm).(v) For manhole steps, a minimum toe clearance of 4.5 inches (11.4 cm)from the point of embedment on the wall to the outside face of the stepshall be provided.(vi) For step bolts, the minimum toe clearance shall be 7 inches (17.8cm). Where an obstruction cannot be avoided, the toe clearance may be reducedbut shall be at least 4.5 inches (11.4 cm).(vii) Step bolts and manhole steps shall be designed to prevent the employee'sfoot from slipping or sliding off the end of the step bolt or manhole step.(viii) Manhole steps and step bolts installed after [6 months after theeffective date of the rule] and used in corrosive environments shall beconstructed of or coated with a material that will retard corrosion ofthe step or bolt.(ix) Manhole steps installed after [6 months after the effective date ofthe rule] shall be provided with slip-resistant surfaces, such as corrugated,knurled, or dimpled surfaces.(x) Each step bolt shall be capable of withstanding, without failure, atleast four times the intended load calculated to be applied to the bolt.(xi) If installed after [6 months after the effective date of the rule]a manhole step shall be capable of remaining solidly secured after beingsubjected to a separate application of a horizontal pullout load of 400pounds (1780 N) and a vertical load of 800 pounds (3560 N). Any permanentset in the step resulting from this test may not exceed 0.375 inches (0.95cm). No cracking or fracture of the step, no spalling of the concrete maybe visible. The test loads shall be applied over a width of 3.5 inches(8.9 cm) centered on the step and applied at a uniform rate until the requiredload is reached.(xii) Manhole steps installed before [6 months after the effective dateof the rule] shall be capable of supporting their maximum intended loads.(xiii) Step bolts and manhole steps shall be maintained in a safe conditionand shall be visually inspected before each use.(xiv) Step bolts which are bent greater than 15 degrees below the horizontalshall be removed and replaced with bolts that meet the requirements ofparagraph (h) of this section. Manhole steps that are bent to such an extentas to reduce the step's projection from the wall to less than 4.5 inches(11.4 cm) shall be removed and replaced with steps meeting the requirementsof paragraph (h) of this section or with another climbing device meetingthe requirements of Subpart D of this part.(5) <T3>Qualified employees.</T3> Ladders on triangulation, telecommunication,electrical power, and similar towers, and ladders on poles and structures,including stacks and chimneys, are exempt from the requirements in SubpartD of this part for ladder safety devices and cages if only qualified employeesuse these ladders. Such qualified employees shall meet the following requirements:(i) Qualified employees shall have successfully completed a training orapprenticeship program that included hands-on training in the safe climbingof ladders, step bolts, or manhole steps.(ii) Qualified employees shall have climbing duties as one of their routinework activities.(iii) Qualified employees may not carry objects in their hands while theemployees are in the act of climbing.<ITAG tagnum="29"/><T4>Note._</T4>The provisions for appropriate fall protection in paragraph(g) of this section also apply. See specifically paragraph (g)(2)(v) regardingthe use of fall arrest equipment, work positioning equipment, and travelrestricting equipment.(i) <T3>Hand and portable power tools_</T3>(1) <T3>General. </T3>Paragraph (i)(2) of this section applies to electricequipment connected by cord and plug. Paragraph (i)(3) of this sectioncontains requirements for portable and vehicle-mounted generators usedto supply cord- and plug-connected equipment. Paragraph (i)(4) of thissection contains requirements for hydraulic and pneumatic tools.(2) <T3>Cord- and plug-connected equipment.</T3> (i) Cord- and plug-connectedequipment supplied by premises wiring is covered by Subpart S of this part.(ii) Any cord- and plug-connected equipment supplied by other than premiseswiring shall comply with one of the following in lieu of andSection; 1910.243(a)(5):(A) It shall be equipped with a cord containing an equipment groundingconductor connected to the tool frame and to a means for grounding theother end (however, this option may not be used where the introductionof the ground into the work environment increases the hazard to an employee);(B) It shall be of the double-insulated type conforming to Subpart S ofthis part; or(C) It shall be connected to the power supply through an isolating transformerwith an ungrounded secondary.(3) <T3>Portable and vehicle-mounted generators.</T3> Portable and vehicle-mountedgenerators used to supply cord- and plug-connected equipment shall meetthe following requirements. (i) The generator may only supply equipment located on the generator orthe vehicle and cord- and plug-connected equipment through receptaclesmounted on the generator or the vehicle.(ii) The non-current-carrying metal parts of equipment and the equipmentgrounding conductor terminals of the receptacles shall be bonded to thegenerator frame.(iii) In the case of vehicle-mounted generators, the frame of the generatorshall be bonded to the vehicle frame.(iv) Any neutral conductor shall be bonded to the generator frame.(4) <T3>Hydraulic and pneumatic tools. </T3>(i) Safe operating pressures forhydraulic and pneumatic tools, hoses, valves, pipes, filters, and fittingsmay not be exceeded.(ii) A hydraulic or pneumatic tool used where it may contact exposed liveparts shall have a nonconductive hose.(iii) A pneumatic tool used on energized electrical lines or equipmentor used where it may contact exposed live parts shall have an accumulatorto collect moisture.(iv) Pressure shall be released before connections are broken, unless quickacting, self-closing connectors are used. Hoses may not be kinked.(v) Employees may not use any part of their bodies to locate or attemptto stop a hydraulic leak.(j) <T3>Live-line tools_</T3>(1) <T3>Design of tools. </T3>Live-line tool poles shall be designed and constructedto withstand the following minimum tests:(i) 100,000 volts per foot (3281 volts per centimeter) of length for 5minutes if the toll is made of fiberglass, or(ii) 75,000 volts per foot (2461 volts per centimeter) of length for 3minutes if the tool is made of wood, or(iii) Other equivalent tests.(2) <T3>Condition of tools. </T3>(i) Each live-line tool shall be visuallyinspected for defects before use each day.(ii) If any defect or contamination that could adversely affect the insulatingqualities of the live-line tool is present, the tool shall be removed fromservice.(k) <T3>Materials handling and storage. </T3>Material handling and storageshall conform to the requirements of Subpart N of this part, except asmodified in this paragraph.(1) <T3>Materials storage near energized lines or equipment. </T3>(i) In areasnot restricted to qualified persons only, materials or equipment may notbe stored closer to energized lines or exposed energized parts of equipmentthan the following distances plus an amount providing for the maximum sagand side swing of all conductors and providing for the height and movementof material handling equipment:(A) For lines and equipment energized at 50 kV or less, the distance is10 feet (305 cm).(B) For lines and equipment energized at more than 50 kV, the distanceis 10 feet (305 cm) plus 4 inches (10 cm) for every 10 kV over 50 kV.(ii) In areas restricted to qualified employees, material may not be storedwithin the working space about energized lines or equipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Requirements for the size of the working space are containedin paragraphs (u)(1) and (v)(3) of this section.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Material handling near energized lines or equipment. </T3>Unqualifiedemployees may not bring materials closer to energized lines or exposedenergized parts of equipment than the distances given in paragraphs (k)(1)(i)(A)and (k)(1)(i)(B) of this section.(l) <T3>Working on or near exposed energized parts.</T3> This paragraph appliesto work on exposed live parts, or near enough to them, to expose the employeeto any hazard they present.(1) <T3>General.</T3> Only qualified employees and trainees working under thedirect supervision of a qualified employee may work on or with exposedenergized lines or parts of equipment. Only qualified employees and traineesworking under the direct supervision of a qualified employee may work inareas containing unguarded, uninsulated energized lines or parts of equipmentoperating at 50 volts or more. Electric lines and equipment shall be consideredand treated as energized unless the provisions of paragraph (d) or paragraph(m) of this section have been followed.(2) <T3>Clearances.</T3> No employee may approach or take any conductive objectwithout an insulating handle closer to exposed energized parts than setforth in Table R-6 or R-7, unless:(i) The employee is insulated from the energized part (gloves rated forthe voltage involved are considered insulation of the employee only withregard to the energized part upon which work is being performed), or (ii) The energized part is insulated from the employee and any other conductiveobject at a different potential, or(iii) The employee is insulated from any other conductive object, as duringlive-line bare-hand work.(3) <T3>Working position.</T3> Employees may not work on equipment or linesin any position from which a shock or slip will tend to bring the bodytoward exposed parts which are at a potential different from the employee'sbody.(4) <T3>Making connections.</T3> In connecting deenergized equipment or linesto an energized circuit by means of a conducting wire or device, employeesshall first attach the wire to the deenergized part. When disconnecting,employees shall remove the source end first. Loose conductors shall bekept away from exposed energized parts.(5) <T3>Conductive apparel.</T3> When work is performed in the vicinity ofexposed energized parts of equipment, employees shall remove or rendernonconductive all exposed conductive articles, such as key or watch chains,rings, or wrist watches or bands, if such articles increase the hazardsassociated with inadvertent contact with the energized parts.(6) <T3>Fuse handling.</T3> When fuses must be installed or removed with oneor both terminals energized at more than 300 volts, tools or gloves ratedfor the voltage shall be used. When installing expulsion-type fuses, employeesshall wear safety glasses or safety goggles and shall stand clear of theexhaust path of the fuse barrel.(7) <T3>Covered (noninsulated) conductors.</T3> The requirements of this sectionwhich pertain to the hazards of exposed live parts apply when work is performedin the proximity of covered (noninsulated) wires.(8) <T3>Ungrounded metal parts.</T3> Ungrounded metal parts of equipment ordevices, such as transformer cases and circuit breaker housings, shallbe treated as energized at the highest voltage to which they are exposed,unless these parts are known by test to be free from voltage.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,i1,s25,7,7</C><T4>Table R-6._AC Minimum Clearance From Live Parts</T4><H1>Nominal voltage in kilovolts phase to phase</H1><H1>Distance phase to employee \1\</H1><H2>ft</H2><H2>(cm)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">1 or less </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="27">Avoid contact</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1.1 to 15 <D>2.00 </D><D>(61)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.1 to 35 <D>2.33 </D><D>(71)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">35.1 to 46 <D>2.50 </D><D>(76)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">46.1 to 72.5 <D>3.00 </D><D>(91)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">72.6 to 121 <D>3.33 </D><D>(102)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">138 to 145 <D>3.50 </D><D>(107)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">161 to 169 <D>3.67 </D><D>(112)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">230 to 242 <D>5.00 </D><D>(152)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">345 to 362 \2\ <D>7.00 </D><D>(213)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">500 to 550 \2\ <D>11.00 </D><D>(335)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">700 to 765 \2\ <D>15.00 </D><D>(457)</D><F>\1\ This is the minimum air gap or live-line tool distance to be maintained.The clear live-line tool distance is the distance measured longitudinallyalong the live-line tool from the conductive device or the working endof the tool to the employee's hand.</F><F>\2\ The minimum clearance distance may be reduced to the length of theline insulator, if a smaller clearance is needed to do the work.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table R-7._DC Minimum Clearance From Live Parts</T4><H1>Maximum voltage conductor to ground kilovolts</H1><H1>Distance \1\</H1><T3>,</T3> \2\<H2>ft</H2><H2>(cm)</H2><ITAG tagnum="1">250<D>3.5 </D><D>(107)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">400<D>6.0</D><D>(183)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">500<D>8.5</D><D>(259)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">750<D>16.0</D><D>(488)</D><F>\1\ This is the minimum air gap or clear live-line tool distance tobe maintained. The clear live-line tool distance is the distance measuredlongitudinally along the live-line tool from the conductive device or theworking end of the tool to the employee's hand.</F><F>\2\ The minimum clearance distance may be reduced to the length of theline insulator, if a smaller distance is needed to do the work.</F></ITAG></ITAG>(m) <T3>Deenergizing lines and equipment for employee protection_</T3>(1) <T3>Application. </T3>Paragraph (m) of this section applies to the deenergizationof transmission and distribution lines and equipment for the purpose ofprotecting employees. Control of hazardous energy sources used in the generationof electric energy is covered in paragraph (d) of this section. Conductorsand parts of electric equipment that have been deenergized under proceduresother than those required by paragraph (d) or (m) of this section, as applicable,shall be treated as energized.(2) <T3>General.</T3> (i) If an employee must depend on others to operate switchesto deenergize lines or equipment on which the employee is to work or ifthe employee must secure special authorization before operating such switches,all of the requirements of paragraph (m)(3) of this section shall be observed,in the order given, before work is begun.(ii) If an employee other than the system operator is in sole charge ofthe lines or equipment and of the means of disconnection, that employeeshall also comply with all of the requirements of paragraph (m)(3) of thissection, in the order given, taking the place of the system operator asnecessary.(iii) If an employee is working alone and the means of disconnection areaccessible and visible to the employee, the requirements of paragraphs(m)(3)(ii), (m)(3)(v), (m)(3)(vi), (m)(3)(vii), and (m)(3)(xi) of thissection shall be observed. However, tags required by these provisions neednot be used.(iv) Any disconnecting means that are accessible to persons outside theemployer's control (for example, the general public) shall be renderedinoperable while they are open for the purpose of protecting employees.(3) <T3>Deenergizing lines and equipment. </T3>(i) A designated employee shallmake a request of the system operator to have the particular section ofline or equipment deenergized. The designated employee becomes the employeein charge (as this term is used in paragraph (m)(3) of this section) andis responsible for the clearance.(ii) All switches, disconnectors, jumpers, taps, and other means throughwhich electric energy may be supplied to the particular lines and equipmentto be energized shall be opened. Such means shall be rendered inoperable,as design permits, and appropriately tagged to indicate that employeesare at work.(iii) Automatically and remotely controlled switches that could cause theopened disconnection means to close shall also be tagged at the point ofcontrol and shall be rendered inoperable, if design permits.(iv) Tags shall prohibit operation of the disconnecting means and shallindicate that employees are at work.(v) After the applicable requirements in paragraphs (m)(3)(i) through (m)(3)(iv)of this section have been followed and the employee in charge of the workhas been given a clearance by the system operator, the employee in chargeshall verify by test that the lines and equipment to be worked are deenergized.(v) Protective grounds shall be installed as required by paragraph (n)of this section.(vii) After the applicable requirements of paragraphs (m)(3)(i) through(m)(3)(vi) of this section have been followed, the lines and equipmentinvolved may be worked as deenergized.(viii) If two or more independent crews will be working on the same linesor equipment, each crew shall independently comply with the requirementsin paragraph (m)(3) of this section.(ix) To transfer the clearance, the employee in charge (or, in case offorced absence, the employee's supervisor) shall inform the system operator;employees in the crew shall be informed of the transfer; and the new employeein charge shall be responsible for the clearance.(x) To release a clearance, the employee in charge shall: (A) Notify employees under his or her direction that the clearance is tobe released; (B) Determine that all employees in the crew are clear of the lines andequipment; (C) Determine that all protective grounds installed by the crew have beenremoved; and  (D) Report this information to the system operator, thus releasing theclearance. (xi) Only after all protective grounds have been removed, all protectivetags have been removed from points of disconnection, all crews workingon the lines or equipment have released their clearances, and all employeesare clear of the lines and equipment, may action be initiated to reenergizethe lines or equipment. (xii) The identity of the person requesting tag removal shall be the sameas that of the employee requesting placement, unless responsibility hasbeen transferred under paragraph (m)(3)(ix) of this section. (n) <T3>Grounding for the protection of employees_</T3>(1) <T3>Application. </T3>Paragraph (n) of this section applies to the groundingof transmission and distribution lines and equipment for the purpose ofprotecting employees. Paragraph (n)(4) of this section also applies tothe protective grounding of other equipment as required elsewhere in thissection. (2) <T3>General. </T3>For the employee to work lines or equipment as deenergized,the lines or equipment shall be deenergized under the provisions of paragraph(m) of this section and shall be grounded as specified in paragraphs (n)(3)through (n)(9) of this section. However, if the installation of a groundis impracticable or if the conditions resulting from the installation ofa ground would present greater hazards than working without grounds, thelines and equipment may be treated as deenergized provided all of the followingconditions are met: (i) The lines and equipment have been deenergized under the provisionsof paragraph (m) of this section. (ii) There is no possibility of contact with another energized source.(iii) The hazard of induced voltage is not present. (3) <T3>Location. </T3>Temporary protective grounds shall be placed at thework location. However, if the installation of temporary protective groundsat the work location is infeasible, grounds shall be installed on eachside of the work location and as close to it as possible. (4) <T3>Protective grounding equipment. </T3>(i) Protective grounding equipmentshall be capable of conducting the maximum ground-fault current that couldflow at the point of grounding for the time necessary to clear the fault.This equipment shall have an ampacity greater than or equal to that ofNo. 2 AWG copper. (ii) Protective grounds shall have an impedance to ground low enough topermit prompt operation of protective devices in case of accidental energizingof the lines or equipment. (5) <T3>Testing. </T3>Before any ground is installed, lines and equipment shallbe tested and found absent of voltage, unless a previously installed groundis present. (6) <T3>Order of connection. </T3>When grounds are to be attached to linesor equipment, the ground-end connection shall be attached first, and thenthe other end shall be attached by means of live-line tools or other insulateddevices. (7) <T3>Order of removal. </T3>When grounds are to be removed, the groundingdevice shall first be removed from the lines or equipment using live-linetools or other insulated devices. (8) <T3>Additional precautions. </T3>When work is performed on a cable at alocation remote from the cable terminal, the cable may not be groundedat the cable terminal if there is a possibility of hazardous transfer ofpotential should a fault occur. (9) <T3>Removal of grounds for test. </T3>Grounds may be removed temporarilyduring tests. During the test procedure, the previously grounded linesand equipment shall be considered as energized.(o) <T3>Testing and test facilities_</T3>(1) <T3>Application. </T3>Paragraph (o) of this section provides for safe workpractices for high-voltage and high-power testing performed in laboratories,in shops, and in substations under the exclusive control of an electricutility, in the field, and on lines at sites accessible only to qualifiedpersonnel as part of the utility operation. It applies only to testinginvolving interim measurements utilizing high voltage, high power, or combinationsof both, as opposed to testing involving continuous measurements as inroutine metering, relaying, and normal line work.(2) <T3>General requirements. </T3>(i) The employer shall establish and enforceadditional work practices for the protection of workers from the hazardsof high-voltage or high-power testing at all test areas, temporary andpermanent. Such work practices shall include, as a minimum, test area guarding,grounding, and the safe use of measuring and control circuits. A meansproviding for periodic safety checks of field test areas shall also beincluded. (See paragraph (o)(6) of this section.)(ii) Employees shall be trained in safe work practices upon their initialassignment to the test area, with periodic reviews and updates providedon a continuing basis.(3) <T3>Guarding of test areas. </T3>(i) Permanent test areas shall be guardedby walls, fences, or barriers.(ii) In field testing, or at a temporary test site where permanent fencesand gates are not provided, the test area shall be guarded by the use ofdistinctively colored safety tape which is supported approximately waisthigh and to which safety signs are attached, or the test area shall beguarded by one or more test observers stationed so that the entire areacan be monitored. These barriers shall be removed when the protection theyprovide is no longer needed.(iii) Guarding shall be provided within test areas to control access totest equipment or apparatus under test likely to become energized as partof the testing by either direct or inductive coupling, in order to preventaccidental employee contact with energized parts.(4) <T3>Grounding practices. </T3>(i) The employer shall establish and implementsafe grounding practices for the particular test facility. All conductiveparts accessible to the test operator during the time the equipment isoperating at high voltage shall be maintained at ground potential exceptfor portions of the equipment that are isolated from the test operatorby guarding. Wherever ungrounded terminals of test equipment or apparatusunder test may be present, they shall be treated as energized until determinedby tests to be deenergized.(ii) Visible grounds shall be applied, either automatically or manuallywith properly insulated tools, to the high-voltage circuits after theyare deenergized and before work is performed on the circuit or item orapparatus under test. Common ground connections shall be solidly connectedto the test equipment and the apparatus under test.(iii) If high currents are intentionally employed in the testing, an isolatedground-return conductor system shall be provided so that no intentionalpassage of current, with its attendant voltage rise, is permitted in theground grid or in the earth.(iv) In tests in which the grounding of test equipment by means of theequipment grounding conductor located in the equipment power cord cannotbe used due to increased hazards to test personnel or the prevention ofsatisfactory measurements, an equivalent safety ground shall be providedand the condition clearly indicated in the test set-up.(v) When the test area is entered after deenergization, a ground shallbe placed on the high-voltage terminal and any other exposed terminals.High capacitance equipment or apparatus shall be discharged through a resistorrated for the available energy. A direct ground shall be applied to theexposed terminals, when the stored energy drops to a level at which itis safe to do so.(vi) If test trailers or vans are used in field testing, the chassis shallbe grounded. Protection against hazardous touch potentials with respectto the vehicle, instrument panels, and other conductive parts accessibleto employees shall be provided by bonding, insulation, or isolation.(5) <T3>Control and measuring circuits. </T3>(i) Control wiring, meter connections,test leads and cables may not be run from a test area unless they are containedin a grounded metallic sheath and terminated in a grounded metallic enclosure,or unless other precautions are taken to ensure equivalent safety.(ii) Meters and other instruments with accessible terminals or parts shallbe isolated from test personnel to protect against hazards arising fromsuch terminals and parts inadvertently becoming energized during testing.Where this isolation is provided by test equipment being located in metalcompartments with viewing windows, interlocks shall be provided to interruptthe power supply if the compartment cover is opened.(iii) The routing and connections of temporary wiring shall be made secureagainst damage, accidental interruptions and other hazards. To the maximumextent possible, signal, control, ground, and power cables shall be keptseparate.(iv) If employees will be present in the test area during testing, a testobserver who is capable of implementing the immediate deenergization oftest circuits for safety purposes shall be present.(6) <T3>Safety check. </T3>(i) Safety practices governing employee work attemporary or field test areas shall provide for a routine check of suchtest areas for safety at the beginning of each group of continuous tests.(ii) The test operator in charge shall conduct routine safety checks oftemporary or field test facilities before each group of continuous tests,to verify at least the following conditions:(A) That barriers and guards are in workable condition and are properlyplaced to isolate hazardous areas;(B) That system test status signals, if used, are in operable condition;(C) That test power disconnects are clearly marked and readily availablein emergency;(D) That ground connections are clearly identifiable; (E) That personal protective equipment is provided and used as requiredby Subpart I of this Part and by this section;(F) That signal, ground, and power cables are properly separated.(p) <T3>Mechanical equipment</T3>_(1) <T3>General requirements. </T3>(i) The critical safety components of mechanicalelevating and rotating equipment shall be inspected on each shift on whichsuch equipment is used.(ii) No vehicular equipment having an obstructed view to the rear may beoperated on off-highway jobsites where any employee is exposed to the hazardscreated by the moving vehicle, unless:(A) The vehicle has a reverse signal alarm audible above the surroundingnoise level, or (B) The vehicle is backed up only when a designated employee signals thatit is safe to do so.(iii) The operator of an electric line truck may not leave his or her positionat the controls while a load is suspended if doing so might endanger anyemployee.(iv) Rubber-tired, self-propelled scrapers, rubber-tired front-end loaders,rubber-tired dozers, wheel-type agricultural and industrial tractors, crawler-typetractors, crawler-type loaders, and motor graders, with or without attachments,shall have roll-over protective structures that meet the requirements ofSubpart W of Part 1926 of this chapter.(2) <T3>Outriggers. </T3>(i) Vehicular equipment, if provided with outriggers,shall be operated with the outriggers extended and firmly set as necessaryfor the stability of the specific configuration of the equipment. Outriggersmay not be extended or retracted outside of clear view of the operatorunless all employees are outside the range of possible equipment motion.(ii) If the work area or the terrain precludes the use of outriggers, theequipment may be operated only within the maximum load ratings as specifiedby the manufacturer for the particular configuration of the equipment withoutoutriggers.(3) <T3>Applied loads. </T3>Lifting equipment shall be used within its maximumload rating for the conditions under which the work is being done.(4) <T3>Operations near energized lines or equipment. </T3>(i) Mechanical equipmentshall be operated so that the clearance distances of Tables R-6 and R-7are maintained from exposed energized lines and equipment.(ii) If it is difficult for the operator to accurately determine the distancebetween the equipment and the energized parts, another person shall observethe clearance and give timely warnings when the minimum clearance distanceis approached.(iii) If it is possible for the mechanical equipment or any attached loadto be taken closer to exposed energized lines or equipment than the clearancespecified in Table R-6 or R-7, the operation shall also comply with oneof the following provisions:(A) The equipment and attached load shall be treated as energized by employeeson the ground. Employees on the ground may not contact the equipment orload unless they use electrical protective equipment. (B) The equipment shall be insulated for the voltage involved. The equipmentshall be positioned so that its uninsulated portions cannot approach thelines or equipment any closer than the clearance specified in Table R-6or R-7. (q) <T3>Overhead lines.</T3> This paragraph provides additional requirementsfor work performed on or near overhead lines and equipment. (1) <T3>General.</T3> (i) Before elevated structures, such as poles or towers,are subjected to such stresses as climbing or the installation or removalof equipment may impose, the employer shall ascertain that the structuresare capable of sustaining the additional or unbalanced stresses. If thepole or other structure cannot withstand the loads which will be imposed,it shall be braced or otherwise supported to prevent failure. (ii) When poles are set, moved, or removed near overhead conductors, directcontact of the pole with the energized conductors shall be avoided. Employeesshall wear electrical protective equipment or use insulated devices whenhandling poles, and the employees may not contact the poles with uninsulatedparts of their bodies. (iii) Pole holes shall be attended or physically guarded in areas whereemployees are working. (2) <T3>Installing and removing overhead lines.</T3> The following provisionsapply to the installation and removal of overhead conductors or cable.(i) Precautions, such as the use of barriers or the tension stringing method,shall be taken to minimize the possibility that conductors and cables beinginstalled or removed will contact energized lines or equipment. (A) Conductors, cables, and pulling and tensioning equipment shall be consideredas energized when the conductor or cable is being installed close enoughto energized conductors that any of the following failures could energizethe pulling or tensioning equipment or the wire or cable being installed:(<T3>1</T3>) Failure of the pulling or tensioning equipment, (<T3>2</T3>) Failure of the wire or cable being pulled, or (<T3>3</T3>) Failure of the previously installed lines or equipment. (B) Employees working on poles or structures or working in aerial liftsneed not treat the installed conductors as energized if the conductorsare grounded at the work locations. (ii) If the conductors being installed or removed cross over energizedconductors in excess of 600 volts, the automatic-reclosing feature forthe energized lines shall be made inoperative. (iii) Before lines are installed parallel to existing energized lines,the employer shall make a determination of the voltage to be induced inthe new lines. If the lines being installed are subject to the inductionof a hazardous voltage, the following requirements also apply: (A) Each bare conductor shall be grounded in increments so that no pointis more than 2 miles (3.22 km) from a ground. (B) The grounds required in paragraph (q)(2)(iii)(A) of this section shallbe left in place until the conductor installation is completed betweendead ends. (C) The grounds required in paragraph (q)(2)(iii)(A) of this section shallbe removed as the last phase of aerial cleanup. (D) If employees are working on bare conductors, grounds shall also beinstalled at each location where these employees are working, and groundsshall be installed at all open dead-end or catch-off points or the nextadjacent structure. (E) If two bare conductors are being spliced, the conductors to be splicedshall be bonded and grounded. (F) When grounds are to be attached to lines or equipment, the ground-endconnection shall be attached first, and then the other end shall be attachedby means of live-line tools or other insulated devices, unless no inducedvoltage hazard is present. (G) When grounds are to be removed, the grounding device shall first beremoved from the lines or equipment using live-line tools or other insulateddevices, unless the induced voltage hazard is no longer present. (iv) Reel handling equipment, including pulling and tensioning devices,shall be in safe operating condition and shall be leveled and aligned.(v) Load ratings of stringing lines, pulling lines, conductor grips, load-bearinghardware and accessories, rigging, and hoists may not be exceeded.(vi) Pulling lines and accessories shall be repaired or replaced when defective.(vii) Conductor grips may not be used on wire rope, unless the grip isspecifically designed for this application.(viii) Reliable communications between reel tender and pulling rig operatorshall be maintained. The pulling rig may only be operated when it is safeto do so.(ix) While the conductor or pulling line is being pulled (in motion) witha power-driven device, employees are not permitted directly under overheadoperations or on the cross arm, except as necessary to guide the stringingsock or board over or through the stringing sheave.(3) <T3>Live-line bare-hand work. </T3>In addition to other applicable provisionscontained in this section, the following requirements apply to live-linebare-hand work:(i) Before using or supervising the use of the live-line bare-hand techniqueon energized circuits, employees shall be trained in the technique andin the safety requirements of paragraph (q)(3) of this section. Employeesshall receive refresher training as necessary.(ii) Before any employee uses the live-line bare-hand technique on energizedhigh-voltage conductors or parts, the following information shall be ascertained:(A) The nominal voltage rating of the circuit on which the work is to beperformed,(B) The clearances to ground of lines and other energized parts on whichwork is to be performed, and(C) The voltage limitations of equipment to be used.(iii) The insulated equipment and tools used shall be designed, tested,and intended for live-line bare-hand work. Tools and equipment shall bekept clean and dry.(iv) The automatic-reclosing feature of circuit-interrupting devices protectingthe lines shall be made inoperative.(v) Work may not be performed when adverse weather conditions (for example,thunderstorms in the immediate vicinity or snow or ice storms) make thework unusually hazardous. Additionally, work may not be performed whenwinds reduce the phase-to-phase or phase-to-ground clearances at the worklocation below that specified in paragraph (q)(3)(xii) of this section,unless the grounded objects and other lines and equipment are covered byinsulating guards.(vi) A conductive bucket liner or other conductive device shall be providedfor bonding the insulated aerial device to the energized line or equipment.(A) The employee shall be connected to the bucket liner or other conductivedevice by use of conductive shoes, leg clips, or other means.(B) Where necessary, electrostatic shielding designed for the voltage beingworked shall be provided.(vii) Before the employee contacts the energized part, the conductive bucketliner or other conductive device shall be bonded to the energized conductorby means of a positive connection. This connection shall remain attachedto the energized conductor until the work on the energized circuit is completed.(viii) Aerial lifts to be used for live-line bare-hand work shall havedual controls (lower and upper) as follows:(A) The upper controls shall be within easy reach of the employee in thebasket. On a two-basket-type lift, access to the controls shall be withineasy reach from either basket.(B) The lower set of controls shall be located near the base of the boom,and they shall be so designed that they can override operation of the equipmentat any time.(ix) Ground level lift controls may not be operated with an employee inthe lift, except in case of emergency.(x) Before employees are elevated into the work position, all controls(ground level and bucket) shall be checked to determine that they are inproper working condition.(xi) Before the boom of an aerial lift is elevated, the body of the truckshall be grounded, or the body of the truck shall be barricaded and treatedas energized.(xii) A boom-current test shall be made before work is started each day,each time during the day when higher voltage is encountered, and when changedconditions indicate a need for an additional test. This test shall consistof placing the bucket in contact with an energized source equal to thevoltage to be encountered for a minimum of 3 minutes. The leakage currentmay not exceed 1 microampere per kilovolt of nominal phase-to-ground voltage.Work operations shall be immediately suspended upon indication of a malfunctionin the equipment.(xiii) The minimum clearance distances specified in Table R-8 shall bemaintained from all grounded objects and from lines and equipment at apotential different from that to which the live-line bare-hand equipmentis bonded, unless such grounded objects and other lines and equipment arecovered by insulating guards.(xiv) While an employee approaches, leaves, or bonds to an energized circuit,the minimum distances in Table R-8 shall be maintained between the employeeand any grounded parts, including the lower boom and portions of the truck.(xv) While the bucket is positioned alongside an energized bushing or insulatorstring, the minimum phase-to-ground clearances of Table R-8 shall be maintainedbetween all parts of the bucket and the grounded end of the bushing orinsulator string.  (xvi) Hand lines may not be used between the bucket and the boom or betweenthe bucket and the ground. However, non-conductive-type hand lines maybe used from conductor to ground if not supported from the bucket. Ropesused for live-line bare-hand work may not be used for other purposes. (xvii) Uninsulated equipment or material may not be passed between a poleor structure and an aerial lift while an employee working from the bucketis bonded to an energized part.  (xviii) A minimum clearance table reflecting the clearance distances listedin Table R-8 shall be printed on a plate of durable non-conductive material.This table shall be mounted so as to be visible to the operator of theboom.  (xix) A non-conductive measuring device shall be available to assist employeesin maintaining the required clearance distance.  <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,i1,s300,10,10,10,10</C><T4>Table R-8._AC Minimum Clearance for Live-Line Bare-Hand Work </T4><H1>Nominal voltage in kilovolts phase to phase</H1><H1>Distance</H1><H2>Phase to ground</H2><H3>feet</H3><H3>(cm)</H3><H2>Phase to phase</H2><H2>feet</H2><H3>(cm)</H3><ITAG tagnum="1">1.0 to 15.0<D>2.00</D><D>(61)</D><D>2.00</D><D>(61)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">15.1 to 35.0<D>2.33</D><D>(71)</D><D>2.33</D><D>(71)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">35.1 to 46.0<D>2.50</D><D>(76)</D><D>2.50</D><D>(76)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">46.1 to 72.5<D>3.00</D><D>(91)</D><D>3.00</D><D>(91)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">72.6 to 121<D>3.33</D><D>(102)</D><D>4.50</D><D>(137)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">138 to 145<D>3.50</D><D>(107)</D><D>5.00</D><D>(152)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">161 to 169<D>3.67</D><D>(112)</D><D>5.50</D><D>(168)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">230 to 242<D>5.00</D><D>(152)</D><D>8.33</D><D>(254)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">345 to 362 \1\<D>7.00</D><D>(213)</D><D>13.33</D><D>(610)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">500 to 552 \1\<D>11.00</D><D>(335)</D><D>20.00</D><D>(406)</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">700 to 800 \1\<D>15.00</D><D>(457)</D><D>31.00</D><D>(945)</D><F>\1\ The minimum phase-to-ground clearance distance may be reduced tothe length of the line insulator, if a smaller distance is needed to dothe work. The minimum phase-to-phase clearance distance may be reducedto 1.73 times the length of the line insulator, if a smaller clearanceis needed to do the work.</F></ITAG></ITAG> (4) <T3>Towers and structures</T3>. The following requirements apply to workperformed on towers or other structures which support overhead lines.  (i) No employee may be under a tower or structure while work is in progress,except as necessary to assist employees working above.  (ii) Tag lines or other similar devices shall be used to maintain controlof tower sections being raised or positioned, unless the use of such deviceswould create a greater hazard.   (iii) The loadline may not be detached from a member or section until theload is safely secured. (iv) Except during emergency power restoration procedures, work shall bediscontinued when adverse weather conditions (for example, thunderstormsin the immediate vicinity, high winds, or snow or ice storms) make thework unusually hazardous. (r) <T3>Line-clearance tree-trimming operations</T3>. This paragraph providesadditional requirements for line-clearance tree-trimming operations andfor equipment used in these operations. (1) <T3>Electrical hazards</T3>. This paragraph does not apply to qualifiedemployees. (i) Before any employee climbs, enters, or works around any tree, a closeinspection shall be made to determine whether an electric conductor passeswithin 10 feet of the tree. (ii) Employees other than line-clearance tree trimmers shall maintain thefollowing minimum clearances from energized conductors and equipment: (A) For lines and equipment energized at 50 kV or less, the minimum clearancedistance is 10 feet (305 cm). (B) For lines and equipment energized at more than 50 kV, the minimum clearancedistance is 10 feet (305 cm) plus 4 inches (10 cm) for every 10 kV over50 kV. (iii) Only a line-clearance tree trimmer may perform the work if it isfound that an electrical hazard exists or if parts of the trees are within10 feet (305 cm) of exposed energized overhead conductors or equipment.(iv) There shall be a second line-clearance tree trimmer within normalvoice communication under any of the following conditions: (A) If the line-clearance tree trimmer is to approach more closely than10 feet (305 cm) any conductor or electrical apparatus energized at morethan 750 volts, or(B) If branches or limbs being removed are closer to lines energized atmore than 750 volts than the distances listed in Tables R-6 and R-7 (excludingthe notes to those tables), or(C) If roping is necessary to remove branches or limbs from such conductorsor apparatus.(v) Line clearance tree trimmers shall maintain the clearances from energizedconductors given in Tables R-6 and R-7, excluding the notes to those tables.(vi) Branches that are contacting exposed energized conductors or equipmentor that are within the distances specified in Table R-6 or R-7 (excludingthe notes to those tables) may be removed only through the use of insulatingequipment.(vii) Ladders, platforms, and aerial devices may not be brought closerto an energized part than the distances listed in Tables R-6 and R-7 (excludingthe notes to those tables).(viii) Line-clearance tree-trimming operations may not be performed duringstorms or under emergency conditions.(2) <T3>Brush chippers. </T3>(i) Brush chippers shall be equipped with a lockingdevice in the ignition system. (ii) Access panels for maintenance and adjustment of the chipper bladesand associated drive train shall be in place and secure during operationof the equipment.(iii) Brush chippers not equipped with a mechanical infeed system shallbe equipped with an infeed hopper of length sufficient to prevent employeesfrom contacting the blades or knives of the machine during operation.(iv) Trailer chippers detached from trucks shall be chocked or otherwisesecured. (v) Employees in the immediate area of an operating chipper feed tableshall wear eye and face protection meeting the requirements of SubpartI of this part.(3) <T3>Sprayers and related equipment. </T3>(i) Walking and working surfacesof sprayers and related equipment shall be covered with slip-resistantmaterial. If slippery conditions cannot be eliminated completely, slip-resistantfootwear or handrails and stair rails meeting the requirements of SubpartD may be used instead of slip-resistant material.(ii) Equipment on which employees stand to spray while the vehicle is inmotion shall be equipped with guardrails around the working area. The guardrailshall be constructed in accordance with Subpart D of this part.(4) <T3>Stump cutters. </T3>(i) Stump cutters shall be equipped with enclosuresor guards to protect employees. (ii) The stump cutter operator and others in the immediate area of stumpgrinding operations shall wear eye and face protection meeting the requirementsof Subpart I of this part.(5) <T3>Gasoline-driven power saws. </T3>Gasoline-driven power saw operationsshall meet the requirements of andSection;1910.266(c)(5) and the following:(i) Power saws weighing more than 15 pounds (6.8 kilograms, service weight)that are used in trees shall be supported by a separate line, except whenwork is performed from an aerial lift and except during topping or removingoperations where no supporting limb will be available. Proper clearancedistance from energized lines, as provided elsewhere in this section, shallbe maintained at all times.(ii) Power saws shall be equipped with a control that will return the sawto idling speed when released.(iii) Power saws shall be equipped with a clutch and shall be so adjustedthat the clutch will not engage the chain drive at idling speed.(iv) The operator shall have secure footing when starting the saw. Dropstarting of saws over 15 pounds (6.8 kg) is permitted outside of the bucketof an aerial lift only if the area below the lift is clear of personnel.(v) Power saw engines may be started and operated only when all co-workersare clear of the saw. (vi) Power saws may not be running when being carried up into a tree byan employee. (vii) Power saw engines shall be stopped for all cleaning, refueling, adjustments,and repairs to the saw or motor, except as the manufacturer's servicingprocedures require otherwise.(6) <T3>Backpack power units for use in pruning and clearing. </T3>(i) Whilea backpack power unit is running, no one other than the operator may bewithin 10 feet (305 cm) of the cutting head of a brush saw. (ii) A backpack power unit shall be equipped with a quick shutoff switchreadily accessible to the operator. (iii) Backpack power unit engines shall be stopped for all cleaning, refueling,adjustments, and repairs to the saw or motor, except as the manufacturer'sprocedures require otherwise. (7) <T3>Rope. </T3>(i) Climbing ropes shall be used by employees working aloftin trees. These ropes shall have a minimum diameter of 0.5 inch (1.2 cm)with a minimum breaking strength of 2300 pounds (10.2 kN). Synthetic ropeshall have elasticity of not more than 7 percent. (ii) Rope made unsafe by damage or defect may not be used. (iii) Rope shall be stored away from cutting edges and sharp tools. Ropecontact with corrosive chemicals, gas, and oil shall be avoided. (iv) When stored, rope shall be coiled and piled, or shall be suspended,so that air can circulate through the coils. (v) Rope ends shall be secured to prevent their unraveling. (vi) Climbing rope may not be spliced to effect repair. (vii) If there is a possibility that rope may be taken closer to exposedenergized lines than the clearance distance specified in Table R-6 or R-7,the rope shall be treated as energized by employees on the ground or incontact with ground. (s) <T3>Communication facilities_</T3>(1) <T3>Microwave transmission. </T3>(i) Employees may not look into an openwaveguide or antenna which is connected to an energized microwave source.(ii) If the electromagnetic radiation level within an accessible area associatedwith microwave communications systems exceeds the radiation protectionguide given in andSection; 1910.97, the area shall be posted with the warningsymbol described in andSection; 1910.97(a)(3). The lower half of the warningsymbol shall include the following or its equivalent: ``Radiation in this area may exceed hazardous limitations and special precautionsare required. Obtain specific instruction before entering.'' (iii) When an employee works in an area where the electromagnetic radiationcould exceed the radiation protection guide, the employer shall institutemeasures that ensure that the employee's exposure is not greater than thatpermitted by that guide. Such measures may include administrative and engineeringcontrols and personal protective equipment. (2) <T3>Power line carrier. </T3>Power line carrier work, including work onequipment used for coupling carrier current to power line conductors, shallbe performed in accordance with the requirements of this section pertainingto work on energized lines.(t) <T3>Underground electrical installations.</T3> This paragraph providesadditional requirements for work on underground electrical installations.(1)<T3> Access.</T3> Ladders or other climbing devices shall be used to enterand exit manholes and subsurface vaults exceeding 4 feet (122 cm) in depth.Employees may not climb into or out of manholes or vaults by stepping oncables or hangers.(2)<T3> Lowering equipment into manholes.</T3> Equipment used to lower materialsand tools into manholes or vaults shall be capable of supporting the weightto be lowered and shall be checked for defects before use. Before hot solderor other hot compounds are lowered into the opening for a manhole or vault,employees working in the manhole or vault shall be clear of the area directlyunder the opening.(3)<T3> Attendants for manholes.</T3> (i) While work is being performed ina manhole containing energized electric equipment, an employee shall beavailable on the surface in the immediate vicinity to render emergencyassistance.(ii) Occasionally, the employee on the surface may briefly enter a manholeto provide assistance, other than emergency.(iii) For the purpose of inspection, housekeeping, taking readings, orsimilar work, an employee working alone may enter, for brief periods oftime, a manhole where energized cables or equipment are in service, ifsuch work can be performed safely.(iv) Communications (visual, voice, or signal line) shall be maintainedamong all employees involved in the job.(4) <T3>Duct rods.</T3> If duct rods are used, they shall be installed in thedirection presenting the least hazard to employees. An employee shall bestationed at the far end of the duct line being rodded to ensure that therequired clearance distances are maintained.(5) <T3>Moving cables.</T3> Energized cables that are to be moved shall becarefully inspected for defects and moved only under the direct supervisionof a qualified employee.(6)<T3> Multiple cables.</T3> When multiple cables are present in a work area,the cable to be worked shall be identified by electrical means, unlessits identity is obvious by reasons of distinctive appearance or location.Cables other than the one being worked shall be protected from damage.(7)<T3> Defective cables.</T3> Where cables in manholes appear defective bythe presence of abnormalities which could lead to or be an indication ofan impending fault (such as oil or compound leaking from cable or joints,broken cable sheaths or joint sleeves, hot localized surface temperaturesof cables or joints, or swollen joints whose circumference exceeds 3.5times the standard sleeve size diameter), no employee may work in the manholewhile the defective cable is energized. However, if the defective cableor splice cannot be deenergized due to service load conditions, employeesmay enter the manhole provided they are protected from the possible effectsof a failure by shields or other devices that are capable of containingthe adverse effects of a fault in the joint.(8)<T3> Sheath continuity.</T3> When work is performed on buried cable oron cable in manholes, metallic sheath continuity shall be maintained.(u) <T3>Substations. </T3>This paragraph provides additional requirements forsubstations and for work performed in them.(1) <T3>Access and working space. </T3>Sufficient access and working spaceshall be provided and maintained about electric equipment to permit readyand safe operation and maintenance of such equipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Guidelines for the dimensions of access and workspace aboutelectric equipment in substations are contained in American National Standard_NationalElectrical Safety Code, ANSI C2-1987. Installations meeting the ANSI provisionscomply with paragraph (u)(1) of this section.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Draw-out-type circuit breakers. </T3>When draw-out-type circuit breakersare removed or inserted, the breaker shall be in the open position. Thecontrol circuit shall also be rendered inoperative, if the design of theequipment permits.(3) <T3>Substation fences. </T3>(i) Conductive fences around substations shallbe grounded. When a substation fence is expanded or a section is removed,fence grounding continuity shall be maintained, and bonding shall be usedto prevent electrical discontinuity.(ii) Gates to unattended substations shall be kept locked.(4) <T3>Guarding of energized parts. </T3>(i) Rooms and spaces in which electricsupply conductors or equipment are installed shall be so enclosed withinfences, screens, partitions, or walls as to minimize the possibility thatunqualified persons will enter. Entrances not under the observation ofan attendant shall be kept locked. Signs warning unqualified persons tokeep out shall be displayed at entrances.(ii) Guards shall be provided around all live parts operating above 150volts to ground without an insulating covering, unless the location ofthe live parts gives sufficient horizontal or vertical or a combinationof these clearances to minimize the possibility of accidental employeecontact.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Guidelines for the dimensions of clearance distances aboutelectric equipment in substations are contained in American National Standard_NationalElectrical Safety Code, ANSI C2-1987. Installations meeting the ANSI provisionscomply with paragraph (u)(4)(ii) of this section.</ITAG>(iii) Except for fuse replacement or other necessary access by qualifiedpersons, the guarding of energized parts within a compartment shall bemaintained during operation and maintenance functions to prevent accidentalcontact with energized parts and to prevent tools or other equipment frombeing dropped on energized parts.(iv) When guards are removed from energized equipment, barriers shall beinstalled around the work area to prevent employees who are not workingon the equipment, but who are in the area, from contacting the exposedlive parts.(5) <T3>Substation entry. </T3>(i) Upon entering an attended substation, employeesother than those regularly working in the station shall report their presenceto the employee in charge in order to receive information on special systemconditions affecting employee safety.(ii) The job briefing required by paragraph (c) of this section shall coversuch additional subjects as the location of energized equipment in or adjacentto the work area and the limits of any deenergized work area.(v) <T3>Power generation. </T3>This paragraph provides additional requirementsand related work practices for power generating plants.(1) <T3>Interlocks and other safety devices. </T3>(i) Interlocks and othersafety devices shall be maintained in a safe, operable condition.(ii) No interlock or other safety device may be modified to defeat itsfunction, except for test, repair, or adjustment of the device.(2) <T3>Changing brushes. </T3>Before exciter or generator brushes are changedwhile the generator is in service, the exciter or generator field shallbe checked to determine that a ground condition does not exist. If theequipment has ground protecting devices, the protective devices shall bedisconnected and tagged before brushes are changed.(3) <T3>Access and working space. </T3>Sufficient access and working spaceshall be provided and maintained about electric equipment to permit readyand safe operation and maintenance of such equipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Guidelines for the dimensions of access and workspace aboutelectric equipment in generating stations are contained in American NationalStandard_National Electrical Safety Code, ANSI C2-1987. Installations meetingthe ANSI provisions comply with paragraph (v)(3) of this section.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Guarding of energized parts. </T3>(i) Rooms and spaces in which electricsupply conductors or equipment are installed shall be so enclosed withinfences, screens, partitions, or walls as to minimize the possibility thatunqualified persons will enter. Entrances not under the observation ofan attendant shall be kept locked. Signs warning unqualified persons tokeep out shall be displayed at entrances.(ii) Guards shall be provided around all live parts operating above 150volts to ground without an insulating covering, unless the location ofthe live parts gives sufficient horizontal or vertical or a combinationof these clearances to minimize the possibility of accidental employeecontact.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Guidelines for the dimensions of clearance distances aboutelectric equipment in generating stations are contained in American NationalStandard_National Electrical Safety Code, ANSI C2-1987. Installations meetingthe ANSI provisions comply with paragraph (v)(4)(ii) of this section.</ITAG>(iii) Except for fuse replacement or other necessary access by qualifiedpersons, the guarding of energized parts within a compartment shall bemaintained during operation and maintenance functions to prevent accidentalcontact with energized parts and to prevent tools or other equipment frombeing dropped on energized parts.(iv) When guards are removed from energized equipment, barriers shall beinstalled around the work area to prevent employees who are not workingon the equipment but who are in the area from contacting the exposed liveparts.(5) <T3>Breaking pressure connections. </T3>(i) Before a valve bonnet or stuffingbox gland is moved or removed and before a flanged joint or other pressureconnection is broken, if hazardous pressures or temperatures may exist,the line shall be isolated, drained, and locked out or tagged in accordancewith paragraph (d) of this section.(ii) The bolts, nuts, or other fasteners shall then be loosened; and, beforethey are removed, special care shall be exercised to ensure that the connectionis not under pressure.(6) <T3>Water or steam spaces. </T3>(i) A designated employee shall inspectconditions before work is permitted and after its completion. Eye protectionshall be worn at all times when condenser, heater or boiler tubes are beingcleaned.(ii) Where it is necessary for employees to work near tube ends duringcleaning, shielding shall be installed.(7) <T3>Chemical cleaning of boilers and pressure vessels. </T3>The followingrequirements apply to chemical cleaning of boilers and pressure vessels:(i) Areas where chemical cleaning is in progress shall be cordoned offto restrict access during cleaning. Additionally, the area shall be postedwith signs restricting entry and warning of the hazard to health and thehazards of fire and explosion. Smoking, welding, and other possible ignitionsources are prohibited in these restricted areas.(ii) The number of personnel in the restricted area shall be limited tothose necesary to accomplish the task safely.(iii) There shall be ready access to clean water or temporary emergencyshowers for emergency use.(iv) Employees in restricted areas shall wear protective equipment meetingthe requirements of Subpart I of this part and including, but not limitedto, protective clothing, boots, googles, and gloves.(8) <T3>Chlorine systems. </T3>(i) Chlorine system enclosures shall be postedwith signs restricting entry and warning of the hazard to health and thehazards of fire and explosion.(ii) Only designated employees may enter the restricted area. Additionally,the number of personnel shall be limited to those necessary to safely accomplishthe task.(iii) Emergency repair kits shall be available near the shelter or enclosureto allow for the prompt repair of leaks in chlorine lines, equipment orcontainers.(iv) Before normal repair procedures are started, chlorine tanks, pipes,and equipment shall be purged with dry air and isolated from other sourcesof chlorine.(v) The employer shall ensure that precautions are taken to prevent theaccidental mixing of chlorine with materials which would react with thechlorine in a dangerously exothermic or other hazardous manner.(9) <T3>Boilers. </T3>(i) Before internal furnace or ash hopper repair workis started, overhead areas shall be inspected for possible falling objects.If the hazard of falling objects exists, overhead protection such as plankingor nets shall be provided.(ii) When opening an operating boiler door, employees shall stand clearof the opening of the door to avoid the heat blast and gases which mayescape from the boiler.(10) <T3>Turbine generators. </T3>(i) Smoking and other ignition sources areprohibited near the hydrogen or hydrogen sealing systems, and signs warningof the danger of explosion and fire shall be posted.(ii) Excessive hydrogen makeup or abnormal loss of pressure shall be consideredas an emergency and shall be corrected.(iii) A sufficient quantity of inert gas shall be available to purge thehydrogen from the largest generator.(11) <T3>Coal and ash handling. </T3>(i) Only designated persons may operaterailroad equipment. (ii) Before a locomotive or locomotive crane is moved, a warning shallbe given to employees in the area.(iii) Employees engaged in switching or dumping cars may not use theirfeet to line up drawheads.(iv) Drawheads and knuckles may not be shifted while locomotives or carsare in motion.(v) When a car is stopped for unloading, the car shall be held in placeby blocks.(vi) An emergency means of stopping dump operations shall be provided atrailcar dumps.(vii) Employees who work in coal- or ash-handling conveyor areas shallbe trained and knowledgeable in conveyor operation and in the requirementsof paragraphs (v)(11)(viii) through (v)(11)(xi) of this section.(viii) Employees may not ride a coal-or ash-handling conveyor belt at anytime. Employees may not cross over the conveyor belt, except at walkways,unless the conveyor's energy source has been deenergized and has been lockedout or tagged in accordance with paragraph (d) of this section.(ix) A conveyor that could cause injury when started may not be starteduntil personnel in the area are alerted by a signal or by a designatedperson that the conveyor is about to start.(A) If a conveyor that could cause injury when started is automaticallycontrolled or is controlled from a remote location, an audible device shallbe provided that can be clearly heard at all points along the conveyorwhere personnel may be present. The warning device shall be actuated bythe device starting the conveyor and shall continue for a period of timebefore the conveyor starts that is long enough to allow employees to moveclear of the conveyor system. A visual warning may be used in place ofthe audible device if it would provide an equally effective warning inparticular circumstances.(B) If the system's function would be seriously hindered by the requiredtime delay, or if the intent of the warning could be misinterpreted, warningsigns shall be provided in place of the audible warning device. The warningsigns shall be clear, concise, and legible and shall indicate that conveyorsand allied equipment may be started at any time, that danger exists, andthat personnel must keep clear. These warning signs shall be provided alongthe conveyor at areas not guarded by position or location.(x) Remotely and automatically controlled conveyors, and conveyors thathave operating stations which are not manned or which are beyond voiceand visual contact from drive areas, loading areas, transfer points, andother locations on the conveyor path not guarded by location, position,or guards shall be furnished with emergency stop buttons, pull cords, limitswitches, or similar emergency stop devices. However, if the design, function,and operation of the conveyor is not hazardous to personnel, an emergencystop device is not required.(A) Emergency stop devices shall be easily identifiable in the immediatevicinity of such locations.(B) An emergency stop device shall act directly on the control of the conveyorinvolved and may not depend on the stopping of any other equipment. Emergencystop devices shall be installed so that they cannot be overridden fromother locations.(xi) Where coal-handling operations may produce a combustible atmospherefrom fuel sources or from flammable gases or dust, sources of ignitionshall be eliminated or safely controlled to prevent ignition of the combustibleatmosphere.(xii) Employees may not work on or beneath overhanging coal in coal bunkers,coal silos, or coal storage areas.(xiii) Employees entering a bunker or silo to dislodge the contents shallwear a safety harness with lifeline attached. The lifeline shall be securedto a fixed support outside the bunker and shall be attended at all timesby an employee located outside the bunker or facility.(12) <T3>Walking and working surfaces. </T3>(i) The walking and working surfacerequirements of Subpart D of this part apply, except as noted in paragraphs(h) and (v)(12) of this section.(ii) A floor hole presenting a falling hazard of 4 feet (122 cm) or moreto a lower level shall be guarded by a fall protection system in accordancewith Subpart D of this part to prevent employees from falling into theopening. A floor hole which is more than 2 inches (5.1 cm) and less than12 inches (30.5 cm) in its least dimension and which is provided solelyfor passage of machinery, piping, or other equipment that may expand andcontract, vibrate or move in a similar manner shall be guarded by a toeboardor equivalent means to prevent employees' feet from entering the hole andto prevent tools from falling through the opening and onto employees below.(13) <T3>Hydroplants and equipment. </T3>Employees working on or close to watergates, valves, intakes, forebays, flumes, or other locations where increasedor decreased water flow or levels may pose a significant hazard shall bewarned before water flow changes are made.(w) <T3>Special conditions</T3>_(1) <T3>Capacitors.</T3> The following additional requirements apply to workon capacitors and on lines connected to capacitors. (i) Before employees work on capacitors, the capacitors shall be disconnectedfrom the energize source and short-circuited.(ii) Before the units are handled, each unit in series-parallel capacitorbanks shall be short-circuited between all terminals and the capacitorcase or its rack. If the cases of capacitors are on ungrounded substationracks, the racks shall be bonded to ground. (iii) Any line to which capacitors are connected shall be short-circuitedbefore it is considered deenergized. (2) <T3>Current transformer secondaries.</T3> The secondary of a current transformermay not be opened while the transformer is energized. If the primary ofthe current transformer cannot be deenergized before work is performedon an instrument, a relay, or other section of a current transformer secondarycircuit, the circuit shall be bridged so that the current transformer secondarywill not be opened.  (3) <T3>Series streetlighting.</T3> If the open-circuit voltage exceeds 600volts, the series streetlighting circuit shall be worked in accordancewith paragraph (q) or (t) of this section, as appropriate. A series loopmay only be opened after the streetlighting transformer has been deenergizedand isolated from the source of supply or after the loop is bridged toavoid an open-circuit condition. (4) <T3>Illumination.</T3> Whenever natural light is insufficient to illuminatethe worksite, sufficient artificial illumination shall be provided to enablethe employee to perform the work safely. (5) <T3>Protection against drowning.</T3> (i) Whenever employees are engagedin work where they may be pulled or pushed or may fall into water and wherethe danger of drowning exists, they shall be provided with and shall useU.S. Coast Guard approved personal flotation devices. (ii) Personal flotation devices shall be maintained in safe condition andshall be inspected on a regularly scheduled basis for rot, mildew, watersaturation, and other conditions which could render the device unsuitablefor use. (iii) Employees may cross streams or other bodies of water only if a safemeans of passage is provided. (6) <T3>Employee protection in public work areas.</T3> (i) Before work is begunin the vicinity of vehicular or pedestrian traffic which may endanger employees,warning signs or flags and other traffic control devices shall be placedin conspicuous locations to alert and channel approaching traffic. (ii) Where additional employee protection is necessary, barricades shallbe used.(iii) Excavated areas shall be protected with barricades.(iv) At night, warning lights shall be prominently displayed. (7) <T3>Backfeed.</T3> If there is a possibility of voltage backfeed from sourcesof cogeneration or from the secondary system (for example, backfeed frommore than one energized phase feeding a common load), the requirementsof paragraph (1) of this section apply if the lines or equipment are tobe worked as energized, and the requirements of paragraphs (m) and (n)of this section apply if the lines or equipment are to be worked as deenergized.(8) <T3>Lasers.</T3> Laser equipment shall be installed, adjusted, and operatedin accordance with andSection; 1926.54 of this chapter. (9) <T3>Hydraulic fluids.</T3> Hydraulic fluids used for the insulated sectionsof equipment shall provide insulation for the voltage involved.(x) <T3>Definitions. </T3><T3>Affected employee. </T3>An employee whose job includes activities suchas erecting, installing, constructing, repairing, adjusting, inspecting,operating, or maintaining the equipment or process. <T3>Attendant. </T3>An employee assigned to remain immediately outsidethe entrance to an enclosed or other space to render assistance as neededto employees inside the space. <T3>Authorized employee. </T3>An employee to whom the authority and responsibilityto perform a specific assignment has been given by the employer, who candemonstrate by experience or training the ability to recognize potentiallyhazardous energy and its potential impact on workplace conditions, andwho has the knowledge to implement adequate methods and means for the controland isolation of such energy. <T3>Automatic circuit recloser. </T3>A self-controlled device for interruptingand reclosing an alternating current circuit with a predetermined sequenceof opening and reclosing followed by resetting, hold-closed, or lockoutoperation. <T3>Barricade. </T3>A physical obstruction such as tapes, cones, or A-frametype wood or metal structures intended to provide a warning about and tolimit access to a hazardous area. <T3>Barrier. </T3>A physical obstruction which is intended to prevent contactwith energized lines or equipment or to prevent unauthorized access toa work area. <T3>Bond. </T3>The electrical interconnection of conductive parts designedto maintain a common electrical potential. <T3>Bus. </T3>A conductor or a group of conductors that serve as a commonconnection for two or more circuits. <T3>Bushing. </T3>An insulating structure, including a through conductoror providing a passageway for such a conductor, with provision for mountingon a barrier, conducting or otherwise, for the purposes of insulating theconductor from the barrier and conducting current from one side of thebarrier to the other. <T3>Cable. </T3>A conductor with insulation, or a stranded conductor withor without insulation and other coverings (single-conductor cable), ora combination of conductors insulated from one another (multiple-conductorcable). <T3>Cable sheath. </T3>A conductive protective covering applied to cables.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>A cable sheath may consist of multiple layers of which oneor more is conductive.</ITAG><T3>Circuit. </T3>A conductor or system of conductors through which anelectric current is intended to flow. <T3>Clearance (for work). </T3>Authorization to perform specified workor permission to enter a restricted area. <T3>Clearance (from hazard). </T3>Separation from energized lines or equipment.<T3>Communication lines. </T3>(See <T3>Lines, communication.</T3>) <T3>Conductor. </T3>A material, usually in the form of a wire, cable, orbus bar, suitable for carrying an electric current. <T3>Covered conductor. </T3>A conductor covered with a dielectric havingno rated insulating strength or having a rated insulating strength lessthan the voltage of the circuit in which the conductor is used. <T3>Current-carrying part. </T3>A conducting part intended to be connectedin an electric circuit to a source of voltage. Non-current-carrying partsare those not intended to be so connected. <T3>Deenergized. </T3>Free from any electrical connection to a source ofpotential difference and from electric charge; not having a potential differentfrom that of the earth.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>The term is used only with reference to current-carryingparts, which are sometimes energized (alive).</ITAG><T3>Designated employee (designated person). </T3>An employee (or person)who is designated by the employer to perform specific duties under theterms of this section and who is knowledgeable in the construction andoperation of the equipment and the hazards involved. <T3>Electric line truck. </T3>A truck used to transport personnel, tools,and material for electric supply line work.<T3>Electric supply lines. </T3>(See <T3>Lines, electric supply.</T3>)<T3>Electric utility. </T3>An organization responsible for the installation,operation, or maintenance of an electric supply system.<T3>Enclosed space. </T3>A working space, such as a manhole, vault, tunnel,or shaft, that has a limited means of egress or entry, that is designedfor periodic employee entry under normal operating conditions, and thatunder normal conditions does not contain a hazardous atmosphere, but thatmay contain a hazardous atmosphere under abnormal conditions.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_Spaces that are enclosed but not designed for employee entryunder normal operating conditions are not considered to be enclosed spacesfor the purposes of this section. Similarly, spaces that are enclosed andthat are expected to contain a hazardous atmosphere are not consideredto be enclosed spaces for the purposes of this section.</ITAG><T3>Energized (alive, live). </T3>Electrically connected to a source ofpotential difference, or electrically charged so as to have a potentialsignificantly different from that of earth in the vicinity.<T3>Energy isolating device. </T3>A physical device that prevents the transmissionor release of energy, including, but not limited to, the following: A manuallyoperated electrical circuit breaker, a disconnect switch, a manually operatedswitch, a slide gate, a slip blind, a line valve, blocks, and any similardevice with a visible indication of the position of the device. (Push buttons,selector switches, and other control-circuit-type devices are not energyisolating devices.)<T3>Energy source. </T3>Any electrical, mechanical, hydraulic, pneumatic,chemical, nuclear, thermal, or other energy source that could cause injuryto personnel.<T3>Equipment (electrical). </T3>A general term including material, fittings,devices, appliances, fixtures, apparatus, and the like used as part ofor in connection with an electrical installation.<T3>Exposed. </T3>Not isolated or guarded.<T3>Ground. </T3>A conducting connection, whether intentional or accidental,between an electric circuit or equipment and the earth, or to some conductingbody that serves in place of the earth.<T3>Grounded. </T3>Connected to earth or to some conducting body that servesin place of the earth.<T3>Guarded. </T3>Covered, fenced, enclosed, or otherwise protected, bymeans of suitable covers or casings, barrier rails or screens, mats, orplatforms, designed to minimize the possibility, under normal conditions,of dangerous approach or accidental contact by persons or objects.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Wires which are insolated, but not otherwise protected,are not considered as guarded.</ITAG><T3>Hazardous atmosphere. </T3>An atmosphere presenting a potential fordeath, disablement, injury, or acute illness from one or more of the followingcauses:(1) A concentration of flammable gas, vapor, or mist in excess of 10 percentof its lower flammable limit;(2) A concentration of airborne combustible dust that obscures vision ata distance of 5 feet (152 cm) or less;(3) A concentration of oxygen less than 19.5 percent or more than 23.5percent;(4) A concentration of any substance listed in Subpart Z of this part thatexceeds the listed permissible exposure limit (PEL);(5) A concentration of a substance above the numerical limit in the MaterialSafety Data Sheet provided by the manufacturer to employers in conformancewith andSection; 1910.1200(g)(2)(vi), or that is otherwise known to the employerto present a safety or acute health hazard; or (6) Any other condition immediately dangerous to life or health.<T3>High-power tests. </T3>Tests in which fault currents, load currents,magnetizing currents, and line-dropping currents are used to test equipment,either at the equipment's rated voltage or at lower voltages.<T3>High-voltage tests. </T3>Tests in which voltages of approxmiately 1000volts are used as a practical minimum and in which the voltage has sufficientenergy to cause injury.<T3>Immediately dangerous to life or health (IDLH). </T3>Any conditionthat poses an immediate threat to life or that is likely to result in acuteor immediate severe health effects.<T3>Insulated. </T3>Separated from other conducting surfaces by a dielectric(including air space) offering a high resistance to the passage of current.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_When any object is said to be insulated, it is understoodto be insulated for the conditions to which it is normally subjected. Otherwise,it is, within the purpose of this section, uninsulated.</ITAG><T3>Insulation (cable). </T3>That which is relied upon to insulate theconductor from other conductors or conducting parts or from ground.<T3>Line-clearance tree trimming. </T3>The pruning, trimming, repairing,maintaining, removing, or clearing trees or cutting brush that is within10 feet (305 cm) of electric supply lines and equipment.<T3>Line-clearance tree trimmer.</T3> An employee who, through relatedtraining or on-the-job experience or both, is familiar with the specialtechniques and hazards involved in line clearance. An employee who is regularlyassigned to a line-clearance tree-trimming crew and who is undergoing on-the-jobtraining and who, in the course of such training, has demonstrated an abilityto perform duties safely at his or her level of training and who is underthe direct supervision of a line-clearance tree trimmer is considered tobe a line-clearance tree trimmer.<T3>Lines_</T3>(1) <T3>Communication lines. </T3>The conductors and their supporting or containingstructures which are used for public or private signal or communicationservice, and which operate at potentials not exceeding 400 volts to groundor 750 volts between any two points of the circuit, and the transmittedpower of which does not exceed 150 watts. If the lines are operating atless than 150 volts, no limit is placed on the transmitted power of thesystem. Under certain conditions, communication cables may include communicationcircuits exceeding these limitations where such circuits are also usedto supply power solely to communication equipment.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note._</T4>Telephone, telegraph, railroad signal, data, clock, fire,police alarm, cable television, and other systems conforming with thisdefinition are included. Lines used for signaling purposes, but not includedunder this definition, are considered as electric supply lines of the samevoltage.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Electric supply lines. </T3>Conductors used to transmit electric energyand their necessary supporting or containing structures. Signal lines ofmore than 400 volts are always supply lines within this section, and thoseof less than 400 volts are considered as supply lines, if so run and operatedthroughout.<T3>Manhole. </T3>A subsurface enclosure which personnel may enter andwhich is used for the purpose of installing, operating, and maintainingsubmersible equipment or cable.<T3>Manhole steps. </T3>A series of steps individually attached to or setinto the walls of a manhole structure.<T3>Qualified employee (qualified person). </T3>One knowledgeable in theconstruction and operation of electric power generation, transmission,and distribution equipment and the hazards involved.<T3>Rubber. </T3>A generic term that includes elastomers and elastomercompounds, regardless of origin.<T3>Step bolt. </T3>A bolt or rung attached at intervals along a structuralmember and used for foot placement during climbing or standing.<T3>Switch. </T3>A device for opening and closing or for changing the connectionof a circuit. In this section, a switch is understood to be manually operable,unless otherwide stated.<T3>System operator. </T3>A qualified person designated to operate thesystem or its parts.<T3>Vault. </T3>An enclosure, above or below ground, which personnel mayenter and which is used for the purpose of installing, operating, or maintainingequipment or cable.<T3>Vented vault. </T3>A vault that has provision for air changes usingexhaust flue stacks and low level air intakes operating on differentialsof pressure and temperature providing for airflow which precludes a hazardousatmosphere from developing.<T3>Voltage. </T3>The effective (rms) potential difference between anytwo conductors or between a conductor and ground. Voltages are expressedin nominal values unless otherwise indicated. The nominal voltage of asystem or circuit is the value assigned to a system or circuit of a givenvoltage class for the purpose of convenient designation. The operatingvoltage of the system may vary above or below this value.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1946 Filed 1-30-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4510-26-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>